{"Asthma - child - discharge": {"description": "Your child has asthma, which causes the airways of the lungs to swell and narrow. In the hospital, the doctors and nurses helped your child breathe better."}, "Axillary nerve dysfunction": {"description": "Axillary nerve dysfunction is nerve damage that leads to a loss of movement or sensation in the shoulder.", "Possible Complications": "Deformity of the arm, shoulder contracture, or frozen shoulder, Partial loss of sensation in the arm (uncommon), Partial shoulder paralysis, Repeated injury to the arm. ", "Symptoms": ["Numbness over part of the outer shoulder", "Shoulder weakness, especially when lifting the arm up and away from the body"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine your neck, arm, and shoulder. Weakness of the shoulder\u00a0can cause difficulty moving your arm.The deltoid muscle of the shoulder may show signs of muscle atrophy.Tests that may be used to\u00a0check axillary nerve dysfunction include:EMG and nerve conduction tests -- will be normal right after the injury and should be\u00a0done several weeks after the injury or symptoms start, MRI or x-rays of the shoulder . ", "Treatment": "Depending on the cause of the nerve disorder, some people do not need treatment. They get better on their own. The rate of recovery can be different for everyone. It can take many months to recover.Anti-inflammatory medications may be given if you have:Sudden symptoms, Small changes in sensation or movement, No history of injury to the area, No signs of nerve damage. These medicines reduce swelling and pressure on the nerve. They may be injected directly into the area or taken by mouth.Other medicines include:Over-the-counter pain medicines may be helpful for mild pain (neuralgia)., Other medicines may reduce stabbing pain., Opiate pain relievers \u00a0may be needed to control severe pain.. If your symptoms continue or get worse, you may need surgery. If a trapped nerve is causing your symptoms, surgery to release the nerve may help you feel better.Physical therapy can\u00a0help maintain muscle strength. Job changes, muscle retraining, or other forms of therapy may be recommended.", "Prevention": "Preventive measures vary, depending on the cause. Avoid putting pressure on the underarm area for a long periods. Make sure casts, splints, and other appliances fit properly. When you use crutches, learn how to avoid putting pressure on the underarm.", "Causes": "Axillary nerve dysfunction is a form of peripheral neuropathy. It occurs when there is damage to the axillary nerve. This is the nerve that\u00a0helps control the deltoid muscles of the shoulder and the skin around it. A problem with just one nerve, such as the axillary nerve, is called mononeuropathy.The usual causes are:Direct injury, Long-term pressure on the nerve, Pressure on the nerve from nearby body structures, Shoulder injury. Entrapment creates pressure on the nerve where it passes through a narrow structure.The damage\u00a0can destroy the myelin sheath that covers the nerve or part of the nerve cell (the axon). Damage of either type reduces or prevents the movement of\u00a0signals through the nerve.Conditions that can lead to axillary nerve dysfunction include:Body-wide (systemic) disorders that cause nerve inflammation, Deep infection, Fracture of the upper arm bone (humerus), Pressure from casts or splints, Improper use of crutches, Shoulder dislocation. In some cases, no cause can be found."}, "Asthma and school": {"description": "School staff should know what things make your child's asthma worse. These are called triggers. Your child should be able to go to another location to get away from asthma triggers, if needed."}, "Anterior vaginal wall repair": {"description": "Anterior vaginal wall repair is surgery that tightens the front (anterior) wall of the vagina."}, "Acidosis": {"description": "Acidosis is a condition in which there is too much acid in the body fluids. It is the opposite of alkalosis (a condition in which there is too much base in the body fluids).", "Possible Complications": "Complications depend on the specific type of acidosis.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical examination and ask about your symptoms.Laboratory tests that may be ordered include:Arterial blood gas analysis, Electrolytes test, such as a basic metabolic panel to confirm acidosis and show whether it is metabolic or respiratory acidosis. . Other tests may be needed to determine the cause of the acidosis.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause. ", "Prevention": "Prevention depends on the cause of the acidosis. Many causes of metabolic acidosis can be prevented, including diabetic ketoacidosis and some causes of lactic acidosis. Normally, people with healthy kidneys and lungs do not have serious acidosis.", "Causes": "The kidneys and lungs maintain the balance (proper pH level) of chemicals called acids and bases in the body. Acidosis occurs when acid builds up or when bicarbonate (a base) is lost. Acidosis is classified as either respiratory or metabolic acidosis.Respiratory acidosis develops when there is too much carbon dioxide (an acid) in the body. This type of acidosis is usually caused when the body is unable to remove enough carbon dioxide through breathing. Other names for respiratory acidosis are hypercapnic acidosis and carbon dioxide acidosis. Causes of respiratory acidosis include:Chest deformities, such as kyphosis, Chest injuries, Chest muscle weakness, Chronic lung disease, Overuse of sedative drugs . Metabolic acidosis develops when too much acid is produced in the body. It can also occur when the kidneys cannot remove enough acid from the body. There are several types of metabolic acidosis:Diabetic acidosis (also called diabetic ketoacidosis and DKA) develops when substances called ketone bodies (which are acidic) build up during uncontrolled diabetes., Hyperchloremic acidosis is caused by the loss of too much sodium bicarbonate from the body, which can happen with severe diarrhea.. Lactic acidosis is a buildup of lactic acid. This can be caused by: Cancer, Drinking too much alcohol, Exercising vigorously for a very long time, Liver failure, Low blood sugar (hypoglycemia), Medications, such as salicylates, MELAS (a very rare genetic mitochondrial disorder that affects energy production), Prolonged lack of oxygen from shock, heart failure, or severe anemia, Seizures. Other causes of metabolic acidosis include:Kidney disease (distal renal tubular acidosis and proximal renal tubular acidosis), Poisoning by aspirin, ethylene glycol (found in antifreeze), or methanol, Severe dehydration. "}, "Ammonia - blood": {"description": "The ammonia test measures the amount of ammonia in a blood sample."}, "Atelectasis": {"description": "Atelectasis is the collapse of part or (much less commonly) all of a lung.", "Possible Complications": "Pneumonia may develop quickly after atelectasis in the affected part of the lung.", "Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Chest pain", "Cough"], "Exams and Tests": "To confirm if you have atelectasis, the following tests will likely be done:Bronchoscopy, Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to re-expand the collapsed lung tissue. If fluid is putting pressure on the lung, removing the fluid may allow the lung to expand.Treatments for atelectasis include one or more of the following:Clap (percussion) on the chest to loosen mucus plugs in the airway, Perform deep breathing exercises (with the help of incentive spirometry devices), Remove or relieve any blockage in the airways by bronchoscopy., Tilt the person so the head is lower than the chest (called postural drainage). This allows mucus to drain more easily., Treat a tumor or other condition, if there is one, Turn the person to lie on the healthy side, allowing the collapsed area of lung to re-expand, Use aerosolized respiratory treatments (inhaled medications) to open the airway, Use other devices that help increase positive pressure in the airways and clear fluids (positive expiratory pressure [PEP] devices) . ", "Prevention": "Encourage movement and deep breathing in anyone who is bedridden for long periods., Keep small objects out of the reach of young children., Maintain deep breathing after anesthesia.. ", "Causes": "Atelectasis is caused by a blockage of the air passages (bronchus or bronchioles) or by pressure on the outside of the lung.Another type of collapsed lung is called pneumothorax. It occurs when air escapes from the lung. The air then fills the space outside of the lung, between the lung and chest wall.Atelectasis\u00a0is common after surgery or in patients who were in the hospital.Risk factors for developing atelectasis include:Anesthesia, Foreign object in the airway (most common in children), Lung diseases, Mucus that plugs the airway, Pressure on the lung caused by a buildup of fluid between the ribs and the lungs (called a pleural effusion), Prolonged bed rest with few changes in position, Shallow breathing (may be caused by painful breathing), Tumors that block an airway . "}, "Anorectal abscess": {"description": "An anorectal abscess is a collection of pus in the area of the anus and rectum.", "Possible Complications": "Anal fistula (abnormal collection between the anus and another structure), Infection that spreads to the blood (sepsis), Continuing pain, Problem keeps coming back (recurrence), Scars . ", "Symptoms": ["Constipation", "Discharge of pus from the rectum", "Fatigue, fever, night sweats, and chills", "Redness, painful and hardened tissue in the area of the anus "], "Exams and Tests": "A rectal examination may confirm an anorectal abscess. A proctosigmoidoscopy may be done to rule out other diseases.In rare cases, a CT scan, MRI, or ultrasound is needed to locate the collection of pus. ", "Treatment": "The problem rarely goes away on its own. Antibiotics alone usually cannot treat an abscess.Treatment involves surgery to open and drain the abscess.Surgery is done using local numbing medicine, along with medicine to make you sleepy. Spinal anesthesia may be used.\u00a0, Surgery is most often an outpatient procedure, which means that you go home on the same day. The surgeon cuts open the abscess and drains the pus. , If the pus collection is deep, you may need to stay in the hospital until the abscess has completely drained., After surgery, you need warm sitz baths (sitting in a tub of warm water). This helps relieve pain, reduce swelling, and make the abscess easier to drain.. Drained abscesses are usually left open and no stitches are needed.Your doctor may prescribe pain medication and antibiotics.You may need stool softeners. Practice good hygiene. Eat a soft or liquid diet until the abscess has healed.", "Prevention": "Prevention or prompt treatment of sexually transmitted diseases may prevent an anorectal abscess from forming. Use condoms during intercourse, including anal sex, to prevent such infections.In infants and toddlers, frequent diaper changes and proper cleaning during diaper changes can help prevent both anal fissures and abscesses.", "Causes": "Common causes of anorectal abscess include:Blocked glands in the anal area, Infection of an anal fissure, Sexually transmitted infection. Deep rectal abscesses may be caused by intestinal disorders such as Crohn's disease or diverticulitis.The following factors increase your risk of an anorectal abscess:Anal sex, Chemotherapy drugs used to treat cancer, Diabetes, Inflammatory bowel disease (Crohn's disease and ulcerative colitis), Use of corticosteroid medicines, Weakened immune system (such as from HIV/AIDS). The condition may occur in infants and toddlers who are still in diapers and who have a history of anal fissures."}, "Am I in labor?": {"description": "False labor; Braxton Hicks contractions; Prodromal labor; Latent labor; Pregnancy - labor"}, "Animal bites - self-care": {"Symptoms": ["Breaks or major cuts in the skin, with or without bleeding", "Bruising", "Crushing injuries", "Puncture wounds "], "description": "An animal bite can break, puncture, or tear the skin. Animal bites that break the skin put you at risk for infections.", "Causes": "Most animal bites come from pets. Dog bites are common and most often happen to children. Cat bites are less common, but have a higher risk of infection. Cat teeth are longer and sharper, which can cause deeper puncture wounds. Most other animal bites are caused by stray or wild animals, such as skunks, raccoons, foxes, and bats.Bites that cause a puncture wound are more likely to become infected. Some animals are infected with a virus that can cause rabies. Rabies is rare, but can be deadly."}, "Assisted delivery with forceps": {"description": "Another technique your doctor may use to deliver the baby is called vacuum assisted delivery."}, "Abdominal wall surgery": {"description": "Abdominal wall surgery\u00a0is not the same as liposuction, which is another way to remove fat. But abdominal wall surgery is sometimes combined with liposuction."}, "Amniotic constriction bands": {"description": "Amniotic constriction bands are strands of the fluid-filled sac (amniotic sac) that surrounds a baby in the womb. They may cause a congenital (present from birth) deformity of the face, arms, legs, fingers, or toes.", "Possible Complications": "Complications can include complete or partial loss of function of an arm or a leg. Congenital bands affecting the hand often cause the most problems.", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal gap in the face (if it goes across the face, it is called a cleft)", "All or part of an arm or leg missing (congenital amputation)", "Defect of the abdomen or chest wall (if band is located in those areas)", "Permanent band or indentation around an arm, leg, finger, or toe"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider can diagnose this condition during a physical exam. The disease is usually diagnosed at birth.", "Treatment": "Treatment widely varies. Often, the deformity is not severe and no treatment is needed. In more serious cases, major surgery may be needed to reconstruct all or part of an arm or leg.", "Causes": "Amniotic constriction bands are caused by damage to a part of the placenta called the amnion. The placenta carries blood to a baby still growing in the womb. Damage to the placenta can prevent normal growth development.Damage to the amnion may produce fiber-like bands that can trap parts of the developing baby. These bands reduce blood supply to the areas and cause them to develop abnormally.Amniotic constriction bands are rare."}, "Allergies, asthma, and dust": {"description": "Allergic rhinitis - dust"}, "Anemia caused by low iron - children": {"description": "Iron helps make red blood cells, so a lack of iron in the body may lead to anemia. The medical name of this problem is iron deficiency anemia.", "Possible Complications": "Anemia caused by a low iron level can affect a child's ability to learn in school. A low iron level can cause decreased attention span, reduced alertness, and learning problems in children.A low iron level can cause the body to absorb too much lead.", "Symptoms": ["Act irritable", "Become short of breath", "Crave unusual foods", "Eat less food", "Feel tired or weak all the time", "Have a sore tongue", "Have headaches or dizziness", "Blue-tinged or very pale whites of eyes", "Brittle nails", "Pale skin color"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam.Blood tests that measure iron level in the body include:Hematocrit, Serum ferritin, Serum iron, Total iron binding capacity (TIBC) . A measurement called iron saturation (serum iron/TIBC) often can show whether the child has enough iron in the body.", "Treatment": "\r\n\r\nSince children only absorb a small amount of the iron they eat, most children need to\u00a0have 8 to 10 mg of iron per day. Eating healthy foods is the most important way to prevent and treat iron deficiency. Good sources of iron include:Apricots, Chicken, turkey, fish, and other meats, Dried beans, lentils, and soybeans, Eggs, Liver, Molasses, Oatmeal, Peanut butter, Prune juice, Raisins and prunes, Spinach, kale and other greens. If a healthy diet does not prevent or treat your child's low iron level and anemia, the doctor will likely recommend iron supplements for your child. These are taken by mouth.Do not give your child iron supplements or vitamins with iron without checking with your child's doctor. The doctor will prescribe the right kind of supplement for your child. If your child takes too much iron, it can cause poisoning. ", "Prevention": "Eating healthy foods is the most important way to prevent and treat iron deficiency.", "Causes": "Anemia caused by a low iron level is the most common form of anemia. The body gets iron through certain foods. It also reuses iron from old red blood cells.A diet that does not have enough iron is the most common cause. During periods of rapid growth during puberty, even more iron is needed.Toddlers who drink too much cow's milk may also become anemic if they are not eating other healthy foods that have iron.\r\nOther causes may be:The body is not able to absorb iron well, even though the child is eating enough iron, Slow blood loss over a long period, often due to menstrual periods or bleeding in the digestive tract. Iron deficiency in children can also be related to lead poisoning."}, "Adolescent test or procedure preparation": {"description": "Preparing for a medical test or procedure can reduce anxiety, encourage cooperation, and help your adolescent develop coping skills."}, "Amblyopia": {"description": "Amblyopia the loss of the ability to see clearly through one eye. It is also called \"lazy eye.\" It is the most common cause of vision problems in children.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Eye muscle problems that may require several surgeries, Permanent vision loss in the affected eye. ", "Symptoms": ["Eyes that turn in or out", "Eyes that do not appear to work together", "Inability to judge depth correctly", "Poor vision in one eye "], "Exams and Tests": "In most cases, amblyopia can be detected with a complete eye exam. Special tests are not often needed.", "Treatment": "The first step will be correct any eye condition that is causing poor vision in the amblyopic eye (such as cataracts).Children with a refractive error (nearsightedness, farsightedness, or astigmatism) will need glasses.Next, a patch is placed on the normal eye. This forces the brain to recognize the image from the eye with amblyopia. Sometimes, drops are used to blur the vision of the normal eye instead of putting a patch on it.Children whose vision will not fully recover, and those with only one good eye due to any disorder should wear shatter- and scratch-resistant glasses. ", "Prevention": "Identifying and treating the problem early prevents children from having permanent visual loss. All children should have a complete eye exam at least once between ages 3 and 5.Special methods are used to measure vision in a child who is too young to speak. Most eye care professionals can perform these techniques.", "Causes": "Amblyopia occurs when the nerve pathway from one eye to the brain does not develop during childhood. This happens because the abnormal eye sends a blurred image or the wrong image to the brain.This confuses the brain, and the brain may learn to ignore the image from the weaker eye.Strabismus (crossed eyes) is the most common cause of amblyopia. There is often a family history of this condition.The term \"lazy eye\" refers to amblyopia, which often occurs along with strabismus. However, amblyopia can occur without strabismus. Also, people can have strabismus without amblyopia.Other causes include:Childhood cataracts, Farsightedness, nearsightedness, or astigmatism, especially if it is greater in one eye . "}, "Abdominal radiation - discharge": {"description": "Radiation - abdomen - discharge"}, "Alpha fetoprotein": {"description": "A test can be done to measure the amount of AFP in your blood."}, "Abdominal bloating": {"description": "Abdominal bloating is a condition in which the belly (abdomen) feels full and tight. Your belly may look swollen (distended).", "Causes": "Common causes include:Swallowing air, Constipation, Gastroesophageal reflux (GERD), Irritable bowel syndrome, Lactose intolerance and problems digesting other foods, Overeating, Small bowel bacterial overgrowth, Weight gain . The oral diabetes medicine, acarbose, and medicines or foods containing lactulose or sorbitol, may cause bloating.More serious disorders that may cause bloating are:Ascites and tumors, Celiac disease, Dumping syndrome, Ovarian cancer, Problems with the pancreas not producing enough digestive enzymes (pancreatic insufficiency) . "}, "ACTH (cosyntropin) stimulation test": {"description": "The ACTH stimulation test measures how well the adrenal glands respond to adrenocorticotropic hormone (ACTH). ACTH is a hormone produced in the pituitary gland that stimulates the adrenal glands to release a hormone called cortisol. The man-made form of ACTH is called cosyntropin."}, "Adrenergic bronchodilator overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Difficulty breathing", "Shallow breathing", "Rapid breathing", "No breathing", "No urine output", "Blurred vision", "Dilated pupils", "Throat burning", "High blood pressure, which then leads to low blood pressure", "Rapid heartbeat", "Chills", "Coma", "Convulsions", "Fever", "Irritability", "Nervousness", "Tingling of hands and feet", "Tremor", "Blue lips and fingernails", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222. ", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in childproof containers out of the reach of children."}, "Antimitochondrial antibody": {"description": "This article discusses the blood test used to measure the amount of AMA in the blood."}, "Adrenocortical carcinoma": {"description": "Adrenocortical carcinoma is a cancer of the adrenal glands.", "Possible Complications": "The tumor can spread to the liver, bone, lung, or other areas.", "Symptoms": ["Fatty, rounded hump high on the back just below the neck (buffalo hump)", "Flushed, rounded face with pudgy cheeks (moon face)", "Obesity", "Stunted growth (short stature)", "Virilization - the appearance of male characteristics, including increased body hair (especially on the face), pubic hair, acne, deepening of the voice, and enlarged clitoris (girls) ", "Muscle cramps", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. You may have high blood pressure and changes in body shape, such as breast growth in men (gynecomastia) or male\u00a0signs in women (virilization). Blood tests will be done to check hormone levels:ACTH level will be low., Aldosterone level will be high., Cortisol level will be high., Potassium level will be low., Male or female hormones may be abnormally high.. Imaging tests may include:Abdominal x-ray, CT scan of the abdomen, MRI of the abdomen. ", "Treatment": "Primary treatment is surgery to remove the tumor. Adrenocortical carcinoma may not improve with chemotherapy. Medications may be given to reduce production of cortisol, which causes many of the symptoms.", "Causes": "Adrenocortical carcinoma is most common in children younger than 5 years old\u00a0and adults in their 30s and 40s.The condition may be linked to a cancer syndrome that is passed down through families (inherited). Both men and women can develop this tumor.Adrenocortical carcinoma can produce the hormones cortisol, aldosterone, estrogen, or testosterone, as well as other hormones. In women the tumor often releases these hormones, which can lead to male characteristics.Adrenocortical carcinoma is very rare. The cause is unknown. About 2 people per million develop this type of tumor."}, "Ascites": {"description": "Ascites is the build-up of fluid in the space between the lining of the abdomen and abdominal organs. ", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Spontaneous bacterial peritonitis (a life-threatening infection of the ascites fluid), Hepatorenal syndrome (kidney failure), Weight loss and protein malnutrition, Mental confusion, change in the level of alertness, or coma (hepatic encephalopathy), Other complications of liver cirrhosis . ", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will do a physical exam to determine the amount of swelling in your belly.You may also have the following tests to assess your liver and kidneys:24-hour urine collection, Electrolyte levels, Kidney function tests, Liver function tests, Tests to measure the risk of bleeding and protein levels in the blood, Urinalysis, Abdominal ultrasound . Your doctor may also use a thin needle to withdraw ascites fluid from your belly. The fluid is tested to look for the cause of ascites.", "Treatment": "The condition that causes ascites will be treated, if possible.Treatments for fluid build-up may include lifestyle changes:Avoiding alcohol, Lowering salt in your diet (no more than 1,500 mg/day of sodium), Limiting fluid intake . You may also get medicines from your doctor including:\"Water pills\" (diuretics) to get rid of extra fluid, Antibiotics for infections . Procedures that you may have are:Inserting a tube into the belly to remove large volumes of fluid (called a paracentesis), Placing a special tube or shunt inside your belly (TIPS) to repair blood flow to the liver . People with end-stage liver disease may need a liver transplant.", "Causes": "Ascites results from high pressure in the blood vessels of the liver (portal hypertension) and low levels of a protein called albumin.Diseases that can cause severe liver damage can lead to ascites. These include long-term hepatitis C or B infection and alcohol abuse over many years.People with certain cancers in the abdomen may develop ascites. These include cancer of the colon, ovaries, uterus, pancreas, and liver.Other conditions that can cause this problem include:Clots in the veins of the liver (portal vein thrombosis), Congestive heart failure, Pancreatitis, Thickening and scarring of the sac-like covering of the heart . Kidney dialysis may also be linked to ascites."}, "After a fall in the hospital": {"description": "Hospital staff often do not see patients fall. But falls require attention right away to lessen the risk of injury."}, "Anti-reflux surgery - children - discharge ": {"description": "Your child may also have had a plyoroplasty procedure to widen the opening between the stomach and small intestine. The doctor may have\u00a0also placed a g-tube (gastrostomy tube) in the child's belly."}, "Anisocoria": {"description": "Anisocoria is unequal pupil size. The pupil is the black part in the center of the eye. It gets larger in dim light and smaller in bright light.", "Causes": "The use of eye drops is a common cause of a harmless change in pupil size. Other medicines that get in the eyes, including medicine from asthma inhalers, can change pupil size.Other causes of unequal pupil sizes may include:Aneurysm, Bleeding inside the skull caused by head injury, Brain tumor or abscess, Excess pressure in one eye caused by glaucoma, Increased intracranial pressure, because of brain swelling, intracranial hemorrhage, acute stroke, or intracranial tumor, Infection of membranes around the brain (meningitis or encephalitis), Migraine headache, Seizure (pupil size difference may remain long after seizure is over), Tumor, mass, or lymph node in the upper chest or lymph node causing pressure on a nerve may cause decreased sweating, a small pupil, or drooping eyelid all on the affected side (Horner syndrome), Diabetic occulomotor nerve palsy. "}, "Albumin - blood (serum)": {"description": "Albumin is a protein made by the liver. A serum albumin test measures the amount of this protein in the clear liquid portion of the blood."}, "Agoraphobia": {"description": "Agoraphobia is an intense fear and anxiety of being in places where it is hard to escape, or where help might not be available. Agoraphobia usually involves fear of crowds, bridges, or of being outside alone.", "Possible Complications": "Some persons with agoraphobia may:Use alcohol or other drugs while trying to self-medicate, Be unable to function at work or in social situations, Feel isolated, lonely, depressed, or suicidal. ", "Symptoms": ["Being afraid of spending time alone", "Being afraid of places where escape might be hard", "Being afraid of losing control in a public place", "Depending on others", "Feeling detached or separated from others", "Feeling helpless", "Feeling that the body is not real", "Feeling that the environment is not real", "Having an unusual temper or agitation", "Staying in the house for long periods of time ", "Chest pain or discomfort", "Choking", "Dizziness or faintness", "Nausea or other stomach distress", "Racing heart", "Short of breath", "Sweating", "Trembling"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will look at your history of agoraphobia, and will get a description of the behavior from you, your family, and friends.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to help you feel and function better. The success of treatment usually depends in part on how severe the agoraphobia is.Treatment approach combines cognitive-behavioral therapy (CBT) with an antidepressant medication, which may include any of the following:Selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs) are usually the first choice of antidepressant., Serotonin-norepinephrine reuptake inhibitors (SNRIs) are another choice. Other antidepressants and some anti-seizure drugs may be used for more severe cases., Other anti-anxiety medications may also be prescribed. For example, your health care provider may recommend benzodiazepines when antidepressants do not\u00a0help or before they take effect. . CBT involves 10 to 20 visits with a mental health professional over a number of weeks. CBT helps you change the thoughts that cause your condition. It may involve:Understanding and controlling distorted feelings or views of stressful events or situations, Learning stress management and relaxation techniques, Relaxing, then imagining the things that cause the anxiety, working from the least fearful to the most fearful (called systematic desensitization and exposure therapy) . You may also be slowly exposed to the real-life situation that causes the fear to help you overcome\u00a0it.A healthy lifestyle that includes exercise, enough rest, and good nutrition can also help be helpful.", "Prevention": "Early treatment of panic disorder can often prevent agoraphobia.", "Causes": "The exact cause agoraphobia is unknown. Agoraphobia sometimes occurs when a person has had a panic attack and begins to fear situations that might lead to another panic attack."}, "After an exposure to sharps or body fluids": {"description": "Exposure can put you at risk of infection."}, "Aortic valve surgery - minimally invasive": {"description": "The aortic valve can be replaced using:"}, "Abdominal mass": {"description": "An abdominal mass is swelling in one part of the belly area (abdomen).", "Causes": "Abdominal aortic aneurysm can cause a pulsating mass around the navel., Bladder distention (urinary bladder over-filled with fluid) can cause a firm mass in the center of the lower abdomen above the pelvic bones. In extreme cases it can reach as far up as the navel., Cholecystitis can cause a very tender mass that is felt below the liver in the right-upper quadrant (occasionally)., Colon cancer can cause a mass almost anywhere in the abdomen., Crohn's disease or bowel obstruction can cause many tender, sausage-shaped masses anywhere in the abdomen., Diverticulitis can cause a mass that is usually located in the left-lower quadrant., Gallbladder tumor can cause a tender, irregularly shaped mass in the right-upper quadrant., Hydronephrosis (fluid-filled kidney) can cause a smooth, spongy-feeling mass in one or both sides or toward the back (flank area)., Kidney cancer can sometimes cause a mass in the abdomen., Liver cancer can cause a firm, lumpy mass in the right upper quadrant., Liver enlargement (hepatomegaly) can cause a firm, irregular mass below the right rib cage, or on the left side in the stomach area., Neuroblastoma, a cancerous tumor, often found in the lower abdomen, that mainly occurs in children and infants., Ovarian cyst can cause a smooth, rounded, rubbery mass above the pelvis in the lower abdomen., Pancreatic abscess can cause a mass in the upper abdomen in the epigastric area., Pancreatic pseudocyst can cause a lumpy mass in the upper abdomen in the epigastric area., Renal cell carcinoma can cause a smooth, firm, but not tender mass near the kidney (usually only affects one kidney)., Spleen enlargement (splenomegaly) can sometimes be felt in the left-upper quadrant., Stomach cancer can cause a mass in the left-upper abdomen in the stomach area (epigastric) if the cancer is large., Uterine leiomyoma (fibroids) can cause a round, lumpy mass above the pelvis in the lower abdomen (sometimes can be felt if the fibroids are large)., Volvulus can cause a mass anywhere in the abdomen., Ureteropelvic junction obstruction can cause a mass in the lower abdomen.. "}, "Avoidant personality disorder": {"description": "Avoidant personality disorder is a mental health condition in which a person has a lifelong pattern of feeling very shy, inadequate, and sensitive to rejection.", "Possible Complications": "Without treatment, a person with avoidant personality disorder may\u00a0lead a life of near or total isolation. They may go on to develop a second\u00a0mental health\u00a0disorder such as substance abuse or a mood disorder such as depression.", "Symptoms": ["Be easily hurt when people criticize or disapprove of them", "Hold back too much inintimate relationships", "Be reluctant to become involved with people", "Avoid activities or jobs that involve contact with others", "Be shy in social situations out of fear of doing something wrong", "Make potential difficulties seem worse than they are", "Hold the view they are not good socially, not as good as other people, or unappealing "], "Exams and Tests": "Avoidant personality disorder is diagnosed based on a psychological evaluation that assesses the history and severity of the symptoms. \r\n \r\n \r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n", "Treatment": "Talk therapy is considered to be the most effective treatment for this condition. It helps persons with this disorder be less sensitive to rejection. Antidepressant drugs may be used in addition.", "Causes": "Cause of avoidant personality disorder is unknown. Genes or a physical illness that changed the person's appearance may play a role.\u00a0About 1% of the population has avoidant personality disorder."}, "Alkalosis": {"description": "Alkalosis is a condition in which the body fluids have excess base (alkali). This is the opposite of excess acid (acidosis).", "Possible Complications": "Untreated or not treated properly, complications may include any of the following:Arrhythmias, Coma, Electrolyte imbalance (such as hypokalemia) . ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion (can progress to stupor or coma)", "Hand tremor", "Light-headedness", "Muscle twitching", "Nausea, vomiting", "Numbness or tingling in the face, hands, or feet", "Prolonged muscle spasms (tetany) "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms.Laboratory tests that may be ordered include:Arterial blood gas analysis, Electrolytes test, such as basic metabolic panel to confirm alkalosis and show whether it is respiratory or metabolic alkalosis. . Other tests may be needed to determine the cause of the alkalosis. These may include:Urinalysis, Urine pH. ", "Treatment": "To treat alkalosis, your health care provider needs to find the cause.For alkalosis caused by hyperventilation, breathing into a paper bag allows you to keep more carbon dioxide in your body, which improves the alkalosis. If your oxygen level is low, you may receive oxygen.Medicines may be needed to correct chemical loss (such as chloride and potassium). Your health care provider will monitor your vital signs (temperature, pulse, rate of breathing, blood pressure).", "Prevention": "Prevention depends on the cause of the alkalosis. Normally, people with healthy kidneys and lungs do not have serious alkalosis.", "Causes": "The kidneys and lungs maintain the proper balance (proper pH level) of chemicals, called acids and bases, in the body. Decreased carbon dioxide (an acid) or increased bicarbonate (a base) level makes the body too alkaline, a condition called alkalosis. There are different types of alkalosis. These are described below. Respiratory alkalosis is caused by a low carbon dioxide levels in the blood. This can be due to:Fever, Being at a high altitude, Lack of oxygen, Liver disease, Lung disease, which causes you to breathe faster (hyperventilate), Salicylate poisoning . Metabolic alkalosis is caused by too much bicarbonate in the blood. It can also occur due to certain kidney diseases.Hypochloremic alkalosis is caused by an extreme lack or loss of chloride, such as from prolonged vomiting.Hypokalemic alkalosis is caused by the kidneys' response to an extreme lack or loss of potassium. This can occur from taking certain water pills (diuretics).Compensated alkalosis occurs when the body returns the acid-base balance to normal in cases of alkalosis, but bicarbonate and carbon dioxide levels remain abnormal."}, "Ankle fracture - aftercare": {"description": "An ankle fracture is a break in 1 or more ankle bones. These fractures may:"}, "Anti-reflux surgery": {"description": "Symptoms of reflux or heartburn are burning in the stomach that you may also feel in your throat or chest, burping or gas bubbles, or trouble swallowing food or fluids"}, "Actinic keratosis": {"description": "Some actinic keratoses may develop into a type of skin cancer.", "Symptoms": ["The skin changes begin as\u00a0flat and scaly areas. They often have a white or yellow crusty \"scale\" on top.", "The growths may be gray, pink, red, or the same color as the skin. Later they may become hard and wart-like or gritty and rough.", "The areas may be easier to feel than see.\u00a0\r\n \r\n"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse will look at your skin to diagnose this condition. A skin biopsy may be done to see if it is cancer. ", "Causes": "Actinic keratosis is caused by\u00a0exposure to sunlight. You are more likely to develop this if you:Have fair skin, blue or green eyes, or blond or red hair , Had a kidney or other transplant, Take\u00a0medicines that suppress the immune system, Spend a lot of time each day in the sun (for example, if you work outdoors), Had many, severe sunburns early in life, Are older. ", "Prevention": "The best way to lower your risk of actinic keratosis and skin cancer is to learn how to protect your skin from sun and ultraviolet (UV) light.Things you can do to lower your exposure to sunlight include:Wear clothing such as hats, long-sleeved shirts, long skirts, or pants., Try to avoid being in the sun during midday, when ultraviolet light is most intense., Use high-quality sunscreens, preferably with a sun protection factor (SPF) rating of at least 15. Pick a sunscreen that blocks both UVA and UVB light., Apply sunscreen before going out into the sun, and reapply often., Use sunscreen year-round, including in the winter., Avoid sun lamps, tanning beds, and tanning salons.. Other things to know about sun exposure:Sun exposure is stronger in or near surfaces that reflect light, such as water, sand, concrete, and areas painted white., Sun exposure is more intense at the beginning of the summer., Skin burns faster at higher altitudes. . ", "Treatment": "Some actinic keratoses become squamous cell skin cancer. Have all skin growths looked at by a doctor as soon as you find them. Your doctor will tell you how to treat it. Growths may be removed by:Burning (electrical cautery), Scraping away the lesion and using electricity to kill any remaining cells (called curettage and electrodesiccation), Cutting the tumor out and using stitches to place the skin back together (called excision), Freezing (cryotherapy, which freezes and kills the cells). If you have many of these skin growths, your doctor may recommend: A laser treatment called photodynamic therapy, Chemical peels, Skin creams such as 5-fluorouracil (5-FU) and imiquimod . "}, "Asthma and allergy - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on asthma and allergies:"}, "Autosomal recessive": {"description": "An autosomal recessive disorder means two copies of an abnormal gene must be present in order for the disease or trait to develop."}, "Aural polyps": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "An aural polyp is diagnosed through an exam of the ear canal and middle ear using an otoscope or microscope.", "description": "An aural polyp is a growth in the outside (external) ear canal. It may be attached to the eardrum (tympanic membrane), or it may grow from the middle ear space.", "Causes": "Aural polyps may be caused by:Cholesteatoma, Foreign object, Inflammation, Tumor. ", "Treatment": " Treatment depends on the underlying cause. Your doctor may first recommend:Avoiding water in the ear , Steroid medications, Antibiotic ear drops.  If a cholesteatoma is the underlying problem or the condition fails to clear, then surgery may be needed."}, "Alkaptonuria": {"description": "See also: Inborn error of metabolism", "Possible Complications": "People with this condition also can get arthritis in adulthood. The build-up of homogentisic acid in the cartilage causes arthritis in about 50% of older adults with alkaptonuria.Homogentisic acid also can build up on the heart valves, especially the mitral valve. This can sometimes lead to the need for valve replacement., Coronary artery disease may develop earlier in people with alkaptonuria., Kidney stones and prostate stones may be more common in people with alkaptonuria.. ", "Symptoms": ["Arthritis (especially of the spine) that gets worse over time", "Darkening of the ear", "Dark spots on the white of the eye (sclera) and cornea"], "Exams and Tests": "A urine test (urinalysis) is done to test for alkaptonuria. If ferric chloride is added to the urine, it will turn the urine a black color in patients with this condition.", "Treatment": "Some patients benefit from high-dose vitamin C. This has been shown to decrease the build-up of brown pigment in the cartilage and may slow the development of arthritis.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for persons with a family history of alkoptonuria who are considering having children.A blood test can be done to see if you carry the gene for alkaptonuria.Prenatal tests (amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling) can be done to screen a developing baby for this condition if the genetic change has been identified.", "Causes": "A defect in the HGD gene causes alkaptonuria.The gene defect makes the body unable to properly break down certain amino acids (tyrosine and phenylalanine). As a result, a substance called homogentisic acid builds up in the skin and other body tissues. The acid leaves the body through the urine. The urine turns brownish-black when it mixes with air.Alkaptonuria is inherited, which means it is passed down from parents to their children. If both parents carry the defective gene related to this condition, each of their children has a 25% chance of developing the disease."}, "Alcoholic ketoacidosis": {"description": "The condition is an acute form of metabolic acidosis.", "Possible Complications": "This can be a life-threatening disorder. Complications can include:\r\n  Coma and seizures, Gastrointestinal bleeding, Pancreatitis (inflammation of the pancreas), Pneumonia. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Agitation", "Changed level of alertness, which may lead to coma", "Confusion", "Fatigue", "Slow, sluggish, lethargic movement", "Irregular deep, rapid breathing (Kussmaul's sign)", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea and vomiting", "Symptoms of dehydration, such as dizziness, light-headedness, and thirst"], "Exams and Tests": "Arterial blood gases (measure the acid/base balance and oxygen level in blood), Blood alcohol level, Blood chemistries, and liver function tests, such as CHEM-20, CBC (complete blood count, measures red and whilte blood cells, and platelets, which help blood to clot), Prothrombin time (PT, a different measure of blood clotting, often abnormal from liver disease), Toxicology (poison) screening, Urine ketones. ", "Treatment": "Treatment may involve fluids (salt and sugar solution) given through a vein. You may need to have your blood taken often. You may get vitamin supplements to treat nutritional deficiencies caused by excess alcohol use.People with this condition are admitted to the hospital, often to the intensive care unit (ICU). Additional medications may be given to prevent alcohol withdrawal. \r\n", "Prevention": "Limiting the amount of alcohol you drink may help prevent this condition.", "Causes": "Alcoholic ketoacidosis is caused by excessive alcohol use. It is most often seen in a malnourished person who drinks large amounts of alcohol every day."}, "Age-appropriate diet for children": {"description": "An age-appropriate diet is one that provides adequate nutrition, is appropriate for a child's state of development, and can help prevent childhood obesity."}, "After a C-section - in the hospital": {"description": "Most women will remain in the hospital for 2 to 3 days after a cesarean delivery. Take advantage of the time to bond with your new baby, get some rest, and receive some help with breastfeeding and caring for your baby. "}, "Automatic dishwasher soap poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Loss of vision", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing trouble) ", "Low blood pressure -- develops quickly", "Collapse", "Severe change in blood acid levels, which can lead to organ damage ", "Breathing difficulty (from breathing in the poison) ", "Irritation", "Burns", "Necrosis (tissue death) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting, may be bloody", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe)", "Blood in the stool "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Allergic rhinitis - self-care": {"description": "Hay fever - self-care; Seasonal rhinitis - self-care"}, "Anti-smooth muscle antibody": {"description": "Anti-smooth muscle antibody is a blood test that detects the presence of antibodies against smooth muscle."}, "Anaerobic": {"description": "Anaerobic is the opposite of aerobic."}, "Arteriogram": {"description": "Related tests include:"}, "Acetaminophen dosing for children": {"description": "Taking acetaminophen (Tylenol) can help children with colds and fever feel better. As with all drugs, it is important to give children the correct dose. Acetaminophen is safe when taken as directed. But taking too much of this medicine can be harmful."}, "Aase syndrome": {"description": "Aase syndrome is a rare disorder that involves anemia and certain joint and skeletal deformities.", "Possible Complications": "Complications related to anemia include:Fatigue, Decreased oxygen in the blood, Weakness . Heart problems can lead to a variety of complications, depending on the specific defect.Severe cases of Aase syndrome have been associated with stillbirth or early death.", "Symptoms": ["Absent or small knuckles", "Cleft palate", "Decreased skin creases at finger joints", "Deformed ears", "Droopy eyelids", "Inability to fully extend the joints from birth (contracture deformity)", "Narrow shoulders", "Pale skin", "Triple-jointed thumbs"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. Tests that may be done include:Bone marrow biopsy, Complete blood count (CBC), Echocardiogram, X-rays. ", "Treatment": "Treatment may involve blood transfusions in the first year of life to treat anemia. A steroid medication called prednisone has also been used to treat anemia associated with Aase syndrome. However, it should only be used after reviewing the benefits and risks with a doctor who has experience treating anemias.A bone marrow transplant may be necessary if other treatment fails.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended if you have a family history of this syndrome and wish to become pregnant.", "Causes": "Most cases of Aase syndrome occur without a known reason and are not passed down through families (inherited). However, some cases have been shown to be inherited.This condition is similar to Diamond-Blackfan anemia, and the two conditions should not be separated. A missing piece on chromosome 19 is found in some people with Diamond-Blackfan anemia.The anemia in Aase syndrome is caused by poor development of the bone marrow, which is where blood cells are formed."}, "Alpha-1 antitrypsin deficiency": {"description": "Alpha-1 antitrypsin (AAT) deficiency is a condition in which the body does not make enough of a protein that protects the lungs and liver from damage. The condition can lead to emphysema and liver disease.", "Possible Complications": "Bronchiectasis, Cirrhosis or liver failure, Emphysema, Liver cancer. ", "Symptoms": ["Shortness of breath with and without exertion, and other symptoms of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD)", "Symptoms of severe liver disease (cirrhosis)", "Unintentional weight loss", "Wheezing"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination may reveal a barrel-shaped chest, wheezing, or decreased breath sounds. The following tests may also help with diagnosis:Alpha-1 antitrypsin blood test, Arterial blood gases, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, Genetic testing, Lung function test . Your doctor may suspect you of having this condition if you develop:Emphysema before age 45, Emphysema but you have never smoked or been exposed to toxins, Emphysema and you have a family history of the condition, Liver disease and no other cause can be found, Liver disease and you have a family history of liver disease. ", "Treatment": "Treatment for AAT deficiency involves replacing the missing AAT protein. The protein is given through a vein each week.\u00a0This is only slightly effective at preventing more lung damage in patients without end-stage disease. If you smoke, you need to quit. Other treatments are also used for emphysema and cirrhosis.", "Causes": "Alpha-1 antitrypsin (AAT) is a type of protein called a protease inhibitor.\u00a0AAT is made in the liver and it works to protect the lungs and liver.AAT deficiency means there is not enough of this protein in the body. It is caused by a genetic defect. The condition is most common among Europeans and North Americans of European descent.Adults with severe AAT deficiency will develop emphysema, often before age 40. Smoking can increase the risk of emphysema. Other patients have a higher level of AAT in their blood, and therefore have a less severe condition.Persons with this deficiency may also develop liver disease."}, "Abortion - surgical": {"description": "Surgical abortion is not the same as miscarriage. Miscarriage is when a pregnancy ends on its own before the 20th week.\r\n "}, "Abscess": {"Exams and Tests": "Often, a sample of fluid will be taken from the abscess and tested to see what\u00a0type of germ\u00a0is causing the problem. ", "Prevention": "Preventing abscesses depends on where they develop. For example, good hygiene can help prevent skin abscesses. Dental hygiene and routine care will prevent tooth abscesses.", "description": "An abscess is a collection of pus in any part of the body that, in most cases, causes swelling and inflammation around it.", "Causes": "Abscesses occur when an area of tissue becomes infected and the body's immune system tries to fight it. White blood cells move through the walls of the blood vessels into the area of the infection and collect in the damaged tissue. During this process, pus forms. Pus is the buildup of fluid, living and dead white blood cells, dead tissue, and bacteria or other foreign substances.Abscesses can form in almost any part of the body. The skin, under the skin, and the teeth are the most common sites. Abscesses may be caused by bacteria, parasites, and foreign substances.Abscesses in the skin are easy to see. They are red, raised, and painful. Abscesses in other areas of the body may not be\u00a0seen, but they may cause organ damage.Types of abscesses include:Abdominal abscess, Amebic liver abscess, Anorectal abscess, Bartholin abscess, Brain abscess, Epidural abscess, Peritonsillar abscess, Pyogenic liver abscess, Skin abscess, Spinal cord abscess, Subcutaneous abscess, Tooth abscess. ", "Treatment": "Treatment varies, but often surgery to drain the abscess, antibiotics, or both are needed."}, "Aneurysm in the brain": {"description": "An aneurysm is a weak area in the wall of a blood vessel that causes the blood vessel to bulge or balloon out. When an aneurysm occurs in a blood vessel of the brain, it is called a cerebral aneurysm.", "Possible Complications": "Increased pressure inside the skull, Loss of movement in one or more parts of the body, Loss of sensation of any part of the face or body, Seizures, Stroke, Subarachnoid hemorrhage. ", "Symptoms": ["Double vision", "Loss of vision", "Headaches", "Eye pain", "Neck pain", "Stiff neck", "Ringing in the ears ", "Confusion, no energy, sleepiness, or stupor", "Eyelid drooping", "Headaches with nausea or vomiting", "Muscle weakness or difficulty moving any part of the body", "Numbness or decreased sensation in any part of the body", "Problems speaking", "Seizures", "Stiff neck (occasionally)", "Vision changes (double vision, loss of vision) "], "Exams and Tests": "An eye exam may show signs of increased pressure in the brain, including swelling of the optic nerve or bleeding into the retina of the eye. A brain and nervous system exam may show abnormal eye movement, speech, strength, or sensation.The following tests may be used to diagnose a cerebral aneurysm and determine the cause of bleeding in the brain:Cerebral angiography or spiral CT scan angiography of the head to show the location and size of the aneurysm, Cerebrospinal fluid exam (spinal tap), CT scan of the head, Electroencephalogram (EEG), MRI of the head or MRI angiogram . ", "Treatment": "Two common methods are used to repair an aneurysm:Clipping is done during open brain surgery (craniotomy). , Endovascular repair is most often done. It usually involves a coil or coiling. This is a less invasive way to treat some aneurysms.. If an aneurysm in the brain ruptures, it is an emergency that needs medical treatment and often requires surgery. Endovascular repair is often used when this happens.Even if there are no symptoms, your doctor may order treatment to prevent a future, and possibly fatal rupture.Not all aneurysms need to be treated right away. Those that are very small (less than 3 mm) are less likely to break open.Your doctor will help you decide whether or not it is safer to have surgery to block off the aneurysm before it can break open (rupture). Sometimes people are too ill to have surgery, or it may be too dangerous to treat the aneurysm because of its location.Treatment of a ruptured aneurysm may involve:Being admitted to the hospital's intensive care unit (ICU), Complete bedrest and activity restrictions, Drainage of blood from the brain area (cerebral ventricular drainage), Drugs to prevent seizures, Drugs to control headaches and blood pressure, Drugs through a vein (IV) to prevent infection . Once the aneurysm is repaired, the person may need to prevent a stroke from a blood vessel spasm.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent a berry aneurysm from forming. Treating high blood pressure may reduce the chance that an existing aneurysm will rupture. Controlling risk factors for atherosclerosis may reduce the likelihood of some types of aneurysms. People who are known to have an aneurysm may need regular doctor visits to make sure the aneurysm is not changing size or shape.If unruptured aneurysms are discovered in time, they can be treated before causing problems.The decision to repair an unruptured cerebral aneurysm is based on the size and location of the aneurysm, and the patient's age and general health. ", "Causes": "Aneurysms in the brain occur when there is a weakened area in the wall of a blood vessel. An aneurysm may be present from birth (congenital). Or, it may develop later in life, such as after a blood vessel is injured.There are many types of brain aneurysms. The most common type is called a berry aneurysm. This type can vary in size from a few millimeters to over a centimeter. Giant berry aneurysms can be bigger than 2 centimeters. These are more common in adults. Berry aneurysms are passed down through families more often than other types of aneurysms.Watch this video about:Cerebral aneurysmOther types of cerebral aneurysms involve widening of an entire blood vessel. Or, they may appear as a ballooning out of part of a blood vessel. Such aneurysms can occur in any blood vessel that supplies the brain. Atherosclerosis, trauma, and infection can all injure the blood vessel wall and cause cerebral aneurysms.About 5% of people have a brain aneurysm, but only a small number of these aneurysms cause symptoms or rupture. Risk factors include: Family history of cerebral aneurysms, Medical problems such as polycystic kidney disease, coarctation of the aorta, and endocarditis. "}, "Acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL)": {"description": "ALL occurs when the body produces a large number of immature lymphoblasts. The cancer cells grow quickly and replace normal cells in the bone marrow. Bone marrow is the soft tissue in the center of bones that helps form all blood cells. ALL prevents healthy blood cells from being made. Life-threatening symptoms can occur as normal blood counts drop.", "Possible Complications": "Both leukemia itself and the treatment can lead to many problems such as bleeding, weight loss, and infections.", "Symptoms": ["Bone and joint pain", "Easy bruising and bleeding (such as bleeding gums, skin bleeding, nosebleeds, abnormal periods)", "Feeling weak or tired", "Fever", "Loss of appetite and weight loss", "Paleness", "Pain or feeling of fullness below the ribs", "Pinpoint red spots on the skin (petechiae)", "Swollen glands (lymphadenopathy) in the neck, under arms, and groin", "Night sweats "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may reveal the following:Bruising, Swollen liver, lymph nodes, and spleen, Signs of bleeding (petechiae, purpura) . Blood tests may include:Complete blood count (CBC), including white blood cell (WBC) count, Platelet count, Bone marrow aspiration and biopsy, Lumbar puncture (spinal tap) to check for leukemia cells in the spinal fluid . Tests are also done to look for changes in the DNA inside the abnormal white cells. Certain DNA changes may determine how well a patient does (prognosis), and what kind of treatment is recommended.", "Treatment": "The first goal of treatment is to get blood counts back to normal. If this occurs and the bone marrow looks healthy under the microscope, the cancer is said to be in complete remission. Chemotherapy is the first treatment tried with the goal of achieving complete remission.The person may need to stay in the hospital for chemotherapy. Or it can be given at a clinic and the patient goes home afterward., Chemotherapy is given into the veins (by IV) and sometimes next to the spine and brain. . After achievement of initial complete remission, more treatment is needed to be cured. This treatment can include more chemotherapy or radiation to the brain. Stem cell or bone marrow transplant from another person may also be done. Further treatment depends on:Age and health of the person, Genetic changes in the leukemia cells, How many courses of chemotherapy it took to achieve remission, If abnormal cells are still detected under the microscope, Availability of donors for stem cell transplant . ", "Prevention": "The risk of developing ALL may be reduced by avoiding contact with certain toxins, radiation, and chemicals.", "Causes": "Most of the time, no clear cause can be found for ALL. But the following may play a role in the development of leukemia in general:\r\n Certain chromosome problems\r\n , \r\n Exposure to radiation, including x-rays before birth\r\n , \r\n Past treatment with chemotherapy drugs\r\n , \r\n Receiving a bone marrow transplant\r\n , Toxins, such as benzene\r\n . The following increase the risk of ALL:Down syndrome or other genetic disorders, A brother or sister with leukemia . This type of leukemia usually affects children ages 3 to 7. ALL is the most common childhood cancer, but it can also occur in adults."}, "Acrodysostosis": {"description": "Acrodysostosis is an extremely rare disorder that is present at birth (congenital). It leads to problems\u00a0with the bones of the hands, feet, and nose, and intellectual disability.", "Possible Complications": "Arthritis, Carpal tunnel syndrome, Worsening range of movement in the spine, elbows, and hands. ", "Symptoms": ["Frequent middle ear infections", "Growth problems, short arms and legs", "Hearing problems", "Mental deficiency", "Unusual looking face"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can usually diagnose this condition with a physical exam.This may show:Advanced bone age, Bone deformities in hands and feet, Delays in growth, Problems with the skin, genitals, teeth, and skeleton, Short arms and legs with small hands and feet, Short head, measured front to back (brachycephaly), Short height, Small, upturned broad nose with flat bridge, Unusual features of the face (short nose, open mouth, jaw that sticks out), Unusual head, Wide-spaced eyes (hypertelorism), sometimes with extra skin fold at corner of eye. In the first months of life, x-rays may show spotty calcium deposits, called stippling, in bones (especially the nose). Infants may also have:Abnormally short fingers and toes (brachydactyly), Early growth of bones in the hands and feet, Short bones, Shortening of the forearm bones near the wrist. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the symptoms.Orthopedic care, early intervention, and special education are recommended.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be helpful. ", "Causes": "Most patients with acrodysostosis have no family history of the disease. However, sometimes the condition is passed down from parent to child. Parents with the condition have a 1 in 2 chance of passing the disorder to their children.There is a slightly greater risk with fathers who are older."}, "ACE inhibitors": {"description": "Angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitors are medicines. They treat heart, blood vessel, and kidney problems."}, "Agranulocytosis": {"description": "Agranulocytosis is a condition in which the bone marrow does not make enough of a certain type of mature white blood cells (neutrophils). Bone marrow is the soft tissue inside bones that helps form blood cells.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "A blood differential test will be done to measure the percentage of each type of white blood cell in your blood.", "Causes": "Agranulocytosis may be caused by:Autoimmune disorders, Bone marrow diseases, such as myelodysplasia or large granular lymphocyte (LGL) leukemia, Certain medicines used to treat diseases, Certain street drugs, Chemotherapy, Poor nutrition, Preparation for bone marrow transplant, Problem with genes. Agranulocytosis results in a person not having enough of a specific type of white blood cells, called neutrophils or granulocytes. A low neutrophil count (neutropenia) may also occur when white blood cells are destroyed faster than they can be produced.", "Prevention": "If you are having treatment or taking medicine that could cause agranulocytosis, your health care provider will use blood tests to monitor you.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of agranulocytosis. For example, if a medicine is the cause, stopping or changing to another drug may help. In other cases, medicines to help the body make more white blood cells will be used. "}, "Amylase - urine": {"description": "Amylase may also be measured with a blood test."}, "Abdominal aortic aneurysm": {"description": "The aorta is the main blood vessel that supplies blood to the abdomen, pelvis, and legs. An abdominal aortic aneurysm occurs when an area of the aorta becomes very large or balloons out. ", "Symptoms": ["Pain in the abdomen or back. The pain may be severe, sudden, persistent, or constant. It may spread to the groin, buttocks, or legs.", "Passing out", "Clammy skin", "Dizziness", "Nausea and vomiting", "Rapid heart rate", "Shock"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will examine your abdomen and feel the pulses in your legs. The doctor may find:A lump (mass) in the abdomen, Pulsating sensation in the abdomen, Stiff or rigid abdomen. You may have an abdominal aortic aneurysm that is not causing any symptoms. Your doctor may find this problem by doing the following tests:Ultrasound of the abdomen when the abdominal aneurysm is first suspected , CT scan of the abdomen to confirm the size of the aneurysm, CTA (computed tomographic angiogram) to help with surgical planning. Any one of these tests may be done when you're having symptoms.", "Causes": "The exact cause of the condition is unknown. Factors that can increase your risk of developing the problem include:Smoking, High blood pressure, Male gender, Genetic factors. An abdominal aortic aneurysm is most often seen in males over age 60 who have one or more risk factors. The larger the aneurysm, the more likely it is to break open. This can be life-threatening. ", "Prevention": "To reduce the risk of aneurysms:Eat a heart-healthy diet, exercise, stop smoking (if you smoke), and reduce stress., If you have high blood pressure or diabetes, take your medicines as your doctor has told you. . People over age 65 who have ever smoked should have a screening ultrasound done once. ", "Treatment": "If you have bleeding inside your body from an aortic aneurysm, you will need abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.If the aneurysm is small and there are no symptoms:Surgery is rarely done. , You and your doctor must decide if the risk of having surgery is smaller than the risk of bleeding if you do not have surgery., Your doctor may want to check the size of the aneurysm with ultrasound tests every 6 months.. Most of the time, surgery is done if the aneurysm is bigger than 2 inches (5.5 cm) across or growing quickly. The goal is to do surgery before complications develop.There are two types of surgery:Traditional (open) repair. A large cut is made in your abdomen. The abnormal vessel is replaced with a graft made of man-made material. , Endovascular stent grafting. This procedure can be done without making a large cut in your abdomen, so you may recover more quickly. This may be a safer approach if you have certain other medical problems. Endovascular repair can sometimes be done for a leaking or bleeding aneurysm.. "}, "Allergies": {"description": "An allergy is an immune response or reaction to substances that are usually not harmful.", "Possible Complications": "Anaphylaxis (life-threatening allergic reaction), Breathing problems and discomfort during the allergic reaction, Drowsiness and other side effects of medicines. ", "Symptoms": ["Allergens that you breathe in often cause a stuffy nose, itchy nose and throat, mucus, cough, and wheezing.", "Allergens that touch the eyes may cause itchy, watery, red, swollen eyes.", "Eating something you are allergic to can cause nausea, vomiting, abdominal pain, cramping, diarrhea, or a severe, life-threatening reaction.", "Allergens that touch the skin can cause a skin rash, hives, itching, blisters, or skin peeling.", "Drug allergies usually involve the whole body and can lead to a variety of symptoms. "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask questions, such as when the allergy occurs.Allergy testing may be needed to find out whether the symptoms are an actual allergy or are caused by other problems. For example, eating contaminated food (food poisoning) may cause symptoms similar to food allergies. Some medications (such as aspirin and ampicillin) can produce non-allergic reactions, including rashes. A runny nose or cough may actually be due to an infection.Skin testing is the most common method of allergy testing. One type of skin testing is the prick test. It involves placing a small amount of the suspected allergy-causing substances on the skin, and then slightly pricking the area so the substance moves under the skin. The skin is closely watched for signs of a reaction, which include swelling and redness. Other types of skin tests include patch testing and intradermal testing. Skin testing may be an option for some young children and infants.Blood tests that may be done include:Immunoglobulin E (IgE), which measures levels of allergy-related substances, Complete blood count (CBC) called the eosinophil white blood cell count. In some cases, the doctor may tell you to avoid certain items to see if you get better, or to use suspected items to see if you feel worse. This is called \"use or elimination testing.\" This is often used to check for food or medication allergies.The doctor may also check your reaction to physical triggers by applying heat, cold, or other stimulation to your body and watching for an allergic response.Sometimes, a suspected allergen is dissolved and dropped into the lower eyelid to check for an allergic reaction. This should only be done by a health care provider.", "Treatment": "Severe allergic reactions (anaphylaxis) need to be treated with a medicine called epinephrine. It can be life-saving when given right away. If you use epinephrine, call 911 and go straight to the hospital.The best way to reduce symptoms is to avoid what causes your allergies. This is especially important for food and drug allergies.There are several types of medications to prevent and treat allergies. Which medicine your doctor recommends depends on the type and severity of your symptoms, your age, and overall health.Illnesses that are caused by allergies (such as asthma, hay fever, and eczema) may need other treatments.Medications that can be used to treat allergies include:ANTIHISTAMINESAntihistamines are available over-the-counter and by prescription. They are available in many forms, including:Capsules and pills, Eye drops, Injection, Liquid, Nasal spray . CORTICOSTEROIDSThese are anti-inflammatory medications. They are available in many forms, including:Creams and ointment for the skin, Eye drops, Nasal spray, Lung inhaler . Persons with severe allergic symptoms may be prescribed corticosteroid pills or injections for short periods.DECONGESTANTSDecongestants help relieve a stuffy nose. Do not use decongestant nasal spray for more than several days because they can cause a rebound effect and make the congestion worse. Decongestants in pill form do not cause this problem. People with high blood pressure, heart problems, or prostate enlargement should use decongestants with caution.OTHER MEDICINESLeukotriene inhibitors are medicines that block the substances that trigger allergies. Person with asthma and indoor and outdoor allergies may be prescribed these medicines.ALLERGY SHOTSAllergy shots (immunotherapy) are sometimes recommended if you cannot avoid the allergen and your symptoms are hard to control. Allergy shots keep your body from over-reacting to the allergen. You will get regular injections of the allergen. Each dose is slightly larger than the last dose until a maximum dose is reached. These shots do not work for everybody and you will have to visit the doctor often.SUBLINGUAL IMMUNOTHERAPY TREATMENT (SLIT)Instead of shots, medicine put under the tongue may help for grass and ragweed allergies.", "Prevention": "Breastfeeding can help prevent\u00a0or decrease allergies when you feed babies this way only for 4 to 6 months. However, changing a mother's diet during pregnancy or while breastfeeding does not seem to help prevent allergies.For most children, changing the diet or using special formulas does not seem to prevent allergies. If a parent, brother, sister, or other family member has a history of eczema and allergies, discuss feeding with your child's doctor. There is also evidence that being exposed to certain allergens (such as dust mites and cat dander) in the first year of life may prevent some allergies. This is called the \"hygiene hypothesis.\" It came from the observation that infants on farms tend to have fewer allergies than those who grow up in more sterile environments. However, older children do not seem to benefit.Once allergies have developed, treating the allergies and carefully avoiding allergy triggers can prevent reactions in the future.", "Causes": "Allergies are very common. Both genes and environment play a role. If both your parents have allergies, there is a good chance that you have them, too.The immune system normally protects the body against harmful substances, such as bacteria and viruses. It also reacts to foreign substances called allergens. These are usually harmless and in most people do not cause a problem.In a person with allergies, the immune response is oversensitive. When it recognizes an allergen, the immune system launches a response. Chemicals such as histamines are released. These chemicals cause allergy symptoms.Watch this video about:AllergiesCommon allergens include:Drugs, Dust, Food, Insect venom, Mold, Pet and other animal dander, Pollen . Some people have allergy-like reactions to hot or cold temperatures, sunlight, or other environmental triggers. Sometimes, friction (rubbing or roughly stroking the skin) will cause symptoms.Allergies may make certain medical conditions, such as sinus problems, eczema, and asthma, worse."}, "Atrial fibrillation or flutter": {"description": "Atrial fibrillation or flutter is a common type of abnormal heartbeat. The heart rhythm is fast and irregular in this condition. ", "Symptoms": ["Pulse that feels rapid, racing, pounding, fluttering, irregular, or too slow", "Sensation of feeling the heart beat (palpitations)", "Confusion", "Dizziness, light-headedness", "Fainting", "Fatigue", "Loss of ability to exercise ", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may hear a fast heartbeat while listening to your heart with a stethoscope. Your pulse may feel fast, uneven, or both.The normal heart rate is 60 - 100. In atrial fibrillation/flutter the heart rate may be 100 - 175. Blood pressure may be normal or low.An ECG (a test that records the electrical activity of the heart) may show atrial fibrillation or atrial flutter.If your abnormal heart rhythm comes and goes, you may need to wear a special monitor to diagnose the problem. The monitor records the heart's rhythms over a period of time.Event monitor, Holter monitor (24-hour test), Implanted loop recorder, Extended monitoring. Tests to find heart disease may include:Echocardiogram (ultrasound imaging of the heart), Tests to examine the blood supply of the heart muscle, Tests to study the heart's electrical system. ", "Causes": "When working well, the four chambers of the heart contract (squeeze) in an organized way.The electrical signal that tells your heart to contract begins in an area called the sinoatrial node (also called the sinus node or SA node). These signals help your heart pump the right amount of blood for your body's needs.In atrial fibrillation, the electrical impulse of the heart is not regular. Parts of the heart cannot contract in an organized\u00a0pattern., As a result, the heart cannot pump enough blood to meet the body's needs. . In atrial flutter, the ventricles (lower heart chambers) may beat very rapidly, but in a regular pattern. These problems can affect both men and women. They become more common with increasing age.Common\u00a0causes of atrial fibrillation include:Alcohol use (especially binge drinking)\u00a0, Coronary artery disease, Heart attack or heart bypass surgery, Heart failure or an enlarged heart, Heart valve disease (most often the mitral valve), Hypertension, Medicines, Overactive thyroid gland (hyperthyroidism), Pericarditis, Sick sinus syndrome. ", "Prevention": "Talk to your health care provider about steps to treat conditions that cause atrial fibrillation/flutter. Avoid binge drinking.", "Treatment": "Cardioversion treatment is used to get the heart back into a normal rhythm right away. There are two options for treatment: Electric shocks to your heart, Drugs given through a vein . These treatments may be done as an emergency, or planned ahead of time.Daily medicines taken by mouth are used to:Slow the irregular heartbeat. These drugs may include beta-blockers, calcium channel blockers, and digoxin., Prevent atrial fibrillation from coming back. These drugs work well in many people, but they can have serious side effects. Atrial fibrillation returns in many people, even while they are\u00a0taking these medicines. . Blood thinners are medicines that are used to reduce the risk of developing a blood clot\u00a0that travels\u00a0in the body (such as a stroke). They include heparin, warfarin (Coumadin), apixaban (Eliquis), rivaroxaban (Xarelto), and dabigatran (Pradaxa).These drugs increase the chance of bleeding, so not everyone can use them. Antiplatelet drugs such as aspirin or clopidogrel may also be prescribed. Your doctor will consider your age and other medical problems when deciding which drugs are best.A procedure called radiofrequency ablation can be used to\u00a0scar areas in your heart where the heart rhythm problems are triggered. This can prevent the abnormal electrical signals that cause atrial fibrillation from moving through the heart. You may need a heart pacemaker after this procedure.All people with atrial fibrillation will need to learn how to manage this condition at home."}, "Arrhenoblastoma of ovary": {"description": "See also: Sertoli-Leydig cell tumor", "Possible Complications": "Complications of surgery , Masculine symptoms (virilization), Spread of the tumor if it is not completely removed. ", "Symptoms": ["Deepening of the voice", "Increased acne", "Increased hair on the face and body", "Increased size of the clitoris", "Male pattern baldness "], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests to check levels of hormones that may be released by the tumor, CT scan of the pelvis and abdomen to see if the tumor has spread, Ultrasound of the ovaries. ", "Treatment": "Surgery to remove the tumor is the main treatment. If the cancer has spread, chemotherapy or radiation therapy may be considered.", "Prevention": "There is no good screening test. Regular gynecologic exams and recognizing masculine symptoms may help detect the disease.", "Causes": "This is a rare tumor. It accounts for less than 0.5% of all ovarian tumors.These tumors are found in women of all age groups, but are most common in young women."}, "Ankle replacement": {"description": "Ankle replacement is surgery to replace the damaged bone and cartilage in the ankle joint. Artificial joint parts (prosthetics) are used to replace your own bones. There are different types of ankle replacement surgeries. "}, "Agammaglobulinemia": {"description": "Agammaglobulinemia is a disorder passed down through families in which a person has\u00a0very low levels of protective immune system proteins called immunoglobulins. Immunoglobulins are a type of antibody. Low levels of these antibodies make you more likely to get infections. ", "Possible Complications": "Arthritis, Chronic sinus or pulmonary disease, Eczema, Intestinal malabsorption syndromes. ", "Symptoms": ["Bronchitis", "Chronic diarrhea", "Conjunctivitis (eye infection)", "Otitis media (middle ear infection)", "Pneumonia", "Sinusitis", "Skin infections", "Upper respiratory tract infections", "Bronchiectasis (a disease in which the small air sacs in the lungs become damaged and enlarged)", "Unexplained asthma"], "Exams and Tests": "The disorder is confirmed by blood tests that measure levels of immunoglobulins.Tests include:Flow cytometry to measure circulating B lymphocytes, Immunoelectrophoresis - serum, Quantitative immunoglobulins - IgG, IgA, IgM (usually measured by nephelometry) . ", "Treatment": "Treatment involves taking steps to reduce the number and severity of infections. You will receive immunoglobulins through a vein (IVIG) or subcutaneously (SCIG), which boosts your immune system.Antibiotics are often needed to treat bacterial infections.Genetic counseling may be helpful. ", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling should be offered to prospective parents with a family history of agammaglobulinemia or other immunodeficiency disorders.", "Causes": "This is a rare disorder that mainly affects males. It is caused by a gene defect that blocks the growth of normal, mature immune cells called B lymphocytes.As a result, the body makes very little (if any) immunoglobulins. Immunoglobulins play a major role in the immune response, which protects against illness and infection.Persons with agammaglobulinemia develop infections again and again. Common infections include ones that are due to bacteria such as Haemophilus influenzae, pneumococci (Streptococcus pneumoniae), and staphylococci. Common sites of infection include:Gastrointestinal tract, Joints, Lungs, Skin, Upper respiratory tract . Agammaglobulinemia is inherited, which means other people in your family may have the condition."}, "Antisocial personality disorder": {"description": "Antisocial personality disorder is a mental health condition in which a person has a long-term pattern of manipulating, exploiting, or violating the rights of others. This behavior is often criminal.", "Possible Complications": "Complications can include imprisonment, drug abuse, violence, and suicide.", "Symptoms": ["Be able to act witty and charming", "Be good at flattery and manipulating other people's emotions", "Break the law repeatedly", "Disregard the safety of self and others", "Have problems with substance abuse", "Lie, steal, and fight often", "Not show guilt or remorse", "Often be angry or arrogant"], "Exams and Tests": "Antisocial personality disorder is diagnosed based on a psychological evaluation\u00a0that assesses\u00a0the history and severity of symptoms. To be diagnosed with antisocial personality disorder, a person must have had conduct disorder during childhood.", "Treatment": "Antisocial personality disorder is one of the most difficult personality disorders to treat. People with this condition rarely seek treatment on their own. They may only start therapy when required to by a court.Behavioral treatments, such as those that reward appropriate behavior and have negative consequences for illegal behavior, may hold the most promise. Certain forms of talk therapy are also being explored.Persons with antisocial personality who have other disorders, such as a mood or substance disorder, are often treated for those problems as well.", "Causes": "Cause of antisocial personality disorder\u00a0is unknown. Genetic factors and environmental factors, such as child abuse, are believed to contribute to the development of this condition. People with an antisocial or alcoholic parent are at increased risk. Far more men than women are affected. The condition is common\u00a0among people who are in prison.Fire-setting and cruelty to animals during childhood are linked to the development of antisocial personality.Some\u00a0doctors believe that psychopathic personality (psychopathy) is the same disorder. Others believe that psychopathic personality is a similar but more severe disorder."}, "Anastomosis": {"description": "For example, when part of an intestine is surgically removed, the two remaining ends are sewn or stapled together (anastomosed). The procedure is known as an intestinal anastomosis."}, "ALT": {"description": "This article discusses the test to measure the amount of ALT in the blood."}, "Antifreeze poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Airways and lungs \r\n\r\nRapid breathing, No breathing. ", "Rapid breathing", "No breathing", "Bladder and kidneys \r\n\r\nBlood in urine, No urine output or decreased urine output. ", "Blood in urine", "No urine output or decreased urine output", "Eyes, ears, nose, and throat \r\n\r\nBlurred vision, Blindness. ", "Blurred vision", "Blindness", "Heart and blood \r\n\r\nChange in body's acid-base balance, which can lead to organ failure, Rapid heartbeat, Low blood pressure. ", "Change in body's acid-base balance, which can lead to organ failure", "Rapid heartbeat", "Low blood pressure", "Muscles and joints \r\n\r\nLeg cramps. ", "Leg cramps", "Nervous system \r\n\r\nComa, Convulsions, Dizziness, Fatigue, Headache, Slurred speech, Stupor (lack of alertness), Unconsciousness, Unsteady walk, Weakness. ", "Coma", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Slurred speech", "Stupor (lack of alertness)", "Unconsciousness", "Unsteady walk", "Weakness", "Skin \r\n\r\nBlue lips and fingernails. ", "Blue lips and fingernails", "Stomach and gastrointestinal tract \r\n\r\nNausea , Vomiting. ", "Nausea ", "Vomiting"], "description": "See also: Ethylene glycol poisoning"}, "Aging changes in the breast": {"description": "\r\nLumps are common around the time of menopause. These are often noncancerous cysts. However, if you notice a lump, make an appointment with your health care provider because breast cancer risk increases with age. Women should be aware of the benefits and limitations of breast self-exams. These exams do not always pick up early stages of breast cancer. Women should talk to their health care providers about mammograms."}, "Apraxia": {"description": "Apraxia is a disorder of the brain and nervous system in which a person is unable to perform tasks or movements when asked, even though:", "Possible Complications": "Learning problems, Low self-esteem, Social problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Distorted, repeated, or left out speech sounds or words. The person has difficulty putting words together in the correct order.", "Struggling to pronounce the right word", "More difficulty using longer words, either all the time, or sometimes", "Ability to use short, everyday phrases or sayings (such as \"How are you?\") without a problem", "Better writing ability than speaking ability", "Buccofacial or orofacial apraxia: Inability to carry out movements of the face on demand, such as licking the lips, sticking out the tongue, or whistling.", "Ideational apraxia: Inability to carry out learned, complex tasks in the proper order, such as putting on socks before putting on shoes.", "Ideomotor apraxia Inability to voluntarily perform a learned task when given the necessary objects. For instance, if given a screwdriver, the person may try to write with it as if it were a pen.", "Limb-kinetic apraxia: Difficulty making precise movements with an arm or leg. It becomes impossible to button a shirt or tie a shoe. "], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may be performed if the cause of the disorder is not known:CT or MRI scans of the brain may help show a tumor, stroke, or other brain injury., An electroencephalogram (EEG) may be used to rule out epilepsy as a cause of the apraxia., A spinal tap may be done to check for inflammation or an infection that affects the brain. . Standardized language and intellectual tests should be done if apraxia of speech is suspected. Testing for other learning disabilities may also be needed.", "Treatment": "People with apraxia may benefit from treatment by a health care team. The team should also include family members.Occupational and speech therapists may help both patients and their caregivers learn ways to deal with the apraxia. Because patients with apraxia have trouble following instructions, therapists who are experienced in treating this disorder may have better results. Speech and language treatment may include:Repeating sounds over and over to teach mouth movements, Slowing down the person's speech, Teaching different techniques to help with communication . Recognition and treatment of depression is important for people with severe speech and language disorders.Other tips:Maintain a relaxed, calm environment., Take time to show someone with apraxia how to do a task, and allow enough time for them to do so. Do not ask them to repeat the task if they are clearly struggling with it and doing so will increase frustration., Suggest alternative ways to do the same things. For example, try a hook and loop closure instead of laces for shoes. . When speech apraxia is present:Avoid giving complex directions., Use simple phrases to avoid misunderstandings., Speak in a normal tone of voice. Speech apraxia is not a hearing problem., Do not assume that the person understands., Provide communication aids, if possible, depending on the person and condition. . ", "Prevention": "Reducing your risk of stroke and brain injury may help prevent conditions that lead to aphasia.", "Causes": "Apraxia is caused by damage to the brain. When apraxia develops in a person who was previously able to perform the tasks or abilities, it is called acquired apraxia.The most common causes of acquired apraxia are:Brain tumor, Condition that causes gradual worsening of the brain and nervous system (neurodegenerative illness), Dementia, Stroke, Traumatic brain injury. Apraxia may also be seen at birth. Symptoms appear as the child grows and develops. The cause is unknown.Apraxia of speech is often present along with another speech disorder called aphasia. Depending on the cause of apraxia, a number of other brain or nervous system problems may be present."}, "Age-related hearing loss": {"description": "Age-related hearing loss, or presbycusis, is the slow loss of hearing that occurs as people get older.", "Possible Complications": "Hearing loss can result in both physical (not hearing a fire alarm) and psychological (social isolation) problems.The hearing loss may lead to deafness. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty hearing people around you", "Frequently asking people to repeat themselves", "Frustration at not being able to hear", "Certain sounds seeming overly loud", "Problems\u00a0hearing in noisy areas", "Problems telling apart certain\u00a0sounds such as \"s\" or \"th\" ", "More difficulty understanding people with higher-pitched voices", "Ringing in the ears"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will do a\u00a0complete physical exam. This helps find if\u00a0a medical\u00a0problem is\u00a0causing your\u00a0hearing loss. Your\u00a0health care provider will use an instrument called an otoscope to look in your ears. Sometimes, earwax can block the ear canals and cause hearing loss.You may be sent to an ear, nose, and throat doctor and a hearing specialist (audiologist). Hearing tests can help determine the extent of hearing loss.", "Treatment": "There is no cure for age-related hearing loss. Treatment is focused on improving your everyday function. The following may be helpful:Hearing aids, Telephone amplifiers and other assistive devices, Sign language (for those with severe hearing loss), Speech reading (such as lip reading and using visual cues to aid communication), A cochlear implant may be recommended for\u00a0persons with severe hearing loss. Surgery is done to place the implant. The implant allows the person to detect sounds again and with practice can allow the person to understand speech.\u00a0But it\u00a0does not restore normal hearing.. ", "Causes": "Tiny hair cells\u00a0inside your inner\u00a0ear help you hear. They pick up sound waves and change them into the nerve signals that the brain interprets as sound. Hearing loss occurs when the tiny hair cells are damaged or die. The hair cells do not regrow, so most hearing loss caused by hair cell damage is permanent.There is no known single cause\u00a0of age-related hearing loss. Most commonly, it is caused by changes in the inner ear that occur as you grow older. Your genes and loud noise (such as from rock concerts or music headphones) may play a large role.The following factors contribute to age-related hearing loss:Family history (age-related hearing loss tends to run in families), Repeated exposure to loud noises, Smoking (smokers are more likely to have such hearing loss than nonsmokers), Certain medical conditions such as diabetes\u00a0, Certain medicines. "}, "Atypical pneumonia": {"description": "With\u00a0atypical pneumonia, the infection is\u00a0caused by different bacteria than the ones that cause typical pneumonia. These include Legionella pneumophila, Mycoplasma pneumoniae, and Chlamydophila pneumoniae. Atypical pneumonia also tends to have milder symptoms than typical pneumonia. ", "Possible Complications": "Brain and nervous system infections, such as meningitis, myelitis, and encephalitis, Hemolytic anemia, a condition in which there are not enough red blood cells in the blood because the body is destroying them, Severe lung damage. ", "Symptoms": ["Pneumonia due to Legionella pneumophila gets worse during the first 4\u00a0to 6 days, and then improves over 4\u00a0to 5 days.", "Even though symptoms will improve, it may take a while for them to go away completely.", "Chills", "Cough (with Legionella pneumonia, you may cough up bloody mucus)", "Fever, which may be mild or high", "Shortness of breath (may only occur when you exert yourself) ", "Chest pain that gets worse when you breathe deeply or cough", "Confusion, especially in older people or those with Legionella pneumonia", "Headache", "Loss of appetite, low energy, and fatigue", "Muscle aches and joint stiffness", "Sweating and clammy skin", "Diarrhea (especially with Legionella pneumonia)", "Ear pain (with mycoplasma pneumonia)", "Eye pain or soreness (with mycoplasma pneumonia)", "Neck lump (with mycoplasma pneumonia)", "Rash (with mycoplasma pneumonia)", "Sore throat (with mycoplasma pneumonia) "], "Exams and Tests": "People with suspected pneumonia should have a complete medical evaluation. It may be hard for your health care provider to tell whether you have pneumonia or bronchitis, so you may need a chest x-ray. Depending on\u00a0how severe\u00a0the illness is, other tests may be done, including:Arterial blood test, Complete blood count (CBC), Blood cultures, Blood tests to identify the specific bacteria, Bronchoscopy (rarely needed), CT scan of the chest, Open lung biopsy (only done in very serious illnesses when the diagnosis cannot be made from other sources), Sputum culture, Urine test to check for Legionella bacteria\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 . Urine tests or a throat swab may also be done.", "Treatment": "To feel better, you can take these\u00a0self-care measures\u00a0at home:Control your fever with aspirin, nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs, such as ibuprofen or naproxen), or acetaminophen. DO NOT give aspirin to children., Do not take cough medicines without first talking to your doctor. Cough medicines may make it harder for your body to cough up the extra sputum., Drink plenty of fluids to help loosen secretions and bring up phlegm., Get a lot of rest. Have someone else do household chores.. Antibiotics are used to treat atypical pneumonia.You may be able to take antibiotics by mouth at home., If your condition is severe, you will likely be admitted to a hospital. There, you will be given antibiotics through a vein (intravenously), as well as oxygen., Antibiotics are used for 2 weeks or more. ", "Prevention": "Wash your hands often and have other people around you do the same.If your immune system is weak, stay away from crowds. Ask visitors who have a cold to wear a mask.Don't smoke. If you do, get help to quit.Get a flu shot every year. Ask your doctor if you need a pneumonia vaccine.", "Causes": "Mycoplasma pneumonia is a type of atypical pneumonia. It is caused by the bacteria M. pneumoniae. It\u00a0often affects people younger than age 40. Pneumonia due to chlamydia bacteria occurs year round. It is usually mild.Pneumonia due to Legionella is seen more often in middle-aged and older adults, smokers, and those with chronic illnesses or a weak immune system. It can be more severe. This type of pneumonia is also called Legionnaire disease. "}, "Acute myeloid leukemia": {"description": "Acute means the disease develops quickly and usually has an aggressive course.", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding from the nose", "Bleeding gums", "Bruising", "Bone pain or tenderness", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Heavy menstrual periods", "Pallor", "Shortness of breath (gets worse with exercise)", "Skin rash or lesion", "Swollen gums (rare)", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. There may be signs of a swollen spleen, liver, or lymph nodes.A complete blood count (CBC) may show anemia and a low number of platelets. A white blood cell count (WBC) can be high, low, or normal.Bone marrow aspiration and biopsy will show if there are any leukemia cells.If your doctor learns you do have this type of leukemia, further tests will be done to determine the specific type of AML. Subtypes are based on specific genetic changes or mutations and how the leukemia cells appear under the microscope. ", "Causes": "Acute myeloid leukemia (AML) is one of the most common types of leukemia among adults. This type of cancer is rare under age 40. AML is more common in men than women.Persons with this type of cancer have an abundance of abnormal immature cells inside their bone marrow. The cells grow very quickly, and replace healthy blood cells. The bone marrow, which helps the body fight infections and makes other blood components, eventually stops working correctly. Persons with AML are more likely to have infections and have an increased risk of bleeding as the numbers of healthy blood cells decrease.Most of the time, a doctor cannot tell you what caused AML. However, the following things\u00a0can lead to some types of leukemia, including AML:\r\n  Blood disorders, including polycythemia vera, thrombocythemia, and myelodysplasia\r\n  , \r\n  Certain chemicals (for example, benzene)\r\n  , \r\n  Certain chemotherapy drugs, including etoposide and drugs known as alkylating agents\r\n  , \r\n  Exposure to certain chemicals and harmful substances\r\n  , \r\n  Radiation\r\n  , \r\n  Weakened immune system due to an organ transplant\r\n  . Problems with your genes may also play a role in the development of AML.\r\n\u00a0", "Prevention": "If you work around radiation or chemicals linked to leukemia, you should always wear protective gear.", "Treatment": "Treatment involves using medicines (chemotherapy) to kill the cancer cells. Most types of AML are treated the same way in the beginning, with more than one chemotherapy drug.Chemotherapy kills normal cells, too. This may cause side effects such as:Increased risk of bleeding, Increased risk of infection (your doctor may want to keep you away from other people to prevent infection), Weight loss (you will need to eat extra calories), Mouth sores. Other supportive treatments for AML may include:Antibiotics to treat infection, Red blood cell transfusions to fight anemia, Transfusions of platelets to control bleeding . A bone marrow (stem cell) transplant will likely be done after your first or second round of chemotherapy. This decision is determined by several factors, including: Your age and overall health, How high your white blood cell count was, Certain genetic changes in the leukemia cells, The availability of donors. "}, "Aldolase blood test": {"description": "A test can be done to measure the amount of aldolase in your blood."}, "Achondrogenesis": {"description": "Achondrogenesis is a rare type of growth hormone deficiency in which there is a defect in the development of bone and cartilage.", "Possible Complications": "This condition is often fatal early in life.", "Symptoms": ["Very short trunk, arms, legs, and neck", "Head appears large in relation to the trunk", "Small lower jaw", "Narrow chest "], "Exams and Tests": "X-rays show bone problems associated with the condition.", "Treatment": "There is no current therapy. Talk to your doctor about care decisions.Genetic counseling may be appropriate.", "Causes": "Achondrogenesis is inherited, which means it is passed down through families.Some types are known to be recessive, meaning both parents carry the defective gene and the chance for a subsequent child to be affected is about 25%."}, "Abdominal aortic aneurysm repair - open": {"description": "An aortic aneurysm is when part of this artery becomes too large or balloons outward."}, "Aging changes in body shape": {"description": "Your lifestyle choices affect how quickly the aging process takes place. Some things you can do to reduce age-related body changes are:"}, "Anti-rust product poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the\u00a0throat (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure", "Methemoglobinemia (very dark blood from abnormal red blood cells)", "Too much or too little acid in the blood, which leads to damage in all of the body organs", "Kidney failure", "Breathing difficulty", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Burns", "Irritation", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Anti-DNase B": {"description": "Anti-DNase B is a blood test to look for antibodies to a substance produced by Group A Streptococcus, the bacterium that causes strep throat."}, "Amputation - traumatic": {"Symptoms": ["A body part that has been completely or partially cut off", "Bleeding (may be minimal or severe, depending on the location and nature of the injury)", "Pain (the degree of pain is not always related to the severity of the injury or the amount of bleeding)", "Crushed body tissue (badly mangled, but still partially attached by muscle, bone, tendon, or skin)"], "Prevention": "Use safety equipment when using factory, farm, or power tools. Wear seat belts when driving a motor vehicle. Always use good judgment and observe appropriate safety precautions.", "description": "Traumatic amputation is the loss of a body part -- usually a finger, toe, arm, or leg -- that occurs as the result of an accident or injury.", "Causes": "Traumatic amputations usually result from factory, farm, power tool accidents, or from motor vehicle accidents. Natural disasters, war, and terrorist attacks can also cause traumatic amputations."}, "Aminoaciduria": {"description": "Aminoaciduria is an abnormal amount of amino acids in the urine. Amino acids are the building blocks for proteins in the body."}, "Aging changes in the kidneys and bladder": {"description": "As You Grow Older, You Will Have Other Changes, Including:"}, "Autoimmune liver disease panel": {"description": "The panel may also include other tests. Often, immune protein levels in the blood are also checked. "}, "Arrhythmias": {"description": "An arrhythmia is a disorder of the heart rate (pulse) or heart rhythm. The heart can beat too fast (tachycardia), too slow (bradycardia), or irregularly.", "Symptoms": ["Too slow (bradycardia)", "Too quick (tachycardia)", "Irregular, uneven, or skipping beats", "Chest pain", "Fainting", "Light-headedness, dizziness", "Paleness", "Shortness of breath", "Sweating"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will listen to your heart with a stethoscope and feel your pulse. Your blood pressure may be low or normal.Heart monitoring devices are often used to identify the rhythm problem, such as a: Holter monitor (used for 24 hours), Event monitor or loop recorder (worn for 2 weeks or longer). Other tests may be done to look at heart function:Coronary angiography, ECG (electrocardiogram)\r\n  , Echocardiogram. \r\nA special test, called an electrophysiology study (EPS), is done to take a closer look at the heart's electrical system.", "Causes": "Normally, your heart works as a pump that brings blood to the lungs and the rest of the body.To help this happen, your heart has an electrical system that makes sure it contracts (squeezes) in an orderly way.The electrical impulse that signals your heart to contract begins in the sinoatrial node (also called the sinus node or SA node). This is your heart's natural pacemaker., The signal leaves the SA node and travels through the heart along a set electrical pathway., Different nerve messages signal your heart to beat slower or faster. . Arrhythmias are caused by problems with the heart's electrical conduction system. Abnormal (extra) signals may occur., Electrical signals may be blocked or slowed., Electrical signals travel in new or different pathways through the heart. . Some common causes of abnormal heartbeats are:Abnormal levels of potassium or other substances in the body, Heart attack, or a damaged heart muscle from a past heart attack, Heart disease that is present at birth (congenital), Heart failure or an enlarged heart, Overactive thyroid gland . Watch this video about:ArrhythmiasArrhythmias may also be caused by some substances or drugs, including:Alcohol, caffeine, or stimulant drugs , Heart or blood pressure medicines, Cigarette smoking (nicotine), Drugs that mimic the activity of your nervous system, Medicines used for depression or psychosis . Sometimes medicines used to treat one type of arrhythmia will cause another type of abnormal heart rhythm. Some of the more common abnormal heart rhythms are:Atrial fibrillation or flutter, Atrioventricular nodal reentry tachycardia (AVNRT), Heart block or atrioventricular block, Multifocal atrial tachycardia, Paroxysmal supraventricular tachycardia, Sick sinus syndrome, Ventricular fibrillation or ventricular tachycardia, Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome. ", "Prevention": "Taking steps to prevent coronary artery disease may reduce your chance of developing an arrhythmia.", "Treatment": "When an arrhythmia is serious, you may need urgent treatment to restore a normal rhythm. This may include:Electrical \"shock\" therapy (defibrillation or cardioversion), Implanting a short-term heart pacemaker, Medicines given through a vein (intravenous) or by mouth . Sometimes, better treatment for your angina or heart failure will lower your chance of having an arrhythmia.Medicines called anti-arrhythmic drugs may be used: To prevent an arrhythmia from happening again, To keep your heart rate from becoming too fast or too slow . Some of these medicines can have side effects. Take them as prescribed by your health care provider. Do not stop taking the medicine or change the dose without first talking to your health care provider.Other treatments to prevent or treat abnormal heart rhythms include:Cardiac ablation, used to destroy areas in your heart that may be causing your heart rhythm problems, An implantable cardiac defibrillator, placed in people who are at high risk of sudden cardiac death, Pacemaker, a device that senses when your heart is beating irregularly, too slowly, or too fast. It sends a signal to your heart that makes your heart beat at the correct pace. . "}, "Anti-reflux surgery - discharge ": {"description": "Your surgery was done by making a large incision in your upper belly (open surgery) or with a laparoscope (a thin tube with a tiny camera on the end)."}, "Anterior cruciate ligament (ACL) injury": {"Symptoms": ["A \"popping\" sound at the time of injury", "Knee swelling within 6 hours of injury", "Pain, especially when you try to put weight on the injured leg"], "Prevention": "Use proper techniques when playing sports or exercising. Some college sports programs teach athletes how to reduce stress placed on the ACL.The use of knee braces during aggressive athletic activity (such as football) is controversial, and has not been shown to reduce the number of knee injuries.", "description": "An anterior cruciate ligament injury is the over-stretching or tearing of the anterior cruciate ligament (ACL) in the knee. A tear may be partial or complete.", "Causes": "An ACL injury can occur if you:Get hit very hard on the side of your knee, such as during a football tackle, Overextend the knee joint, Quickly stop moving and change direction while running, landing from a jump, or turning. Basketball, football, soccer, and skiing are common sports linked to ACL tears.ACL injuries often occur with other injuries. For example, an ACL tear commonly occurs along with tears to the MCL and the shock-absorbing cartilage in the knee (lateral meniscus).Most ACL tears are seen in the middle of the ligament, or the ligament is pulled off the thigh bone. These injuries form a gap between the torn edges, and do not heal on their own."}, "Appropriate for gestational age (AGA)": {"description": "Appropriate for gestational age (AGA) describes a fetus or newborn infant whose size is within the normal range for his or her gestational age."}, "Athlete's foot": {"Symptoms": ["Red and itchy skin", "Burning or stinging pain", "Blisters that ooze or get crusty"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can diagnose Athlete's foot simply by looking at your skin. If tests are needed, they may include:A simple office test called a KOH exam, Skin culture. ", "description": "Athlete's foot is an infection of the feet caused by fungus. The medical term is tinea pedis, or ringworm of the foot. ", "Causes": "Athlete's foot occurs when a certain fungus grows on\u00a0the skin\u00a0of your feet.\u00a0The same fungus\u00a0may also grow on the heels, palms, and between the fingers.Athlete's foot is the most common type of tinea fungal infection. The fungus thrives in warm, moist areas. Your risk for getting athlete's foot increases if you:Wear closed shoes, especially if they are plastic-lined, Keep your feet wet for long periods, Sweat a lot, Develop a minor skin or nail injury. Athlete's foot is easily spread.\u00a0It can be passed through direct contact or contact with items such as shoes, stockings, and shower or pool surfaces.", "Treatment": "Over-the-counter antifungal powders or creams can help control the infection: These contain medicine such as miconazole, clotrimazole,\u00a0terbinafine or tolnaftate. , Keep using the medicine for 1\u00a0to\u00a02 weeks after the infection has cleared to prevent it from returning.. In addition:Keep your feet clean and dry, especially between your toes., Wash your feet thoroughly with soap and water and dry the area carefully and completely. Try to do this at least twice a day., To widen and keep the web space (area between the toes) dry, use lamb's wool. This can be bought at a drugstore., Wear clean cotton socks. Change your socks and shoes as often as needed to keep your feet dry., Wear sandals or flip-flops at a public shower or pool., Use antifungal or drying powders to prevent athlete's foot if you tend to get it often, or you frequent places where athlete's foot fungus is common (like public showers)., Wear shoes that are well-ventilated and made of natural material such as leather. It may help to alternate shoes each day, so they can completely dry between wearings. Do not wear plastic-lined shoes.. If athlete's foot does not get better in 2 to 4 weeks with self-care, or frequently returns, see your health care provider.\u00a0Your provider may prescribe:Medicines to take by mouth, Antibiotics to treat bacterial infections that occur\u00a0from scratching. "}, "Adrenalectomy": {"description": "Adrenalectomy is an operation in which one or both adrenal glands are removed. The adrenal glands are part of the endocrine system and are located just above the kidneys."}, "Aging changes in the nervous system": {"description": "As You Grow Older, You Will Have Other Changes, Including:"}, "Aortic valve surgery - open": {"description": "The aortic valve can also be replaced using minimally invasive aortic valve surgery. This is done using several small cuts."}, "Anaerobic bacteria": {"description": "In humans, these bacteria are most commonly found in the gastrointestinal tract. They play a role in conditions such as appendicitis, diverticulitis, and perforation of the bowel."}, "Aerobic bacteria": {"description": "Aerobic bacteria are bacteria that can grow and live in the presence of oxygen."}, "Abdominal x-ray": {"description": "When the test is done to look at the bladder and kidney structures, it is\u00a0called a KUB (kidneys, ureters, bladder) x-ray."}, "Atrial myxoma": {"description": "An atrial myxoma is a noncancerous tumor in the upper left or right side of the heart. It most often grows on the wall that separates the two sides of the heart. This wall is called the atrial septum. ", "Possible Complications": "Arrhythmias, Pulmonary edema, Peripheral emboli, Spread (metastasis) of the tumor, Blockage of the mitral heart valve. ", "Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty when lying flat", "Breathing difficulty when asleep", "Chest pain or tightness", "Dizziness", "Fainting", "Sensation of feeling your heart beat (palpitations)", "Shortness of breath with activity ", "Blueness of skin, especially on the fingers (Raynaud's phenomenon)", "Cough", "Curvature of nails accompanied\u00a0by soft tissue swelling (clubbing) of the fingers", "Fever", "Fingers that change color upon pressure or with cold or stress", "General discomfort (malaise)", "Joint pain", "Swelling\u00a0in any part of the body", "Weight loss without trying "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam and listen to your heart through a stethoscope. Abnormal heart sounds or a murmur may be heard. These sounds may change when you change body position.Imaging tests may include:Chest x-ray, CT scan of chest, ECG, Echocardiogram, Doppler study, Heart MRI, Left heart angiography, Right heart angiography. You may also need blood tests including:Complete blood count (CBC) - may show anemia and increased white blood cells, Erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR) - may be increased . ", "Treatment": "Surgery is needed to remove the tumor. Some people will also need the mitral valve replaced. This can be done during the same surgery.Myxomas may come back if surgery does not remove all of the tumor cells.", "Causes": "A myxoma is a primary heart (cardiac) tumor. This means that the tumor started within the heart. Most heart tumors start somewhere else.Primary cardiac tumors are rare. Myxomas are the most common type of these rare tumors. About 75% of myxomas occur in the left atrium of the heart. They most often begin in the wall that divides the two upper chambers of the heart. The rest are in the right atrium. Right atrial myxomas are sometimes linked with tricuspid stenosis and atrial fibrillation.Myxomas are more common in women. About 1 in 10 myxomas are passed down through families (inherited). These tumors are called familial myxomas. They tend to occur in more than one part of the heart at a time, and often cause symptoms at a younger age."}, "Aspirin and heart disease": {"description": "You will\u00a0most likely\u00a0take aspirin as a pill. Talk to your\u00a0health care provider\u00a0before taking aspirin every day. Your\u00a0provider may change your dose from time to time."}, "AIDS - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on AIDS:"}, "Aflatoxin": {"description": "Aflatoxins are toxins produced by a mold that grows in nuts, seeds, and legumes."}, "Atopic dermatitis": {"description": "Other forms of eczema include:", "Possible Complications": "Infections of the skin caused by bacteria, fungi, or viruses, Permanent scars, Side effects from long-term\u00a0use of medicines to control eczema. ", "Symptoms": ["Blisters with oozing and crusting", "Dry skin all over the body or areas of bumpy skin on the back of the arms and front of the thighs", "Ear discharge or bleeding", "Raw areas of the skin from scratching", "Skin coloring changes, such as\u00a0more or less color than the normal skin tone ", "Skin redness or inflammation around the blisters", "Thickened or leather-like areas (called lichenification), which can occur after long-term irritation and scratching", "In children younger than age 2, skin lesions begin on the face, scalp, hands, and feet. The rash is\u00a0often itchy and bubble, ooze, or form crusts.", "In older children and adults, the rash is more often\u00a0seen on the inside of the knees and elbow. It can also appear on the neck, hands, and feet.", "Rashes may occur anywhere on the body during a bad outbreak."], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will give you an exam and look at your skin. A physical exam will be done. You may need a\u00a0skin\u00a0biopsy\u00a0 to confirm the diagnosis or rule out other causes of dry, itchy skin.Diagnosis is based on the:How the skin looks, Personal and family history. Allergy skin testing may be helpful for people with:Hard-to-treat atopic dermatitis, Other allergy symptoms, Skin rashes that form only on certain areas of the body\u00a0after exposure\u00a0to a specific chemical. ", "Treatment": "SKIN CARE AT HOMEDaily skin care make cut down on the\u00a0need for medicines.Avoid scratching the rash or skin:Use a moisturizer, topical steroid cream, or other medicine your doctor prescribes., Take\u00a0antihistamine medicines by mouth\u00a0to reduce severe itching., Keep\u00a0 fingernails cut short.\u00a0Wear\u00a0light gloves during sleep if nighttime scratching is a problem.. Keep the skin moist (called lubricating or moisturizing the skin). Use ointments (such as petroleum jelly), creams, or lotions 2 - 3 times a day. Choose skin products that are\u00a0free of alcohol, scents, dyes,\u00a0and other chemicals. A humidifier to keep home air moist\u00a0will also help.Avoid\u00a0things that make\u00a0your symptoms worse, such as:Foods\u00a0that may cause an allergic reaction such as eggs in a very young child (always talk to your doctor first), Irritants such as wool and lanolin, Strong soaps or detergents, as well as chemicals and solvents, Sudden changes in body temperature and stress, which may cause sweating , Triggers that cause allergy symptoms. When washing or bathing:Expose your skin to water for as short a time as possible. Short, cooler baths are better then long, hot baths. , Use gentle body washes and cleansers instead of regular soaps. , Do not scrub or dry the skin too hard or for too long., Apply lubricating creams, lotions, or ointment\u00a0to the skin after bathing while it is damp. This will help trap moisture in the skin.. MEDICATIONSAt this time, allergy shots are not used to treat atopic dermatitis.\u00a0\u00a0Antihistamines taken by mouth may help with itching or\u00a0allergies. You can often buy these medicines without a prescription. Most causes of atopic\u00a0dermatitis are treated with medicines placed directly on the skin or scalp (called topical medicines):You will probably be prescribed a mild cortisone (or steroid) cream or ointment at first. You may need a stronger medicine if this doesn't work.\u00a0, Medicines called topical immunomodulators (TIMs) may be prescribed for anyone over 2 years old. TIMs include tacrolimus (protopic) and pimecrolimus (Elidel). Ask your doctor about concerns over a possible cancer risk with the use of these medicines., Creams or ointments that contain coal tar or anthralin may be used for thickened areas., Barrier repair creams containing ceramides may be used.. Wet-wrap treatment with topical corticosteroids may help control the condition but may lead to an infection. Other\u00a0treatments that may be used include:Antibiotic creams or pills if the skin is infected, Drugs that suppress the immune system, such as cyclosporine, methotrexate, or mycophenolate mofetil, Phototherapy, a medical treatment in which your skin is carefully exposed to ultraviolet (UV) light, Short-term use of systemic steroids. ", "Prevention": "Children who are breast-fed until age 4 months\u00a0are less likely to get atopic dermatitis.If a child is not breast-fed, using a formula that contains processed cow milk protein (called partially hydrolyzed formula) may cut down on\u00a0the chances of developing atopic dermatitis.", "Causes": "Atopic\u00a0dermatitis is due to a skin\u00a0reaction (similar to an allergy) in the skin. The reaction leads to ongoing swelling and redness. People with atopic dermititis may be more sensitive because their skin lacks certain proteins.Atopic dermatitis\u00a0is most common in infants. It may start as early as age 2 to 6 months. Many people outgrow it by early adulthood. People with\u00a0atopic dermatitis\u00a0often have asthma or seasonal allergies.\u00a0There is often a family history of allergies\u00a0such as asthma, hay fever, or eczema. People with atopic dermatitis often\u00a0test positive to\u00a0allergy skin tests.However, atopic dermatitis is not caused by allergies. The following can make\u00a0atopic dermatitis\u00a0symptoms worse:Allergies to pollen, mold, dust mites, or animals, Cold and dry air in the winter, Colds or the flu, Contact with irritants and chemicals, Contact with rough materials, such as wool, Dry skin, Emotional stress , Drying out of the skin from\u00a0taking too many\u00a0baths or showers and swimming too often, Getting too hot or too cold, as well as sudden changes of temperature, Perfumes or dyes added to skin lotions or soaps. "}, "Alertness - decreased": {"description": "See also:", "Causes": "Many conditions can cause decreased alertness, including:Chronic kidney disease, Extreme tiredness or lack of sleep, High blood sugar level or low blood sugar\u00a0level, High or low blood sodium (body chemical, or electrolyte) concentration\u00a0\r\n  , Infection that is severe or involves the brain, Liver failure, Thyroid conditions that cause low thyroid hormone levels or very high thyroid hormone levels. Brain disorders or injury, such as:Dementia or Alzheimer's disease, Head trauma, Seizure, Stroke. Injury or accidents, such as:Diving accidents and near drowning, Heat stroke, Very low body temperature (hypothermia). Heart or breathing problems, such as:Abnormal heart rhythm (arrhythmia), Lack of oxygen (hypoxia) from any cause, Low blood pressure (hypotension)\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 , Severe heart failure, Severe lung diseases, Very high blood pressure\r\n(hypertension)  . Toxins and drugs, such as:Alcohol abuse (binge drinking or damage from long-term alcohol use), Exposure to heavy metals, hydrocarbons, or toxic gases, Overuse of drugs such as opiates, narcotics, sedatives, and anti-anxiety or seizure medications, Side effect of almost any medicine, such as those used to treat seizures, depression, psychosis, and other illnesses. "}, "Atrial fibrillation - discharge ": {"description": "You may have been given medicines to change your heartbeat or slow it down. Some are:"}, "Adhesion": {"description": "Adhesions are bands of scar-like tissue that form between two surfaces inside the body and cause them to stick together.", "Possible Complications": "Adhesions can cause various disorders, depending on the tissues affected.In the eye, adhesion of the iris to the lens can lead to glaucoma., In the intestines, adhesions can cause partial or complete bowel obstruction., Adhesions inside the uterine cavity, called Asherman syndrome, can cause a woman to have irregular menstrual cycles and be unable to get pregnant., Pelvic adhesions that involve scarring of the fallopian tubes can lead to infertility and reproductive problems., Abdominal and pelvic adhesions can cause chronic pain. . ", "Symptoms": ["Bloating or swelling of your belly", "Constipation", "Nausea and vomiting", "No longer being able to pass gas", "Pain in the belly that is severe and crampy "], "Exams and Tests": "Most of the time, the adhesions cannot be seen using x-rays or imaging tests.Hysterosalpingography may help diagnose adhesions inside the uterus or Fallopian tubes., X-rays of the abdomen, barium contrast studies, and CT scans may help diagnose a blockage of the intestines caused by adhesions.. Endoscopy (a way of looking inside the body using a flexible tube that has a small camera on the end) may help diagnose adhesions:Hysteroscopy looks inside the uterus, Laparoscopy looks inside the abdomen and pelvis. ", "Treatment": "Surgery may be done to separate the adhesions. This can let the organ regain normal movement and reduce symptoms. However, the risk for more adhesions goes up with more surgeries.Depending on the location of the adhesions, a barrier may be placed at the time of surgery to help reduce the chance of the adhesions returning.", "Causes": "As the body moves, tissues or organs inside are normally able to shift around each other. This is because these tissues have slippery surfaces. Inflammation (swelling), surgery, or injury can cause adhesions to form and prevent this movement. Adhesions can occur almost anywhere in the body, including:Joints, such as the shoulder, Eyes, Inside the abdomen or pelvis. Adhesions can become larger or tighter over time. Problems may occur if the adhesions cause an organ or body part to:Twist, Pull out of position, Be unable to move normally. The risk of forming adhesions is high after bowel or female organ surgeries. Surgery using a laparoscope is less likely to cause adhesions than open surgery.Other causes of adhesions in the abdomen or pelvis include:Appendicitis, most often when the appendix breaks open (ruptures), Cancer, Endometriosis, Infections in the abdomen and pelvis, Radiation treatment. Adhesions around the joints may occur:After surgery or trauma, With certain types of arthritis, With overuse of a joint or tendon. "}, "Aging changes in hormone production": {"description": "RELATED TOPICS"}, "Analgesic nephropathy": {"description": "Analgesic nephropathy involves damage to one or both kidneys caused by overexposure to mixtures of medications, especially over-the-counter pain remedies (analgesics).", "Possible Complications": "Acute renal failure, Chronic renal failure, Interstitial nephritis, Renal papillary necrosis (tissue death)\r\n, Urinary tract infections, chronic or recurrent\r\n, Hypertension, Transitional cell carcinoma of the kidney or ureter. ", "Symptoms": ["Weakness", "Fatigue \u00a0\r\n  ", "Increased urinary frequency or urgency", "Blood in the urine", "Flank pain or back pain", "Decreased urine output", "Decreased alertness including drowsiness, confusion, and lethargy", "Decreased sensation, numbness (especially in the legs)", "Nausea, vomiting", "Easy bruising or bleeding", "Swelling, generalized\r\n  "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination may show signs of interstitial nephritis or kidney failure.Blood pressure may be high. The doctor may hear abnormal heart or lung sounds when listening to the chest with a stethoscope. There may be signs of premature skin aging. There may be swelling, especially in the lower legs.Lab tests may show red or white blood cells in the urine, with or without signs of infection. There may be small amounts of protein in the urine.Tests that may be done include:Complete blood count, CT scan of the kidney, Intravenous pyelogram (IVP), Toxicology screen, Urinalysis, Kidney ultrasound. ", "Treatment": "The primary goals of treatment are to prevent further damage and to treat any existing kidney failure. The health care provider may tell you to stop taking all suspect painkillers, particularly OTC medications.Signs of kidney failure should be treated as appropriate. This may include diet changes, fluid restriction, dialysis or kidney transplant, or other treatments.Counseling, behavioral modification, or similar interventions may help you develop alternative methods of controlling chronic pain.", "Prevention": "Follow the directions of the health care provider when using medications, including OTC medications. Do not exceed the recommended dose of medications without the supervision of the health care provider.", "Causes": "\r\n\r\nAnalgesic nephropathy involves damage within the internal structures of the kidney. It is caused by long-term use of analgesics, especially over-the-counter (OTC) medications that contain phenacetin or acetaminophen and nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) such as aspirin or ibuprofen.About 6 or more pills per day for 3 years increases the risk some for this problem. This frequently occurs as a result of self-medicating, often for some type of chronic pain.Analgesic nephropathy occurs in about 4 out of 100,000 people, mostly women over 30. The rate has decreased significantly since phenacetin is no longer widely available in OTC preparations.Risk factors include:Use of OTC analgesics containing more than one active ingredient , Chronic headaches, painful menstrual periods, backache, or musculoskeletal pain , Emotional or behavioral changes , History of dependent behaviors including smoking, alcoholism, and excessive use of tranquilizers. "}, "Aortic aneurysm repair - endovascular - discharge": {"description": "AAA repair - endovascular - discharge; Repair - aortic aneurysm - endovascular - discharge; EVAR - discharge; Endovascular aneurysm repair - discharge"}, "Absence seizure": {"Symptoms": ["Occur many times a day", "Occur for weeks to months before being noticed", "Interfere with school and learning", "Be mistaken for lack of attention or other misbehavior ", "Stop walking and start again a few seconds later", "Stop talking in mid-sentence and start again a few seconds later ", "Wide awake", "Thinking clearly", "Unaware of the seizure ", "Changes in muscle activity, such as no movement, hand fumbling, fluttering eyelids, lip smacking, chewing", "Changes in alertness (consciousness), such as staring episodes, lack of awareness of surroundings, sudden halt in movement, talking, and other awake activities", "May be triggered by hyperventilation or flashing lights, in some cases "], "description": "An absence seizure is the term given to a staring spell. This type of seizure is a brief (usually less than 15 seconds) disturbance of brain function due to abnormal electrical activity in the brain.", "Causes": "Absence seizure occur most often in people under age 20, usually in children ages 6 to 12.They may occur with other types of seizures, such as generalized tonic-clonic seizures (grand mal seizures), twitches or jerks (myoclonus), or sudden loss of muscle strength (atonic seizures).", "Treatment": "For information on diagnosis and treatment, see:Epilepsy, Seizures. "}, "Actinomycosis": {"description": "Actinomycosis is a long-term (chronic) bacterial infection that commonly affects the face and neck.", "Possible Complications": "In rare cases, meningitis can develop from actinomycosis.", "Symptoms": ["Draining sores in the skin, especially on the chest wall from lung infection with Actinomyces", "Fever", "Minimal or no pain", "Swelling or a hard, red to reddish-purple lump on the face or upper neck", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask questions about your symptoms.Tests that may be done to check for presence of the bacteria include:Culture of the tissue or fluid , Examination of drained fluid under a microscope . ", "Treatment": "Treatment of actinomycosis usually requires antibiotics for several months to a year. Surgical drainage or removal of the affected area (lesion) may be needed. If the condition is related to an IUD, the device must be removed.", "Prevention": "Good oral hygiene and regular dentist visits may help prevent some forms of actinomycosis.", "Causes": "Actinomycosis is usually caused by bacterium called Actinomyces israelii. This is a common and organism found in the nose and throat. It normally does not cause disease.Because of the bacteria's normal location in the nose and throat, actinomycosis most commonly affects the face and neck. The infection can sometimes occur in the chest (pulmonary actinomycosis), abdomen, pelvis, or other areas of the body. The infection is not contagious. This means it does not spread to other persons.Symptoms occur when the bacteria enter the tissues of the face after trauma, surgery, or infection. Common triggers include dental abscess or oral surgery. The infection can also affect certain women who have had an intrauterine device (IUD) to prevent pregnancy.Once in the tissue, the bacteria causes an abscess, producing a hard, red to reddish-purple lump, often on the jaw, from which comes the condition's common name, \"lumpy jaw.\"Eventually, the abscess breaks through the skin surface to produce a draining sinus tract."}, "Alcoholic liver disease": {"description": "Alcoholic liver disease is damage to the liver and its function due to alcohol abuse.", "Symptoms": ["Pain and swelling in the abdomen", "Decreased appetite and weight loss", "Nausea and vomiting", "Fatigue", "Dry mouth and increased thirst", "Bleeding from enlarged veins in the walls of the lower part\u00a0of the esophagus (tube that connects your throat to your stomach)", "Yellow color in the skin, mucus membranes, or eyes (jaundice)", "Small, red spider-like veins on the skin", "Very dark or pale skin", "Redness on the feet or hands", "Itching", "Problems with thinking, memory, and mood", "Fainting and lightheadedness", "Numbness in legs and feet"], "Exams and Tests": "Complete blood count (CBC), Liver biopsy, Liver function tests. Tests to rule out other diseases include:Abdominal CT scan, Blood tests for other causes of liver disease, Ultrasound of the abdomen. ", "Causes": "Alcoholic liver disease occurs after years of heavy drinking. Alcohol can cause inflammation in the liver. Over time, scarring and cirrhosis can occur. Cirrhosis is the final phase of alcoholic liver disease.Alcoholic liver disease does not occur in all heavy drinkers. The chances of getting liver disease go up the longer you have been drinking and more alcohol you consume. You do not have to get drunk for\u00a0the disease to happen.The disease seems to be more common in some families. Women may be more likely to have this problem than men.\u00a0\u00a0 ", "Prevention": "Talk to your doctor about your alcohol intake. The doctor can counsel you about how much alcohol is safe for you.\u00a0", "Treatment": "The most important part of treatment is to stop using alcohol completely. If liver cirrhosis has not yet occurred, the liver can heal if you stop drinking alcohol.An alcohol rehabilitation program or counseling may be necessary to break the alcohol addiction. Vitamins, especially B-complex and folic acid, can help reverse malnutrition.If cirrhosis develops, you may need to manage the complications of cirrhosis. You may need a liver transplant\u00a0if there has been a lot of liver damage."}, "Asthma - children": {"Symptoms": ["Shortness of breath", "Feeling out of breath", "Gasping for air", "Trouble breathing out (exhaling)", "Breathing faster than normal ", "Coughing that sometimes wakes the child up at night (it may be the only symptom)", "Dark bags under the eyes", "Feeling tired", "Irritability", "Tightness in the chest", "A whistling sound made when breathing (wheezing). You may notice it more when the child breathes out. "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will to listen to the child's lungs. The provider may be able to hear asthma sounds. However, lung sounds are often normal when the child is not having an asthma episode.The provider will have the child breathe into a device called a peak flow meter. Peak flow meters can tell how well the child can blow air out of the lungs. If the airways are narrow due to asthma, peak flow values drop.You and your child will learn to measure peak flow at home.Tests may include:Allergy testing, Chest x-ray, Eosinophil count (a type of white blood cell), Lung function tests. ", "description": "Asthma is a disease that causes the airways to swell and get narrow. It leads to wheezing, shortness of breath, chest tightness, and coughing.", "Causes": "Asthma is caused by swelling (inflammation) in the airways. During an asthma attack, the muscles surrounding the airways tighten. The lining of the air passages swells. Less air is able to pass through as a result.Asthma is often seen in children. It is a leading cause of missed school days and hospital visits for children. An allergic reaction is a key part of asthma in children. Asthma and allergies often occur together.Some things that can bring on asthma symptoms (triggers) include:Animals (hair or dander), Dust, mold, and pollen, Aspirin and other medicines, Changes in weather (most often cold weather), Chemicals in the air or in food, Tobacco smoke, Exercise, Strong emotions, Viral infections, such as the common cold . ", "Treatment": "You and your child's doctors should work together as a team to create and carry out an asthma action plan. This plan will tell you how to:Avoid asthma triggers, Monitor symptoms, Measure peak flow, Take medicines . The plan should also tell you when to call the nurse or doctor. It is important to know what questions to ask your child's doctor.Children with asthma need a lot of support at school.Give the school staff your asthma action plan so they know how to take care of your child's asthma., Find out how to let your child take medicine during school hours. (You may need to sign a consent form.), Having asthma does not mean your child cannot exercise. Coaches, gym teachers, and your child should know what to do if your child has asthma symptoms caused by exercise. . ASTHMA MEDICINESThere are two basic kinds of medicine used to treat asthma. Long-term control drugs are taken every day to prevent asthma symptoms. Your child should take these medicines even if no symptoms are present. Some children may need more than one long-term control medicine.Types of long-term control medicines include:Inhaled steroids (these are usually the first choice of treatment), Long-acting bronchodilators (these are almost always used with inhaled steroids), Leukotriene inhibitors, Cromolyn sodium . Quick relief or rescue asthma drugs work fast to control asthma symptoms. Children take them when they are coughing, wheezing, having trouble breathing, or having an asthma attack.Some of your child's asthma medicines can be taken using an inhaler.Children who use an inhaler should use a spacer device. This helps them get the medicine into the lungs properly., If your child uses the inhaler the wrong way, less medicine gets into the lungs. Have your health care provider show your child how to correctly use an inhaler., Younger children can use a nebulizer instead of an inhaler to take their medicine. A nebulizer turns asthma medicine into a mist. . GETTING RID OF TRIGGERSIt is important to know what things make your child's asthma worse. These are called asthma triggers. Avoiding them is the first step toward helping your child feeling better.Keep pets outdoors, or at least away from the child's bedroom.No one should smoke in a house or around a child with asthma. Getting rid of tobacco smoke in the home is the single most important thing a family can do to help a child with asthma., Smoking outside the house is not enough. Family members and visitors who smoke carry the smoke inside on their clothes and hair. This can trigger asthma symptoms., Do not use indoor fireplaces. . Keep the house clean. Keep food in containers and out of bedrooms. This helps reduce the possibility of cockroaches, which can trigger asthma attacks. Cleaning products in the home should be unscented.MONITOR YOUR CHILD'S ASTHMAChecking peak flow is one of the best ways to control asthma. It can help you keep your child's asthma from getting worse. Asthma attacks do NOT usually come on without warning.Children under age 5 may not be able to use a peak flow meter well enough for it to be helpful. However, a child should start using the peak flow meter at a young age to get used to it. An adult should always watch for a child's asthma symptoms."}, "Alzheimer disease": {"description": "Dementia is a loss of brain function that occurs with certain diseases. Alzheimer disease (AD) is one form of dementia. It affects memory, thinking, and behavior.", "Symptoms": ["Emotional behavior or personality", "Language", "Memory", "Perception", "Thinking and judgment (cognitive skills)", "Difficulty performing more than one task at a time", "Difficulty solving problems", "Forgetting recent events or conversations", "Taking longer to perform more difficult activities", "Difficulty performing tasks that take some thought, but used to come easily, such as balancing a checkbook, playing complex games (such as bridge), and learning new information or routines", "Getting lost on familiar routes", "Language problems, such as trouble finding the name of familiar objects", "Losing interest in things previously enjoyed, flat mood", "Misplacing items", "Personality changes and loss of social skills", "Change in sleep patterns, often waking up at night", "Delusions, depression, agitation", "Difficulty doing basic tasks, such as preparing meals, choosing proper clothing, and driving", "Difficulty reading or writing", "Forgetting details about current events", "Forgetting events in one's life history, losing self-awareness", "Hallucinations, arguments, striking out, and violent behavior", "Poor judgment and loss of ability to recognize danger", "Using the wrong word, mispronouncing words, speaking in confusing sentences", "Withdrawing from social contact", "Recognize family members", "Perform basic activities of daily living, such as eating, dressing, and bathing", "Understand language", "Incontinence", "Swallowing problems"], "Exams and Tests": "A skilled health care provider can often diagnose AD with the following steps:Complete physical exam, including nervous system exam, Asking about the person's medical history and symptoms, Mental function tests (mental status examination). A diagnosis of AD is made when certain symptoms are present, and by making sure other causes of dementia are not present.Tests may be done to rule out other possible causes of dementia, including: Anemia, Brain tumor, Chronic infection, Intoxication from medication, Severe depression, Increased fluid on the brain (normal pressure hydrocephalus), Stroke, Thyroid disease, Vitamin deficiency. CT or MRI of the brain may be done to look for other causes of dementia, such as a brain tumor or stroke.The only way to know for certain that someone has AD is to examine a sample of their brain tissue after death. ", "Causes": "The exact cause of Alzheimer disease (AD) is not known. Research shows that certain changes in the brain lead to AD developing. You are more likely to get AD if you:Are older. But developing AD is not a part of normal aging., Have a close relative, such as a brother, sister, or parent, with AD. , Have certain genes linked to AD.. The following may also increase the risk:Being female, Having heart and blood vessel problems due to, for example, high cholesterol\r\n  , History of head trauma\r\n  . There are two types of AD:Early onset AD: Symptoms appear before age 60. This type is much less common than late onset. It tends to get worse quickly. Early onset disease can run in families. Several genes have been identified., Late onset AD: This is the most common type. It occurs in people age 60 and older. It may run in some families, but the role of genes is less clear.. ", "Prevention": "Although there is no proven way to prevent AD, there are some measures that may help prevent or slow the onset of Alzheimer disease.These include keeping a low-fat diet and eating foods high in omega-3 fatty acids. Getting physical exercise and staying mentally and socially active also seem to help.", "Treatment": "There is no cure for AD. The goals of treatment are:Slow the progression of the disease (although this is difficult to do)\r\n  , Manage symptoms, such as behavior problems, confusion, and sleep problems\r\n  , Change the home environment to make daily activities\r\n  easier , Support family members and other caregivers. Medicines are used to:Slow the rate at which symptoms worsen, though benefit with these drugs may be small, Control problems with behavior, such as loss of judgment or confusion. Before using these medicines, ask the doctor or nurse:What are the side effects? Is the medicine worth the risk?, When is the best time, if any, to use these medicines?, Do medicines for other health problems need to be changed or stopped?. "}, "Acetone poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Low blood pressure", "Nausea", "Pain in belly area (abdomen)", "Person may have a fruity odor", "Sweet taste in mouth", "Vomiting", "Acting as if drunk", "Coma", "Drowsiness", "Stupor (confusion, decreased level of consciousness)", "Uncoordination\u00a0", "Difficulty breathing", "Slowed breathing rate", "Shortness of breath", "Increased need to urinate"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all poisons in their original and/or childproof container, with labels visible, and out of the reach of children."}, "Acanthosis nigricans": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can usually diagnose acanthosis nigricans by looking at your skin. A skin biopsy may be needed in unusual cases.If there is no clear cause of acanthosis nigricans, your doctor may order tests. These may include:Blood tests to check blood sugar level, Endoscopy, \u00a0X-rays. ", "description": "Acanthosis nigricans is a skin disorder in which there is darker, thick, velvety skin in body folds and creases.", "Causes": "Acanthosis nigricans can affect otherwise healthy people, or it can be related to medical problems. Some cases are genetically inherited. The condition is most commonly seen among people of African descent, in part because it is easier to see in darker skin.Obesity can lead to acanthosis nigricans, as can some endocrine disorders. It is often found in people with obesity-related insulin resistance.Some medicines, particularly hormones such as human growth hormone or\u00a0birth control pills,\u00a0can also cause acanthosis nigricans.People with lymphoma or cancers of the gastrointestinal or genitourinary tracts can also develop severe cases of acanthosis nigricans.", "Treatment": "Because acanthosis nigricans usually only changes the skin's appearance, no treatment is needed. If the condition is affecting your appearance, using moisturizers containing ammonium lactate can help improve the skin's appearance.It is important, however, to treat any underlying medical problem that may be causing these skin changes. When acanthosis nigricans is related to obesity, losing weight often improves the condition."}, "Antiparietal cell antibody test": {"description": "An antiparietal cell antibody test is a blood test that looks for antibodies against the parietal cells of the stomach. The parietal cells make and release a substance that the body needs to absorb vitamin B12."}, "Aloe": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from breathing in the substance)", "Diarrhea", "Loss of vision", "Rash", "Severe abdominal pain", "Skin irritation", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Abdominal ultrasound": {"description": "Abdominal ultrasound is an type of imaging test. It is used to examine organs in\u00a0the abdomen including the liver, gallbladder, spleen, pancreas, and kidneys. The blood vessels that lead to some of these organs can also be looked at with ultrasound."}, "Ankle sprain - aftercare": {"description": "An ankle sprain occurs when the ligaments in your ankle are stretched or torn."}, "Atopic dermatitis - self-care": {"description": "Eczema - self-care"}, "Amebic liver abscess": {"description": "Amebic liver abscess is a collection of pus in the liver in response to an intestinal parasite.", "Possible Complications": "The abscess may rupture into the abdominal cavity, the lining of the lungs, the lungs, or the sac around the heart. The infection can also spread to the brain.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain, particularly in the right, upper part of the abdomen; pain is intense, continuous or stabbing\r\n  ", "Cough", "Fever and chills", "Diarrhea (in only one-third of patients)", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)", "Hiccups that do not stop (rare)", "Jaundice\r\n\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 ", "Loss of appetite", "Sweating", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include:Abdominal ultrasound, Abdominal CT scan or MRI, Complete blood count, Liver abscess aspiration to check for bacterial infection in the liver abscess, Liver scan, Liver function tests, Serology for amebiasis, Stool testing for amebiasis. ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics such as metronidazole (Flagyl) or tinidazole (Tindamax) are the usual treatment for liver abscess. A medication such as paromomycin or diloxanide must also be taken to get rid of all the amoebas in the intestine and\u00a0to prevent the disease from coming back. This treatment can usually be delayed until after the abscess has been treated.In rare cases, the abscess may need to be drained to relieve some of the abdominal pain.", "Prevention": "When traveling in tropical countries with poor sanitation, drink purified water and do not eat uncooked vegetables or unpeeled fruit.", "Causes": "Amebic liver abscess is caused by Entamoeba histolytica. This is the same parasite that causes amebiasis, an intestinal infection that is also called amebic dysentery. After an infection has occurred, the parasite may be carried by the blood from the intestines to the liver.The disease spreads from eating food or water that has been contaminated with feces (sometimes due to the use of human waste as fertilizer). It is also spread\u00a0through person-to-person contact.The infection occurs worldwide, but is most common in tropical areas where crowded living conditions and poor sanitation exist. Africa, Latin America, Southeast Asia, and India have significant health problems from this disease.Risk factors for amebic liver abscess include:Alcoholism, Cancer, Immunosuppression including HIV infection\r\n , Malnutrition, Old age, Pregnancy, Recent travel to a tropical region, Steroid use. "}, "Aminophylline overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Increased appetite", "Increased thirst", "Nausea", "Vomiting (possibly with blood)", "High or low blood pressure", "Irregular heartbeat", "Rapid heart rate", "Pounding heartbeat (palpitations) ", "Breathing difficulty", "Muscle twitching and cramping ", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Fever", "Hallucinations (thinking something is there, but it's not)", "Headache", "Irritability", "Psychosis", "Restlessness", "Sweating", "Trouble sleeping ", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Irregular heartbeat", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid heartbeat", "Shock", "Rapid, deep breathing ", "Muscle cramps", "Twitching ", "Convulsions", "Irritability", "Tremors "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Antibody": {"description": "Each type of antibody is unique and defends the body against one specific type of antigen."}, "Allergic reactions": {"Symptoms": ["Hives (especially over the neck and face)", "Itching", "Nasal congestion", "Rashes", "Watery, red eyes", "Abdominal pain", "Abnormal (high-pitched) breathing sounds", "Anxiety", "Chest discomfort or tightness", "Cough", "Diarrhea", "Difficulty breathing", "Difficulty swallowing", "Dizziness or light-headedness", "Flushing or redness of the face", "Nausea\u00a0or vomiting", "Palpitations", "Swelling of the face, eyes, or tongue", "Unconsciousness", "Wheezing"], "Prevention": "Avoid triggers such as foods and medications that have caused an allergic reaction in the past. Ask detailed questions about ingredients when you are eating away from home. Carefully check ingredient labels., If you have a child who is allergic to certain foods, introduce one new food at a time in small amounts so you can recognize an allergic reaction., Persons who have had serious allergic reactions should wear a medical ID tag and carry emergency medications (such as a chewable form of Chlor-Trimeton and injectable epinephrine or a bee sting kit) according to your health care provider's instructions., Do not use your injectable epinephrine on anyone else. They may have a condition (such as a heart problem) that could be made worse by this drug. . ", "description": "Allergic reactions are sensitivities to substances called allergens that come into contact with the skin, nose, eyes, respiratory tract, and gastrointestinal tract. They can be\u00a0breathed into the lungs, swallowed, or injected.", "Causes": "Common allergens include:Animal dander, Bee stings or stings from other insects, Foods, especially nuts, fish, and shellfish, Insect bites, Medications, Plants, Pollens. "}, "Ankle arthroscopy": {"description": "Ankle arthroscopy is surgery that uses a tiny camera and surgical tools to examine or repair the tissues inside or around your ankle. The camera is called an arthroscope. The procedure allows the doctor to detect problems and make repairs to your ankle without making larger cuts in the skin and tissue. This means that you may have less pain and recover more quickly."}, "Armpit lump": {"description": "An armpit lump is a swelling or bump under the arm. A lump in the armpit can have many causes. These include swollen lymph nodes, infections, or cysts.", "Causes": "Lumps in the armpit may have many causes. Lymph nodes act as filters that can catch germs or cancerous tumor cells. When they do, lymph nodes increase in size and are easily felt. Reasons lymph nodes in the armpit area may be enlarged are:Arm or breast infection, Some body wide infections, such as mono, AIDS, or herpes, Cancers, such as lymphomas or breast cancer. Cysts or abscesses under the skin may also produce large, painful lumps in the armpit. These may be caused by shaving or use of antiperspirants (not deodorants). This is most often seen in teens just beginning to shave.Other causes of armpit lumps may include:Cat scratch disease, Lipomas (harmless fatty growths), Use of certain medicines or vaccinations. "}, "Antigen": {"description": "An antigen is any substance that causes your immune system to produce antibodies against it. An antigen may be a foreign substance from the environment, such as chemicals, bacteria, viruses, or pollen. An antigen may also be formed inside the body, as with bacterial toxins or tissue cells."}, "Alveolar abnormalities": {"description": "Depending on the disease, alveoli may:"}, "Anal fissure": {"Symptoms": ["A crack in the anal skin that can be seen when the area is stretched slightly (the fissure is almost always in the middle)", "Constipation "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a rectal exam and look at the anal tissue.", "description": "An anal fissure is a small split or tear in the thin moist tissue (mucosa) lining the lower rectum (anus).", "Causes": "Anal fissures are very common in infants, but they may occur at any age. The rate of anal fissures drops with age. Fissures are much less common among school-age children than in infants.In adults, fissures may be caused by passing large, hard stools, or having diarrhea for a long time. Other factors may include:Decreased blood flow to the area in older adults, Too much tension in the sphincter muscles that control the anus . Anal fissures are also common in women after childbirth and in persons with Crohn's disease.", "Treatment": "Most fissures heal on their own and do not need treatment.To prevent or treat anal fissures in infants, be sure to change diapers often and clean the area gently.CHILDREN AND ADULTSWorrying about pain during a bowel movement may cause a person to avoid them. But not having bowel movements will only cause the stools to become even harder, which can make anal fissure worse.Prevent hard stools and constipation by:Making dietary changes -- eating more fiber or bulk, such as fruits, vegetables, and grains , Drinking more fluids, Using stool softeners . Applying the following ointments or creams to the area may soothe the skin:Numbing cream, if pain interferes with normal bowel movements, Petroleum jelly, Zinc oxide, 1% hydrocortisone cream, Preparation H, and other products . A sitz bath is a warm water bath used for healing or cleansing. You should sit in the bath two to three times a day. The water should cover only your hips and buttocks.If the anal fissures do not go away with home care methods, treatment may involve:Botox injections into the muscle in the anus (anal sphincter), Minor surgery to relax the anal muscle, Prescription creams such as nitrates or calcium channel blockers, applied over the fissure to help relax the muscles. "}, "Aging changes in the male reproductive system": {"description": "Aging changes in the male reproductive system may include changes in testicular tissue, sperm production, and erectile function. These changes usually occur gradually."}, "Aplastic anemia": {"description": "Aplastic anemia is a condition in which the bone marrow does not make enough new blood cells. Bone marrow is the soft, fatty tissue in the center of bones.", "Possible Complications": "Severe infections or bleeding, Complications of bone marrow transplant, Reactions to medicines, Hemochromatosis (buildup of too much iron in the body tissues from many red cell transfusions) . ", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Pallor (paleness)", "Rapid heart rate", "Shortness of breath with exercise", "Weakness", "Lightheadedness upon standing ", "Bleeding gums", "Easy bruising", "Frequent or severe infections", "Nose bleeds", "Rash--small pinpoint red marks on the skin (petechiae) "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask about your medical history and symptoms you may have.Blood tests will show:Low red blood cell count (anemia), Low white blood cell count, Low reticulocyte count (reticulocytes are immature red blood cell), Low platelet count. A bone marrow biopsy shows fewer-than-normal blood cells and an increased amount of fat.", "Treatment": "Mild cases of aplastic anemia may require no treatment. Symptoms are treated as needed.If blood counts become lower, patients receive extra blood and platelets through transfusions. Over time, transfusions may stop working, resulting in very low blood cell counts. This is a life-threatening condition.Bone marrow transplant or stem cell transplant may be recommended for patients under age 40. This treatment works best when the donor is a fully-matched brother or sister. This is called a matched sibling donor.Older patients and those who do not have a matched sibling donor are given medicines to suppress the immune system. These medicines may allow the bone marrow to once again make healthy blood cells. But the disease may return (relapse). A bone marrow transplant with an unrelated donor may be tried if these medicines do not help or if the disease comes back after getting better", "Causes": "Aplastic anemia results from injury to the blood stem cells. These are immature cells in the bone marrow that give rise to all other blood cell types. The injury causes a decrease in the number of every type of blood cell. These cells include the red cells, white cells, and platelets.Aplastic anemia can also be caused by certain medical conditions such as pregnancy or lupus. Exposure to certain toxins or medicines, including chemotherapy, can also lead to aplastic anemia."}, "Anthrax": {"description": "Anthrax is an infectious disease due to a bacterium called Bacillus anthracis. Infection in humans most often involves the skin, gastrointestinal tract, or lungs.", "Symptoms": ["An itchy sore develops that is similar to an insect bite. This sore may blister and form a black ulcer (sore or eschar).", "The sore is usually painless, but it is often surrounded by swelling.", "A scab often forms, and then dries and falls off within 2 weeks. Complete healing can take longer.", "Begins with fever, malaise, headache, cough, shortness of breath, and chest pain", "Fever and shock may occur later", "Abdominal pain", "Bloody diarrhea", "Diarrhea", "Fever", "Mouth sores", "Nausea and vomiting (the vomit may contain blood)"], "Exams and Tests": "The tests to diagnose anthrax depend on the type of disease that is suspected.A culture of the skin, and\u00a0sometimes a biopsy, are done on the skin sores. The sample is looked at under a microscope to identify the anthrax bacterium.Tests may include:Blood culture, Chest CT scan or chest x-ray, Spinal tap to check for infection around the spinal column, Sputum culture. Fluid or blood samples may be sent to a special laboratory for more testing, including PCR, immunofluorescence, and immunohistochemistry.", "Causes": "Anthrax commonly affects hoofed animals such as sheep, cattle, and goats. Humans who come into contact with infected animals can get sick with anthrax as well.There are three main routes of anthrax infection:Cutaneous anthrax occurs when anthrax spores touch a cut or scrape on the skin.It is the most common type of anthrax infection., The main risk is contact with animal hides or hair, bone products, and wool, or with infected animals. People most at risk for cutaneous anthrax include farm workers, veterinarians, and tannery and wool workers.. Inhalation anthrax develops when anthrax spores enter the lungs through the respiratory tract. It is most commonly contracted when workers breathe in airborne anthrax spores during processes such as tanning hides and processing wool.Breathing in spores means a person has been exposed to anthrax, but it does not mean the person will have symptoms.The bacteria spores must germinate or sprout (the same way a seed might sprout before a plant grows) before the actual disease occurs. The process usually takes 1 to 6 days., Once the spores germinate, they release several toxic substances. These substances cause internal bleeding, swelling, and tissue death.. Gastrointestinal anthrax occurs when someone eats anthrax-tainted meat.Anthrax may be used as a biological weapon or for bioterrorism.", "Prevention": "There are two main ways to prevent anthrax.For people who have been exposed to anthrax (but have no symptoms of the disease), doctors may prescribe preventive antibiotics, such as ciprofloxacin, penicillin, or doxycycline, depending on the strain of anthrax.An anthrax vaccine is available to military personnel and some members of the general public. It is given in a series of five doses over 18 months.There is no known way to spread cutaneous anthrax from person to person. People who live with someone who has cutaneous anthrax do not need antibiotics unless they have also been exposed to the same source of anthrax.", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are usually used to treat anthrax. Antibiotics\u00a0that may be prescribed\u00a0include penicillin, doxycycline, and ciprofloxacin.Inhalational anthrax is treated with\u00a0a combination of antibiotics such as ciprofloxacin plus another medicine, which are given\u00a0by IV (intravenously).\u00a0Antibiotics are usually\u00a0taken for\u00a060 days\u00a0by people who have been exposed to anthrax, because it can\u00a0take spores that long to germinate.Cutaneous (skin) anthrax is treated with antibiotics taken by mouth, usually for 7 to 10 days. Doxycycline and ciprofloxacin are most often used."}, "Acute pancreatitis": {"description": "Acute pancreatitis is sudden swelling and inflammation of the pancreas.", "Possible Complications": "Pancreatitis can return. The chances of it returning depend on the cause, and how well it can be treated. Complications of acute pancreatitis may include:Acute kidney failure, Acute respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS), Buildup of fluid in the abdomen (ascites), Cysts or abscesses in the pancreas, Heart failure, Low blood pressure . Repeat episodes of acute pancreatitis can lead to chronic pancreatitis.", "Symptoms": ["May be worse within minutes after eating or drinking at first, especially if foods have a high fat content", "Becomes constant and more severe, lasting for several days", "May be worse when lying flat on the back", "May spread (radiate) to the back or below the left shoulder blade ", "Clay-colored stools", "Gaseous abdominal fullness", "Hiccups", "Indigestion", "Mild yellowing of the skin and whites of the eyes (jaundice)", "Swollen abdomen"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will do a physical exam, which may show:\r\n  Abdominal tenderness or lump (mass)\r\n  , \r\n  Fever\r\n  , Low blood pressure, \r\n  Rapid heart rate\r\n  , \r\n  Rapid breathing (respiratory) rate\r\n  . Lab tests that show the release of pancreatic enzymes will be done. These include:Increased blood amylase level, Increased serum blood lipase level, Increased urine amylase level. Other blood tests that can help diagnose pancreatitis or its complications include:Complete blood count (CBC), Comprehensive metabolic panel. Imaging tests that can show inflammation of the pancreas include:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal MRI, Abdominal ultrasound. ", "Treatment": "Treatment often requires a stay in the hospital. It may involve:\r\n  Pain medicines\r\n  , \r\n  Fluids given through a vein (IV)\r\n  , \r\n  Stopping food or fluid by mouth to limit the activity of the pancreas\r\n  . A tube may be inserted through the nose or mouth to remove the contents of the stomach (nasogastric suctioning). This may be done if vomiting and severe pain do not improve, or if a paralyzed bowel (paralytic ileus) develops. The tube will stay in for 1 - 2 days to 1 - 2 weeks.Treating the condition that caused the problem can prevent repeated attacks.In some cases, therapy is needed to:\r\n  Drain fluid that has collected in or around the pancreas\r\n  , \r\n  Remove gallstones, \r\n  Relieve blockages of the pancreatic duct\r\n  . In the most severe cases, surgery is needed to remove damaged, dead or infected pancreatic tissue.Avoid smoking, alcoholic drinks, and fatty foods after the attack has improved.", "Prevention": "You may lower your risk of new or repeat episodes of pancreatitis by taking steps to prevent the medical conditions that can lead to the disease:Avoid aspirin when treating a fever in children, especially if they may have a viral illness, to reduce the risk of Reye syndrome., Do NOT drink too much alcohol., Make sure children receive vaccines to protect them against mumps and other childhood illnesses., Treat medical conditions that contribute to hypertriglyceridemia. . ", "Causes": "The pancreas is an organ located behind the stomach that produces chemicals called enzymes, which are needed to digest food. It also produces the hormones insulin and glucagon. Most of the time, the enzymes are only active after they reach the small intestine. When these enzymes become active inside the pancreas, they digest the tissue of the pancreas. This causes swelling, bleeding (hemorrhage), and damage to the organ and its blood vessels. This condition is called acute pancreatitis.Acute pancreatitis affects men more often than women. Certain diseases, surgeries, and habits make you more likely to develop this condition. The two most common causes of pancreatitis in the United States are heavy alcohol use and gallstones. Alcohol use is responsible for up to 70% of cases in the United States. Acute pancreatitis typically requires 5 to 8 drinks per day for 5 or more years. Gallstones are the next most common cause. The condition develops when the gallstones travel out of the gallbladder into the bile ducts, where they block the opening that drains the common bile duct and pancreatic duct (ampulla). Genetics may be a factor in some cases. Sometimes, the cause is not known.Other conditions that have been linked to pancreatitis are:Autoimmune problems (when the immune system attacks the body), Damage to the ducts or pancreas during surgery, High blood levels of a fat called triglycerides (hypertriglyceridemia) usually above 1000 mg/dL, Injury to the pancreas from an accident . Other causes include:Complications of cystic fibrosis, Hemolytic uremic syndrome, Hyperparathyroidism, Kawasaki disease, Reye syndrome, Use of certain medications (especially estrogens, corticosteroids, sulfonamides, thiazides and azathioprine), Viral infections, including mumps, coxsackie B, mycoplasma pneumonia, and campylobacter, Injury to the pancreas after a procedure such as an ERCP (endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography) or EUS (endoscopic ultrasound) with FNA (fine needle aspirate). "}, "Addison disease": {"description": "Addison disease is a disorder that occurs when the adrenal glands do not produce enough hormones.", "Possible Complications": "Complications can occur if you take too little or too much adrenal hormone.Complications also may result from the following related illnesses:Diabetes, Hashimoto thyroiditis (chronic thyroiditis), Hypoparathyroidism, Ovarian hypofunction or testicular failure, Pernicious anemia, Thyrotoxicosis. ", "Symptoms": ["Chronic diarrhea, nausea, and vomiting", "Darkening of the skin in some places, causing the skin to look patchy", "Dehydration", "Dizziness when standing up", "Paleness", "Extreme weakness, fatigue, and slow, sluggish movement", "Mouth lesions on the inside of a cheek (buccal mucosa)", "Salt craving", "Weight loss with reduced appetite "], "Exams and Tests": "Laboratory tests may show:Increased potassium, Low blood pressure, especially with a change in body position, Low cortisol level, Low serum sodium, Low blood pH, Normal sex hormone levels . Additional laboratory tests may be ordered.Other tests may include:Abdominal x-ray, Abdominal CT scan. ", "Treatment": "Treatment with replacement corticosteroids will control the symptoms of this disease. These medicines usually need to be taken for life. Never skip doses of your medication for this condition because life-threatening reactions may occur.Your doctor may increase your dosage because of:Infection, Injury, Stress, Surgery . During an extreme form of adrenal insufficiency, called adrenal crisis, you must inject hydrocortisone right away. Treatment for low blood pressure is usually needed as well.Some people with Addison disease are taught to give themselves an emergency injection of hydrocortisone during stressful situations. Always carry medical ID (card, bracelet, or necklace) that says you have adrenal insufficiency. The ID should also say the type of medicine and dosage you need in case of an emergency. ", "Causes": "The adrenal glands are small hormone-releasing organs located on top of each kidney. They are made up of an outer portion, called the cortex, and an inner portion, called the medulla.The cortex produces three hormones:Glucocorticoid hormones (such as cortisol) maintain sugar (glucose) control, decrease (suppress) immune response, and help the body respond to stress., Mineralocorticoid hormones (such as aldosterone) regulate sodium and potassium balance., Sex hormones, androgens (male) and estrogens (female), affect sexual development and sex drive. . Addison disease results from damage to the adrenal cortex. The damage causes the cortex to produce hormone levels that are too low.This damage may be caused by the following:The immune system mistakenly attacking the adrenal glands (autoimmune disease), Infections such as tuberculosis, HIV, or fungal infections, Hemorrhage into the adrenal glands, Tumors . Risk factors for the autoimmune type of Addison disease include other autoimmune diseases:Chronic thyroiditis, Dermatis herpetiformis, Graves' disease, Hypoparathyroidism, Hypopituitarism, Myasthenia gravis, Pernicious anemia, Testicular dysfunction, Type I diabetes, Vitiligo. Certain rare genetic defects may also cause adrenal insufficiency."}, "Abdominal sounds": {"description": "Abdominal sounds are the noises made by the intestines.", "Causes": "Most of the sounds you hear in your stomach and intestines are due to normal digestion. They are not a cause for concern. Many conditions can cause hyperactive or hypoactive bowel sounds. Most are harmless and do not need to be treated.The following is a list of more serious conditions that can cause abnormal bowel sounds.Hyperactive, hypoactive, or missing bowel sounds may be caused by:Blocked blood vessels prevent the intestines from getting proper blood flow. For example, blood clots can cause mesenteric artery occlusion., Mechanical bowel obstruction is caused by hernia, tumor, adhesions, or similar conditions that can block the intestines., Paralytic ileus is a problem with the nerves to the intestines. . Other causes of hypoactive bowel sounds include:Drugs that slow down movement in the intestines such as opiates (including codeine), anticholinergics, and phenothiazines, General anesthesia, Radiation to the abdomen, Spinal anesthesia, Surgery in the abdomen . Other causes of hyperactive bowel sounds include:Crohn's disease, Diarrhea, Food allergy, GI bleeding, Infectious enteritis, Ulcerative colitis. "}, "Allergic vasculitis": {"description": "Allergic vasculitis is an extreme reaction to a drug, infection, or foreign substance. It leads to inflammation and damage to blood vessels of the skin.", "Possible Complications": "Lasting damage to the blood vessels or skin with scarring, Inflammation of the blood vessels affects the internal organs . ", "Symptoms": ["Purple-colored spots and patches on the skin", "Skin sores mostly located on the legs, buttocks, or trunk", "Blisters on the skin", "Hives (urticaria), may last longer than 24 hours", "Open sores with dead tissue (necrotic ulcers) "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will base the diagnosis on symptoms and the appearance of how your skin looks after you take a certain medicine or are exposed to a foreign substance (antigen).Results from an ESR test may be high. Skin biopsy shows inflammation of the small blood vessels. You may also have other tests to detect this condition.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce inflammation.Your health care provider may prescribe aspirin, nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs),\u00a0or corticosteroids to reduce inflammation of the blood vessels. (DO NOT give aspirin to children except as advised by your health care provider.)Your doctor may tell you to stop taking\u00a0a medicine that could be causing this condition. Do not stop taking any medicine without first talking to your doctor.", "Prevention": "Do not take medicines which have caused an allergic reaction in the past.", "Causes": "Allergic vasculitis is caused by an allergic reaction to a drug, an infection,\u00a0or other foreign substance. It most often affects people older than age 15.Often, the cause of the problem cannot be found even with a careful medical history. Allerigic vasculitis may look like necrotizing vasculitis, which can affect blood vessels around the body."}, "Abdominal pain - children under age 12": {"description": "Most of the time, it is not caused by a serious medical problem. But sometimes abdominal pain can be a sign of something serious. Learn when you should seek medical care right away for your child with abdominal pain.", "Causes": "Your child could have abdominal pain for many reasons. It can be hard to know what is going on when your child has abdominal pain. Most of the time, there is nothing seriously wrong. But sometimes it can be a sign that there is something serious and your child needs medical care.Your child mostly likely is having abdominal pain from something that is not life-threatening. For example, your child may have:Constipation, Gas, Food allergy or intolerance, Heartburn or acid reflux, Stomach flu or food poisoning , Strep throat or mononucleosis (\"mono\") , Colic, Air swallowing, Abdominal migraine , Pain caused by anxiety or depression. Your child may have something more serious if the pain does not get better in 24 hours, gets worse or gets more frequent. Abdominal pain can be a sign of:Appendicitis , Gallstones, Stomach ulcer, Hernia or other bowel twisting, blockage or obstruction, Inflammatory bowel disease (Crohn's disease or ulcerative colitis), Intussusception, caused by part of the intestine being pulled inward into itself, Tumor or cancer, Urinary tract infection, Sickle cell disease crisis. "}, "Antithyroglobulin antibody": {"description": "Antithyroglobulin antibody is a test to measure antibodies to a protein called thyroglobulin, which is found in thyroid cells."}, "Aortic stenosis": {"Symptoms": ["Chest discomfort: The chest pain may get worse with activity and reach into the arm, neck, or jaw. The chest may also feel tight or squeezed.", "Cough, possibly bloody", "Breathing problems when exercising", "Becoming easily tired", "Feeling the heart beat (palpitations)", "Fainting, weakness, or dizziness with activity", "Becoming easily tired with exertion (in mild cases)", "Failure to gain weight", "Poor feeding", "Serious breathing problems that develop within days or weeks of birth (in severe cases)"], "Exams and Tests": "A heart murmur, click, or other abnormal sound is almost always heard through a stethoscope. The health care provider may be able to feel a vibration or movement when placing a hand over the heart. There may be a faint pulse or changes in the quality of the pulse in the neck.Blood pressure may be low.Aortic stenosis is most often detected and then followed using a test called an echocardiogram.The following tests may also be performed:ECG, Exercise stress testing, Left cardiac catheterization, MRI of the heart, Transesophageal echocardiogram (TEE). ", "description": "The aorta is the main artery that carries blood out of the heart to the rest of the body. Blood flows out of the heart and into the aorta through the aortic valve. In aortic stenosis, the aortic valve does not open fully. This decreases blood flow from the heart.\r\n", "Causes": "As the aortic valve narrows, the left ventricle has to work harder to pump blood out through the valve. To do this extra work, the muscles in the ventricle walls become thicker. This can lead to chest pain. As the pressure continues to rise, blood may back up into the lungs. Severe aortic stenosis can limit the amount of blood that reaches the brain and the rest of the body.Aortic stenosis may be present from birth (congenital), but most often it develops later in life. Children with aortic stenosis may have other conditions present from birth.Aortic stenosis mainly occurs due to the buildup of calcium deposits that narrow the valve. This is called calcific aortic stenosis. The problem mostly affects older people. Calcification of the valve happens sooner in people who are born with abnormal aortic or bicuspid valves. In rare cases, calcification can develop more quickly when a person has received chest radiation (such as for cancer treatment).Another cause is rheumatic fever. This condition can develop after strep throat or scarlet fever. Valve problems do not develop for 5 - 10 years or longer after rheumatic fever occurs. Rheumatic fever is becoming rarer in the United States.Aortic stenosis occurs in about 2% of people over 65 years of age. It occurs more often in men than in women.", "Treatment": "Regular checkups by a health provider may be all that is needed if your symptoms are not severe. The health care provider should ask about your health history, do a physical exam, and perform an echocardiogram.People with severe aortic stenosis may be told not to play competitive sports, even if they have no symptoms. If symptoms do occur, strenuous activity must often be limited.Medicines are used to treat symptoms of heart failure or abnormal heart rhythms (most commonly atrial fibrillation). These include diuretics (water pills), nitrates, and beta-blockers. High blood pressure should also be treated. If aortic stenosis is severe, this treatment must be done carefully so blood pressure does not drop too far.In the past, most people with heart valve problems were given antibiotics before dental work or a procedure such as colonoscopy. The antibiotics were given to prevent an infection of the damaged heart. However, antibiotics are now used much less often before dental work and other procedures. Check with your health care provider to find out whether you need antibiotics.People with this and other heart conditions should stop smoking and be tested for high cholesterol.Surgery to repair or replace the valve is often done for adults or children who develop symptoms. Even if symptoms are not very bad, the doctor may recommend surgery based on test results.A less invasive procedure called balloon valvuloplasty may be done instead of surgery.A balloon is placed into an artery in the groin, threaded to the heart, placed across the valve, and inflated. However, narrowing often occurs again after this procedure., A newer procedure done at the same time as valvuloplasty can implant an artificial valve. This procedure is most often done in patients who cannot have surgery, but it\u00a0is becoming more common. . Some children may need aortic valve repair or replacement. Children with mild aortic stenosis may be able to take part in most activities."}, "Angiodysplasia of the colon": {"description": "Angiodysplasia of the colon is swollen, fragile blood vessels in the colon. This can result in blood loss from the gastrointestinal (GI) tract.", "Possible Complications": "Anemia, Death from excessive blood loss, Side effects from treatment, Severe loss of blood from the GI tract. ", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done to diagnose this condition include:Angiography (only useful if there is active bleeding into the colon), Complete blood count (CBC) to check for anemia, Colonoscopy, Stool test for occult (hidden) blood (a positive test result suggests bleeding from the colon). ", "Treatment": "It is important to determine what is causing the bleeding in the colon and how fast blood is being lost. You may need to be admitted to a hospital. Fluids may be given through a vein, and blood products may be required.Other treatment may be needed once the source of bleeding is found. Most patients stop bleeding on their own without any treatment.If treatment is needed, it may involve:Angiography to help block the blood vessel that is bleeding or to deliver medicine to help cause the blood vessels to tighten to stop the bleeding, Burning (cauterizing) the site of the bleed with heat or a laser using a colonoscope. In some instances, surgery is the only option. Removal of the entire right side of the colon (right hemicolectomy) may be done if heavy bleeding continues even after other treatments have been tried. Medicines (thalidomide and estrogens) may be used to help control the disease in some people. ", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention.", "Causes": "Angiodysplasia of the colon is mostly related to the aging and degeneration of the blood vessels. It is more common in older adults. It is almost always seen on the right side of the colon.Most likely, the problem develops out of normal spasms of the colon that lead to the enlargement of blood vessels in the area. When this swelling becomes severe, a tiny passageway develops between a small artery and vein. This is called an arteriovenous malformation. It is in this area of the colon wall that the patient is at risk for bleeding.Rarely, angiodysplasia of the colon is related to other diseases of the blood vessels, including Osler-Weber-Rendu syndrome. It is not related to cancer. It is also different than diverticulosis, which is a more common cause of intestinal bleeding in older adults."}, "ABO incompatibility": {"description": "When people who have one blood type receive blood from someone with a different blood type, it may cause their immune system to react. This is called ABO incompatibility. ", "Possible Complications": "Kidney failure, Low blood pressure needing intensive care, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Back pain", "Blood in urine", "Chills", "Feeling of \"impending doom\"", "Fever", "Yellow skin (jaundice)"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. Blood tests will usually show:Bilirubin level is high, Complete blood count (CBC) shows damage to red blood cells or anemia, The patient's and donor's blood are not compatible . Urine tests show the presence of hemoglobin due to breakdown of red blood cells. ", "Treatment": "Treatment may include:Drugs used to treat allergic reactions (antihistamines), Drugs used to treat swelling and allergies (steroids), Fluids given through a vein (intravenously), Medicines to raise blood pressure if it drops too low. ", "Prevention": "Careful testing of donor and patient blood types before transfusion or transplant can prevent this problem.", "Causes": "The different blood types are:Type A, Type B, Type AB, Type O . People who have one blood type may form proteins (antibodies) that cause their immune system to react against one or more of the other blood types. Being exposed to another type of blood can cause a reaction. This is important when a patient needs to receive blood (transfusion) or have an organ transplant. The blood types must be compatible to avoid an ABO incompatibility reaction.For example:A patient with type A blood will react against type B or type AB blood., A patient with type B blood will react against type A or type AB blood., A patient with type O blood will react against type A, type B, or type AB blood., A patient with type AB blood will not react against type A, type B, type AB, or type O blood. . Type O blood does not cause an immune response when it is given to people with type A, type B, or type AB blood. This is why type O blood cells can be given to patients of any blood type. People with type O blood are called universal donors. But people with type O can only receive type O blood.Both blood and plasma transfusions must be matched to avoid an immune reaction. Before anyone receives blood, both the blood and the person receiving it are tested carefully to avoid a reaction. Usually a reaction occurs because of a clerical error causing a patient to receive incompatible blood."}, "ACE blood test": {"description": "The ACE test measures the level of angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) in the blood."}, "Anterior cruciate ligament (ACL) injury - aftercare": {"description": "An ACL injury occurs when the ligament is stretched or torn. A partial ACL tear occurs when only part of the ligament is torn. A complete ACL tear occurs when the entire ligament is torn into two pieces."}, "Alport syndrome": {"description": "Alport syndrome is an inherited disorder that damages the tiny blood vessels in the kidneys.", "Possible Complications": "Chronic kidney disease, Deafness, Decrease or loss of vision, End-stage renal disease. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal urine color", "Ankle, feet, and leg swelling", "Blood in the urine (may be made worse by upper respiratory infections or exercise)", "Decreased or loss of vision (more common in males)", "Flank pain", "Loss of hearing (more common in males)", "Swelling around the eyes", "Swelling overall"], "Exams and Tests": "Signs include:Changes to the eye, including the fundus (back inner part of the eye), cataracts, or bulging of the lens (lenticonus), High blood pressure. The following tests may be done:Audiometry, BUN and serum creatinine, Complete blood count, Renal biopsy, Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment include monitoring and controlling the disease and treating the symptoms. It is most important to strictly control blood pressure. Angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitors and angiotensin receptor blockers can control blood pressure and slow the rate at which the disease gets worse.You may need to treat chronic kidney disease. This can include changing the diet, limiting fluids, and other treatments. Chronic kidney disease will progress to end-stage kidney disease. This will require dialysis or a kidney transplant.Surgery to repair cataracts (cataract extraction) or a bulging of the lens in the eye may be needed.Hearing loss is likely to be permanent. Counseling and education to increase coping skills can be helpful. Learning new skills such as lip reading or sign language and getting hearing aids may help. Young men with Alport syndrome should use hearing protection in noisy environments.Genetic counseling may be recommended because the disorder is inherited.", "Prevention": "This uncommon disorder is inherited. Awareness of risk factors, such as a family history of the disorder, may allow the condition to be detected early.", "Causes": "Alport syndrome is an inherited form of kidney inflammation (nephritis). It is caused by a mutation in a gene for a protein in the connective tissue, called collagen.The disorder is uncommon. It most often affects males. Women can pass the gene for the disorder to their children, even if they have no symptoms.Risk factors include:End-stage kidney disease in male relatives, Family history of Alport syndrome, Hearing loss before age 30. "}, "Anti-glomerular basement membrane": {"description": "Anti-glomerular basement membrane antibodies are antibodies against this membrane. They can lead to kidney damage. This article describes the blood test to detect these antibodies."}, "Anaphylaxis": {"description": "Anaphylaxis is a life-threatening type of allergic reaction.", "Possible Complications": "Airway blockage, Cardiac arrest (no effective heartbeat), Respiratory arrest (no breathing), Shock. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Abnormal (high-pitched) breathing sounds", "Anxiety", "Chest discomfort or tightness", "Cough", "Diarrhea", "Difficulty breathing", "Difficulty swallowing", "Dizziness or light-headedness\u00a0", "Hives, itchiness", "Nasal congestion", "Nausea or\u00a0vomiting", "Palpitations", "Skin redness", "Slurred speech", "Swelling of the face, eyes, or tongue", "Unconsciousness", "Wheezing "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will examine the person and ask about what might have caused the condition.Tests for the allergen that caused anaphylaxis (if the cause is not obvious) may be done after treatment.", "Treatment": "Anaphylaxis is an emergency condition that needs medical attention right away. Call 911 immediately.Check the person's airway, breathing, and circulation (the ABC's of Basic Life Support). A warning sign of dangerous throat swelling is a very hoarse or whispered voice, or coarse sounds when the person is breathing in air. If necessary, begin rescue breathing and CPR.Call 911.Calm and reassure the person.If the allergic reaction is from a bee sting, scrape the stinger off the skin with something firm (such as a fingernail or plastic credit card). Do not use tweezers -- squeezing the stinger will release more venom.If the person has emergency allergy medicine on hand, help the person take or inject the medication. Avoid oral medication if the person is having difficulty breathing.Take steps to prevent shock. Have the person lie flat, raise the person's feet about 12 inches, and cover him or her with a coat or blanket. Do\u00a0not place the person in this position if a head, neck, back, or leg injury is suspected, or if it causes discomfort. DO NOT:Do\u00a0not assume that any allergy shots the person has already received will provide complete protection., Do\u00a0not place a pillow under the person's head if he or she is having trouble breathing. This can block the airways., Do\u00a0not give the person anything by mouth if the person is having trouble breathing. . Paramedics or other health care providers may place a tube through the nose or mouth into the airways (endotracheal intubation). Or emergency surgery will be done to place a tube directly into the trachea (tracheostomy or cricothyrotomy).The person may receive medicines to further reduce symptoms.", "Prevention": "Avoid triggers such as foods and medications that have caused an allergic reaction in the past. Ask detailed questions about ingredients when you are eating away from home. Also carefully examine ingredient labels., If you have a child who is allergic to certain foods, introduce one new food at a time in small amounts so you can recognize an allergic reaction., People who know that they have had serious allergic reactions should wear a medical ID tag., If you have a history of serious allergic reactions, carry emergency medications (such as a chewable antihistamine and injectable epinephrine or a bee sting kit) according to your health care provider's instructions., Do not use your injectable epinephrine on anyone else. They may have a condition (such as a heart problem) that could be worsened by this drug.. ", "Causes": "Anaphylaxis is a severe, whole-body allergic reaction to a chemical that has become an allergen. An allergen is a substance that can cause an allergic reaction. After being exposed to a substance such as bee sting venom, the person's immune system becomes sensitized to it. When the person is exposed to that allergen again, an allergic reaction may occur. Anaphylaxis happens quickly after the exposure. The condition is severe and involves the whole body.Tissues in different parts of the body release histamine and other substances. This causes the airways to tighten and leads to other symptoms.Some drugs (morphine, x-ray dye, aspirin, and others) may cause an anaphylactic-like reaction (anaphylactoid reaction) when people are first exposed to them. These reactions are not the same as the immune system response that occurs with true anaphylaxis. But, the symptoms, risk of complications, and treatment are the same for both types of reactions.Anaphylaxis can occur in response to any allergen. Common causes include:Drug allergies, Food allergies, Insect bites/stings. Pollen and other inhaled allergens rarely cause anaphylaxis. Some people have an anaphylactic reaction with no known cause.Anaphylaxis is life-threatening and can occur at any time. Risks include a history of any type of allergic reaction."}, "Achalasia": {"description": "Achalasia is a disorder of the esophagus, the tube that carries food from the mouth to the stomach. This condition affects the ability of the esophagus to move food into the stomach.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Backflow (regurgitation) of acid or food from the stomach into the esophagus (reflux), Breathing food contents into the lungs (aspiration), which can cause pneumonia, Tearing (perforation) of the esophagus. ", "Symptoms": ["Backflow (regurgitation) of food", "Chest pain, which may increase after eating or may be felt in the back, neck, and arms", "Cough", " \r\n Difficulty swallowing liquids and solids", "Heartburn", "Unintentional weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Physical exam may show signs of anemia or malnutrition.Tests include:Esophageal manometry, Esophagogastroduodenoscopy, Upper GI x-ray. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce the pressure at the lower esophageal sphincter. Therapy may involve:Injection with botulinum toxin (Botox). This may help relax the sphincter muscles. However, the benefit wears off within a few weeks or months., Medications, such as long-acting nitrates or calcium channel blockers. These drugs can be used to relax the lower esophagus sphincter., Surgery (called an esophagomyotomy). This procedure may be needed to decrease the pressure in the lower sphincter., Widening (dilation) of the esophagus at the location of the narrowing. This is done during esophagogastroduodenoscopy.. Your doctor can help you decide which treatment is best for you.", "Prevention": "Many of the causes of achalasia cannot be prevented. However, treatment may help to prevent complications.", "Causes": "There is a muscular ring at the point where the esophagus and stomach meet, called the lower esophageal sphincter. Normally, this muscle relaxes when you swallow. In people with achalasia, it does not relax\u00a0as well. In addition, the normal muscle activity of the esophagus (peristalsis) is reduced.This problem is caused by damage to the nerves of the esophagus.Other problems can cause similar symptoms, such as cancer of the esophagus or upper stomach, and a parasite infection that causes Chagas disease. Achalasia is rare. It may occur at any age, but is most common in middle-aged or older adults. The problem may be inherited in some people."}, "Antistreptolysin O titer": {"description": "Antistreptolysin O (ASO) titer is a blood test to measure antibodies against streptolysin O, a substance produced by group A Streptococcus bacteria. Antibodies are proteins our bodies produce when they detect harmful substances, such as bacteria."}, "After vaginal delivery - in the hospital": {"description": "Most women will remain in the hospital for 24 hours after delivery. Take advantage of this time to bond with your new baby, get some rest, and receive some help with breastfeeding and caring for your baby. "}, "Adrenoleukodystrophy": {"description": "Adrenoleukodystrophy describes several closely related inherited disorders that disrupt the breakdown (metabolism) of certain fats (very long chain fatty acids).", "Possible Complications": "Adrenal crisis, Vegetative state (long-term coma). ", "Symptoms": ["Changes in muscle tone, especially muscle spasms and spasticity", "Crossed eyes (strabismus)", "Decreased understanding of verbal communication (aphasia)", "Deterioration of handwriting", "Difficulty at school", "Difficulty understanding spoken material", "Hearing loss", "Hyperactivity", "Worsening nervous system deterioration, including coma, decreased fine motor control, and paralysis\u00a0\r\n\r\n \r\n ", "Seizures", "Swallowing difficulties", "Visual impairment or blindness", "Difficulty controlling urination", "Possible worsening muscle weakness or leg stiffness", "Problems with thinking speed and visual memory", "Coma", "Decreased appetite", "Increased skin color (pigmentation)", "Loss of weight, muscle mass (wasting)", "Muscle weakness", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood levels of very long chain fatty acids and hormones that are produced by the adrenal gland, Chromosome study to look for changes (mutations) in the ABCD1 gene, MRI of the head . ", "Treatment": "Adrenal dysfunction my be treated with steroids (such as cortisol) if the adrenal gland is not producing enough hormones.A specific treatment for X-linked adrenoleukodystrophy is not available, but bone marrow transplantation can be performed and can cure patients of the condition.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for prospective parents with a family history of X-linked adrenoleukodystrophy. Mothers of affected sons have an 85% chance of being a carrier for this condition.Prenatal diagnosis of X-linked adrenoleukodystrophy is also available. It is done by evaluating cells from chorionic villus sampling or amniocentesis for either a known genetic change in the family or for very long chain fatty acid levels.", "Causes": "Adrenoleukodystrophy is usually passed down from parent to child as an X-linked genetic trait. It therefore affects mostly males, although some women who are carriers can have milder forms of the disease. It affects approximately 1 in 20,000 people from all races.The condition results in the buildup of very-long-chain fatty acids in the nervous system, adrenal gland, and testes, which disrupts normal activity. There are three major categories of disease:Childhood cerebral form -- appears in mid-childhood (at ages 4 - 8), Adrenomyelopathy -- occurs in men in their 20s or later in life, Impaired adrenal gland function (called Addison disease or Addison-like phenotype) -- adrenal gland does not produce enough steroid hormones. "}, "Androgen insensitivity syndrome": {"description": "Androgen insensitivity syndrome (AIS) is when a person who is genetically male (who has one X and one Y chromosome) is resistant to male hormones (called androgens). As a result, the person has some or all of the physical traits of a woman, but the genetic makeup of a man.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include: Infertility, Psychological and social issues, Testicular cancer. ", "Symptoms": ["A vagina but no cervix or uterus", "Inguinal hernia with testes that can be felt during a physical exam", "Normal female breasts", "Testes in the abdomen or other unusual places in the body "], "Exams and Tests": "Complete AIS is rarely discovered during childhood. Sometimes, a growth is felt in the abdomen or groin that turns out to be a testicle when it is explored with surgery. Most people with this condition are not diagnosed until they do not get a menstrual period or they have trouble getting pregnant.Incomplete AIS is often discovered during childhood because the person may have both male and female physical traits.Tests used to diagnose this condition may include:Blood work to check levels of testosterone, luteinizing hormone (LH), and follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH), Genetic testing (karyotype) to determine the person's genetic makeup\u00a0, Pelvic ultrasound. Other blood tests may be done to help tell the difference between AIS and androgen deficiency.", "Treatment": "Testicles that are in the wrong place may not be removed until a child finishes growing and goes through puberty. At this time, the testes may be removed because they can develop cancer, just\u00a0like any undescended testicle.Estrogen replacement is prescribed after puberty.Treatment and gender assignment can be a very complex issue, and must be targeted to each individual person.", "Causes": "Androgen insensitivity syndrome (AIS) is caused by genetic defects on the X chromosome. These defects make the body unable to respond to the hormones that produce a male appearance.The syndrome is divided into two main categories:Complete AIS, Incomplete AIS. Complete androgen insensitivity prevents the penis and other male body parts from developing. At birth, the child looks like a girl. The complete form of the syndrome occurs in as many as 1 in 20,000 live births.In incomplete AIS, people have different numbers of male traits. Incomplete AIS can include other disorders, such as: Failure of one or both testes to descend into the scrotum after birth, Hypospadias, a condition in which the opening of the urethra is on the underside of the penis, instead of at the tip, Reifenstein syndrome (also known as Gilbert-Dreyfus syndrome or Lubs syndrome) . Infertile male syndrome is also considered to be part of incomplete AIS. "}, "Acid mucopolysaccharides": {"description": "Mucopolysaccharides are long chains of sugar molecules in the body. They are often found in mucus and in fluid around the joints."}, "Aging changes in vital signs": {"description": "As You Grow Older, You Will Have Other Changes, Including:"}, "Abdominal rigidity": {"description": "Abdominal rigidity is stiffness of the muscles in the belly area, which can be felt when touched or pressed.", "Causes": "Causes can include:Abscess inside the abdomen, Appendicitis, Cholecystitis caused by gallstones, Hole that develops through the entire wall of the stomach, small intestine, large bowel, or gallbladder (gastrointestinal perforation), Injury to the abdomen, Peritonitis. "}, "Appetite - decreased": {"description": "A decreased appetite is when your desire to eat is reduced. The medical term for a loss of appetite is anorexia.", "Causes": "A decreased appetite is almost always seen among elderly adults, and no physical cause may be found. But emotions such as sadness, depression, or grief can lead to a loss of appetite. Cancer\u00a0can also cause decreased appetite. You may lose weight without trying. Cancers that may cause you to lose your appetite include:Colon cancer, Ovarian cancer, Stomach cancer, Pancreatic cancer . Other causes of decreased appetite include:Chronic liver disease, Chronic kidney failure, Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), Dementia, Heart failure, Hepatitis, HIV, Hypothyroidism, Pregnancy (first trimester), Use of certain medications, including antibiotics, chemotherapy drugs, codeine, and morphine, Use of street drugs, including amphetamines (speed), cocaine, and heroin . "}, "Angioplasty and stent - heart - discharge ": {"description": "You had angioplasty when you were in the hospital. You may have also had a stent placed. Both of these were done to open narrowed or blocked coronary arteries, the blood vessels that supply blood to your heart. You may have had a heart attack or angina (chest pain) before the procedure."}, "Aging changes in hair and nails": {"description": "As You Grow Older, You Will Have Other Changes, Including:"}, "Aging changes in the female reproductive system": {"description": "Other Aging Changes to Expect:"}, "Antithrombin III blood test": {"description": "Antithrombin III (AT III) is a protein that helps control blood clotting. A blood test can determine the amount of AT III present in your body. "}, "Asthma - control drugs": {"description": "Take the medicines even when you feel OK. Take enough with you when you travel. Plan ahead. Make sure you do not run out."}, "Antidiuretic hormone blood test": {"description": "Antidiuretic blood test measures the level of antidiuretic hormone (ADH) in blood. "}, "AST": {"description": "This article discusses the test to measure the amount of AST in the blood."}, "Anal itching - self-care": {"description": "Anal itching occurs when the skin around your anus becomes irritated. You may feel intense itching around and just inside the anus.", "Causes": "Anal itching may be caused by:Spicy foods, caffeine, alcohol, and other irritating foods and beverages, Scents or dyes in toilet paper or soap, Diarrhea, Hemorrhoids, which are swollen veins in or around your anus, Sexually transmitted infections (STIs), Taking antibiotics, Yeast infections, Parasites, such as pinworms, which more commonly occur in children . "}, "ACL reconstruction": {"description": "ACL reconstruction is surgery to rebuild the ligament in the center of your knee. The anterior cruciate ligament (ACL) keeps your shin bone (tibia) in place. A tear of this ligament can cause your knee to give way during physical activity."}, "Acrodermatitis": {"description": "Acrodermatitis is a childhood skin condition that may be accompanied by mild symptoms of fever and malaise. It may also be associated with hepatitis B and other viral infections.", "Possible Complications": "Complications occur as a result of associated conditions, rather than as a result of acrodermatitis. ", "Symptoms": ["Rash or patch on skin", "Brownish-red or copper-colored patch that is firm and flat on top", "String of bumps may appear in a line", "Generally not itchy", "Rash looks the same on both sides of the body", "Rash may appear on the palms and soles -- it does not occur on the back, chest, or belly area (this is one of the ways it is identified -- by the absence of the rash from the trunk of the body)", "Swollen abdomen", "Swollen lymph nodes", "Tender lymph nodes"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor can diagnose this condition by looking at the skin and rash. The liver, spleen, and lymph nodes may be swollen.The following tests may be done to confirm the diagnosis or rule out other conditions:Bilirubin level, Hepatitis virus serology or hepatitis B surface antigen, Liver enzymes (liver function tests), Screening for EBV antibodies, Serum zinc level may be tested in acrodermatitis enteropathica, Skin biopsy. ", "Treatment": "Acrodermatitis by itself is not treated. Infections associated with this condition, such as hepatitis B and Epstein-Barr, are treated. Cortisone creams may help with itching and irritation.Acrodermatitis enteropathica improves when the zinc levels in the body\u00a0is returned to normal.", "Causes": "The cause of acrodermatitis is poorly understood, but its link with other infections is well-documented.In Italian children, acrodermatitis is seen frequently with hepatitis B, but this link is rarely seen in the United States. Epstein-Barr virus (EBV, mononucleosis) is the virus most often associated with acrodermatitis. Other associated viruses include cytomegalovirus, coxsackie viruses, parainfluenza virus, respiratory syncytial virus (RSV), and some live virus vaccines.A rare, genetic form of acrodermatitis is acrodermatitis enteropathica. In this disorder, zinc is poorly absorbed from the diet. Adding zinc supplements to the diet improves the condition. This form of the disorder can be associated with other abnormalities and development delays."}, "Aortic insufficiency": {"description": "Aortic insufficiency is a heart valve disease in which the aortic valve does not close tightly. This allows blood to flow from the aorta (the largest blood vessel) into the left ventricle (a chamber of the heart).", "Possible Complications": "Abnormal heart rhythms, Heart failure, Infection in the heart. ", "Symptoms": ["Bounding pulse", "Chest pain\u00a0similar to\u00a0angina (rare)", "Fainting", "Fatigue", "Palpitations (sensation of the heart beating)", "Shortness of breath with activity or when lying down", "Swelling of the feet, legs, or abdomen", "Uneven, rapid, racing, pounding, or fluttering pulse", "Weakness that is more likely to occur with activity "], "Exams and Tests": "Signs may include:Heart murmur that can be heard through a stethoscope, Very forceful beating of the heart, Bobbing of the head in time with the heartbeat, Hard pulses in the arms and legs, Low diastolic blood pressure, Signs of fluid in the lungs . Aortic insufficiency may be seen on tests such as:Aortic angiography, Echocardiogram - ultrasound examination of the heart, Left heart catheterization, MRI of the heart, Transesophageal echocardiogram (TEE) . A chest x-ray may show swelling of the left lower heart chamber.Lab tests cannot diagnose aortic insufficiency. However, they may help rule out other causes.", "Treatment": "You may not need treatment if you have no symptoms or only mild symptoms. However, you will need to see a health care provider for get regular echocardiograms. If your blood pressure is high, you may need to take blood pressure medicines to help slow the worsening of aortic regurgitation.ACE inhibitor drugs and diuretics (water pills) may be prescribed for more moderate or severe symptoms.In the past, most patients with heart valve problems were given antibiotics before dental work or an invasive procedure, such as colonoscopy. The antibiotics were given to prevent an infection of the damaged heart. However, antibiotics are now used much less often. You may need to limit activity that requires more work from your heart. Talk to your health care provider.Surgery to repair or replace the aortic valve corrects aortic insufficiency. The decision to have aortic valve replacement depends on your symptoms and the condition and function of your heart.You may also need surgery to repair the aorta if it is widened.", "Prevention": "Blood pressure control is\u00a0very important if you are at risk for aortic regurgitation.", "Causes": "Any condition that prevents the aortic valve from closing completely can cause this problem. When the valve doesn't close all the way, a small amount of blood comes back each time the heart beats. This makes the heart have to work harder to force out enough blood. The left lower chamber of the heart widens (dilates) and the heart beats very strongly (bounding pulse). Over time, the heart becomes less able to supply enough blood to the body.In the past, rheumatic fever was the main cause of aortic insufficiency. The use of antibiotics to treat strep infections has made rheumatic fever less common. Therefore, aortic insufficiency is more commonly due to other causes. These include:Ankylosing spondylitis, Aortic dissection, Congenital (present at birth) valve problems, such as bicuspid valve, Endocarditis, High blood pressure, Marfan syndrome, Reiter syndrome (also known as reactive arthritis), Syphilis, Systemic lupus erythematosus . Aortic insufficiency is most common in men between the ages of 30 and 60."}, "Ankle pain": {"description": "Ankle pain involves any discomfort in one or both ankles.", "Causes": "Ankle pain is often due to an ankle sprain.An ankle sprain is an injury to the ligaments, which connect bones to one another., In most cases, the ankle is twisted inward, causing small tears in the ligaments. The tearing leads to swelling and bruising, making it difficult to bear weight on the joint.. In addition to ankle sprains, ankle pain can be caused by:Damage or swelling of tendons (which join muscles to bone) or cartilage (which cushions joints), Infection in the ankle joint, Osteoarthritis, gout, rheumatoid arthritis, Reiter syndrome, and other types of arthritis. Problems in areas near the ankle that can cause you to feel pain in the ankle include:Blockage of blood vessels in the leg, Heel pain or injuries, Nerve injuries (such as tarsal tunnel syndrome or sciatica) . "}, "Abdominal wall fat pad biopsy": {"description": "An abdominal wall fat pad biopsy is the removal of a small part of the abdominal wall fat pad. The procedure is done most often to test for amyloidosis."}, "Arachnodactyly": {"description": "Arachnodactyly is a condition in which the fingers are long, slender, and curved. They look like a spider's legs.", "Causes": "Homocystinuria, Marfan syndrome, Other rare genetic disorders. Note: Having long, slender fingers may be normal."}, "Adenoid removal": {"description": "Adenoid removal is also called adenoidectomy. The procedure is most often done in children."}, "Acetaminophen and codeine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing shallow", "Breathing slow and labored", "Respiratory arrest ", "Pinpoint pupils ", "Low blood pressure ", "Coma", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Stupor (lack of alertness) ", "Bluish skin (fingernails and lips)", "Cold, clammy skin", "Heavy sweating ", "Nausea and vomiting", "Spasms of the stomach and intestines", "Liver failure ", "Kidney failure "], "description": "See also:", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof containers and out of reach of children. Read all medication labels and take only medications which have been prescribed for you."}, "Anterior": {"description": "It usually refers to the front side of the body. For example, your knee caps are on the anterior\u00a0part of your body."}, "Alcohol use disorder": {"description": "Alcohol use disorder\u00a0is when your drinking causes serious problems in your life, yet you keep drinking. You may also need more and more alcohol to feel drunk. Stopping suddenly may cause withdrawal symptoms. ", "Possible Complications": "Alcohol use disorder can increase your risk of many health problems, including:Bleeding in the digestive tract, Brain cell damage, A brain disorder called Wernicke-Korsakoff syndrome, Cancer of the esophagus, liver, colon, and other areas, Changes in the menstrual cycle, Delirium tremens (DTs), Dementia and memory loss, Depression and suicide, Erectile dysfunction, Heart damage, High blood pressure, Inflammation of the pancreas (pancreatitis), Liver disease, including cirrhosis, Nerve damage, Poor nutrition, Sleeping problems (insomnia), Sexually transmitted infections (STIs) . Alcohol use also increases your risk for violence.Drinking alcohol while you are pregnant can lead to severe birth defects in the baby. This is called fetal alcohol syndrome. ", "Symptoms": ["Times when you drink more or longer than you planned to", "Wanted to, or tried to, cut down or stop drinking, but could not", "Spend a lot of time and effort to get alcohol, use it, or recover from its effects", "Crave alcohol or have a strong urge to use it", "Alcohol use is causing you to miss work or school, or you do not perform as well because of drinking", "Continue to drink, even when relationships with family and friends are being harmed", "Stop taking part in activities that you used to enjoy", "While or after drinking, you get into situations that can cause you to get hurt, such as driving, using machinery, or having unsafe sex", "Keep drinking, even though you know it is\u00a0making a health problem caused by alcohol worse", "Need more and more alcohol to feel its effects or to get drunk", "You get withdrawal symptoms when the effects of alcohol wear off"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will:Examine you, Ask about your medical and family history, Ask about your alcohol use, and if you have any of the symptoms listed above\u00a0. Your provider may order tests to check for health problems that are common in people who use alcohol. These tests may include:Blood alcohol level (This shows if you have recently been drinking alcohol. It does not diagnose alcohol use disorder.), Complete blood count, Liver function tests, Magnesium blood test. ", "Treatment": "Many people with an alcohol problem need to completely stop using alcohol. This is called abstinence. Having strong social and family support can help make it easier to quit drinking.Some people are able to just cut back on their drinking. So even if you do not give up alcohol altogether, you may be able to drink less. This can improve your health and relationships with others. It can also help you perform better at work or school.However, many people who drink too much find they cannot just cut back. Abstinence may be the only way to manage a drinking problem.DECIDING TO QUITLike many people with an alcohol problem, you may not recognize that your drinking has gotten out of hand. An important first step is to be aware of how much you drink. It also helps to understand the health risks of alcohol.If you decide to quit drinking, talk with your health care provider. Treatment involves helping you realize how much your alcohol use is harming your life and the lives those around you. Depending on how much and how long you have been drinking, you may be at risk for alcohol withdrawal. Withdrawal can be very uncomfortable and even life-threatening. If you have been drinking a lot, you should cut back or stop drinking only under the care of a doctor. Talk with your health care provider about how to stop using alcohol.LONG-TERM SUPPORTAlcohol recovery or support programs can help you stop drinking completely. These programs usually offer:Education about alcohol use\u00a0and its effects, Counseling and therapy to discuss how to control your thoughts and behaviors, Physical health care . For the best chance of success, you should live with people who support your efforts to avoid alcohol. Some programs offer housing options for people with alcohol problems. Depending on your needs and the programs that are available:You may be treated in a special recovery center (inpatient), You may attend a program while you live at home (outpatient) . You may be prescribed medicines to help you quit. They are often used with long-term counseling or support groups. These\u00a0medicines make it less likely that you will drink again or help limit the amount you drink.Drinking may mask depression or other mood or anxiety disorders. If you have a mood disorder, it may become more noticeable when you stop drinking. Your health care provider will treat any mental disorders in addition to your alcohol treatment.", "Prevention": "The National Institute on Alcohol Abuse and Alcoholism recommends:Women should not drink more than 1 drink per day, Men should not drink more than 2 drinks per day. ", "Causes": "No one knows what causes problems with alcohol. Health experts think that it may be a combination of a person's:Genes, Environment, Psychology, such as being impulsive or having low self-esteem . Drinking a lot of alcohol can put you at risk for alcohol problems if:You are a man who has 15 or more drinks a week, or often have 5 or more drinks at a time, You are a woman who has 12 or more drinks a week, or often have 4 or more drinks at a time. One drink is defined as a 12-ounce bottle of beer, a 5-ounce glass of wine, or a 1 1/2-ounce shot of liquor.If you have a parent with alcohol use disorder, you are more at risk for alcohol problems. You also may be more likely to\u00a0have problems with\u00a0alcohol if you:Are a young adult under peer pressure, Have depression, bipolar disorder, anxiety disorders, or schizophrenia, Can easily obtain\u00a0alcohol, Have low self-esteem, Have problems with relationships, Live a stressful lifestyle . If you are concerned about your drinking, it may help to take a careful look at your alcohol use."}, "Aldosterone blood test": {"description": "Aldosterone can also be measured using a urine test."}, "Acute tubular necrosis": {"description": "Acute tubular necrosis is a kidney disorder involving damage to the tubule cells of the kidneys, which can lead to acute kidney failure.", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding from the gastrointestinal tract, Chronic kidney disease and permanent kidney damage, High blood pressure, Increased risk of infection. ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased consciousness, coma, delirium or confusion, drowsy, lethargic, hard to arouse", "Decreased urine output or no urine output", "General swelling, fluid retention", "Nausea, vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. Your doctor may hear abnormal sounds when listening to the heart and lungs with a stethoscope (auscultation). This is due to too much fluid in the body.Other tests that may be done include:BUN and serum creatinine, Fractional excretion of sodium, Kidney biopsy, Urinalysis, Urine sodium, Urine specific gravity and osmolarity urine. ", "Treatment": "In most people, ATN is reversible. The goal of treatment is to prevent life-threatening complications of acute kidney failure.Treatment focuses on preventing the excess buildup of fluids and wastes, while allowing the kidneys to heal. Patients should be watched closely for deterioration of kidney function.Treatment can include:Identifying and treating the underlying cause of the problem, Restricting fluid intake to a volume equal to the volume of urine produced, Restricting substances normally removed by the kidneys (such as protein, sodium, potassium) to minimize their buildup in the body, Taking medications to help control potassium levels in the bloodstream, Medicines taken by mouth or through an IV to help remove fluid from the body. Temporary dialysis can remove excess waste and fluids. This can make you feel better, and may make the kidney failure easier to control. Dialysis may not be necessary for all people, but is often lifesaving, especially if serum potassium is dangerously high.Dialysis may be needed in the following cases:Decreased mental status, Fluid overload, Increased potassium levels, Pericarditis, To remove toxins that are dangerous to the kidneys, Total lack of urine production, Uncontrolled buildup of nitrogen waste products. ", "Prevention": "Promptly treating conditions that can lead to decreased blood flow as well as\u00a0decreased oxygen to the kidneys can reduce the risk of acute tubular necrosis.Blood transfusions are crossmatched to reduce the risk of incompatibility reactions.Control conditions such as diabetes, liver disorders, and cardiac disorders to reduce the risk of acute tubular necrosis.Carefully monitor exposure to medications that can be toxic to the kidney. Have your blood levels of these medications checked regularly. Drink a lot of fluids after having any radiocontrast dyes to allow them to be removed from the body and reduce the risk of kidney damage.", "Causes": "Acute tubular necrosis (ATN) is usually caused by a\u00a0lack of oxygen to the kidney tissues (ischemia of the kidneys). It may also occur if the kidney cells are damaged by a poison or harmful substance.The internal structures of the kidney, particularly the tissues of the kidney tubule, become damaged or destroyed. ATN is one of the most common structural changes that can lead to acute renal failure.ATN is one of the most common causes of kidney failure in hospitalized patients. Risks for acute tubular necrosis include:Blood transfusion reaction, Injury or trauma that damages the muscles, Low blood pressure (hypotension) that lasts longer than 30 minutes, Recent major surgery, Septic shock due to severe infection. Liver disease and kidney damage caused by diabetes (diabetic nephropathy) may make a person more susceptible to the condition.ATN can also be caused by:Dye (contrast) used for x-ray (radiology) studies, Medications that are toxic to the kidneys (such as aminoglycoside antibiotics or amphotericin). "}, "Amitriptyline and perphenazine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing - slowed and labored", "Urinary hesitancy", "Inability to completely empty the bladder", "Blurred vision", "Dry mouth", "Enlarged pupils", "Nasal congestion", "Unpleasant taste", "Irregular heartbeat", "Low blood pressure (severe)", "Rapid heartbeat", "Shock", "Muscle rigidity", "Muscle spasms", "Stiff muscles in neck, face, or back", "Agitation", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Convulsions", "Disorientation", "Drowsiness", "Fever", "Lack of alertness (stupor)", "Lower than normal body temperature (hypothermia)", "Restlessness", "Seizures", "Uncoordinated movement", "Tremor", "Weakness", "Change in menstrual patterns", "Itchy skin", "Rash", "Constipation", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Asymptomatic HIV infection": {"description": "Asymptomatic HIV infection is a phase of chronic infection with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) during which there are no symptoms of HIV infection.", "Possible Complications": "People with asymptomatic infection can progress to symptomatic HIV infection, develop opportunistic infections associated with HIV, and transmit HIV to other people. In addition, pregnant women with asymptomatic HIV infection can still transmit HIV to their fetus.", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "Opportunistic infections, which are infections that\u00a0occur because a weakened immune system can't fight them off. Serious ones include Pneumocystis jirovecii pneumonia, cytomegalovirus, and Mycobacterium avium.", "Oral thrush", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask questions about your medical history and symptoms. A diagnosis of HIV infection is based on results from blood tests, including\u00a0the HIV antibody test (ELISA). A Western blot confirms the diagnosis.Blood tests to check the level of a type of white blood cell called helper T lymphocytes (CD4 lymphocytes) are also done. The test result helps your doctor understand how well your immune system is working. ", "Treatment": "When a person without symptoms of AIDs should receive therapy remains controversial. Those who do not have symptoms but who have CD4 lymphocyte counts of less than\u00a0350 should receive anti-viral treatment. This therapy helps the immune system better fight the virus and prevents other\u00a0infections.Most doctors also recommend antiretroviral therapy for some individuals with CD4 counts between 350-500, and perhaps for those with even higher CD4 counts (depending on the level of HIV in the person's blood). Other things besides blood test results must be considered. This includes the patient's overall health and how well he or she is able to adhere to a treatment plan. ", "Prevention": "You can lower the risk of sexually transmitting the HIV infection by practicing safer sex behaviors, as well as avoiding contact with contaminated blood (not using injection drugs or not sharing needles or syringes).Abstinence is the only absolutely sure way to prevent sexual transmission of the virus.People who have had positive HIV antibody tests should not donate blood, plasma, body organs, or sperm. They should not exchange genital fluids during sexual activity.People at risk for HIV infection should have regular testing to ensure early diagnosis of this infection, as many treatment options are available.", "Causes": "Asymptomatic HIV infection is phase in which the immune system in someone with HIV slowly deteriorates, but the person has no symptoms. How long this phase lasts depends on how quickly the HIV virus copies itself, and how the person's genes affects the way the body handles the virus. Some people can go 10 years or longer without symptoms. Others may have symptoms and worsening immune function within a few years after the original infection."}, "Arterial stick": {"description": "An arterial stick is the collection of blood from an artery for laboratory testing."}, "Aerobic": {"description": "Aerobic is the opposite of anaerobic."}, "Anthrax - blood test": {"description": "The anthrax blood test looks for antibodies against B. anthracis, the bacteria that cause anthrax."}, "Antinuclear antibody panel": {"description": "Antinuclear antibodies are substances produced by the immune system that attack the body's own tissues."}, "Anti-insulin antibody test": {"description": "The anti-insulin antibody test checks to see if your body has produced antibodies against insulin."}, "Alcohol use and safe drinking": {"description": "Alcohol use involves drinking beer, wine, or hard liquor."}, "Asphalt cement": {"Symptoms": ["Severe change in acid levels in the blood", "Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the food pipe (esophagus)", "Intestinal blockage", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting (may contain blood)", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Breathing difficulty (from breathing in asphalt)", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Burns", "Irritation", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Allergies, asthma, and molds": {"description": "Allergic rhinitis - mold"}, "Allergen": {"description": "An allergen is a substance that can cause an allergic reaction.\u00a0 In some people, the immune system thinks allergens are foreign or dangerous. This is what leads to allergy symptoms. "}, "Amniotic fluid": {"description": "Amniotic fluid is a clear, slightly yellowish liquid that surrounds the unborn baby (fetus) during pregnancy. It\u00a0is contained in the amniotic sac."}, "Arm CT scan": {"description": "A computed tomography (CT) scan of the arm is an imaging method that uses x-rays to make cross-sectional pictures of the arm."}, "Amitriptyline hydrochloride overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Slowed, labored breathing", "Inability to urinate", "Urinary hesitancy", "Blurred vision", "Dry mouth", "Enlarged pupils", "Low blood pressure", "Irregular heart rate", "Shock", "Agitation", "Coma (sudden onset)", "Convulsions (sudden onset)", "Drowsiness", "Hallucinations", "Headache", "Inability to concentrate", "Lack of alertness (stupor)", "Muscle rigidity", "Restlessness", "Seizures", "Uncoordinated movement", "Constipation", "Increased appetite", "Weight gain", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Aging changes in organs - tissue - cells": {"description": "As you grow older, you will have changes throughout your body, including changes in:\r\n"}, "Aneurysm": {"description": "An aneurysm is an abnormal widening or ballooning of a part of an artery due to weakness in the wall of the blood vessel.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam.Tests used to diagnose an aneurysm include:CT scan, Ultrasound, Angiogram. ", "Causes": "It is not clear exactly what causes aneurysms. Some aneurysms are present at birth (congenital). Defects in some parts of the artery wall may be a cause.Common locations for aneurysms include:Major artery from the heart (the aorta), Brain (cerebral aneurysm), Behind the knee in the leg (popliteal artery aneurysm), Intestine (mesenteric artery aneurysm), Artery in the spleen (splenic artery aneurysm) . High blood pressure, high cholesterol, and cigarette smoking may raise your risk of certain types of aneurysms. High blood pressure is thought to play a role in abdominal aortic aneurysms. Atherosclerotic disease (cholesterol buildup in arteries) may also lead to the formation of some aneurysms.Pregnancy is often linked to the formation and rupture of splenic artery aneurysms.", "Prevention": "Controlling high blood pressure may help prevent some aneurysms. Follow a healthy diet, get regular exercise, and keep your cholesterol at a healthy level\u00a0to also help prevent aneurysms or their complications.Do not smoke. If you do smoke, quitting will lower your risk of an aneurysm.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the size and location of the aneurysm. Your doctor may only recommend regular checkups to see if the aneurysm is growing.Surgery may be done. The type of surgery that is done and when you need it depend on your symptoms and the size and type of aneurysm. Surgery may involve a large (open) surgical cut. However, some patients may have endovascular embolization. Coils of metal may be inserted into a brain aneurysm to make the aneurysm clot and reduce the risk of rupture. Other brain aneurysms may need to have a clip placed on them to close them off and prevent a rupture.Aneurysms of the aorta may be reinforced with surgery to strengthen the blood vessel wall. "}, "Achilles tendon repair": {"description": "Surgery to repair the Achilles tendon is done if your Achilles tendon has been torn into 2 pieces."}, "Amylase - blood": {"description": "Amylase may also be measured with a urine test. See amylase - urine."}, "Allergy testing - skin": {"description": "Allergy skin tests are used to find out which substances cause a person to have an allergic reaction."}, "Asymptomatic bacteriuria": {"description": "The condition may not need treatment. This makes it different from a urinary tract infection that is caused by bacteria.", "Possible Complications": "If it is not treated, asymptomatic bacteriuria can lead to a kidney infection in people at high risk .", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "A urine culture is taken from a urine sample. Asymptomatic bacteriuria is diagnosed if there is a large overgrowth of bacteria in the urine culture. ", "Treatment": "Some people are more likely to be given antibiotics. These include pregnant women, people who have received a kidney transplant, children with vesicoureteral reflux, and those with infected kidney stones.Giving antibiotics to persons who have long-term urinary catheters in place may cause additional problems. The bacteria may be harder to treat and a yeast infection may develop.This condition should be treated if it is discovered before a urinary tract procedure. This may help prevent complications. The type of treatment will depend on the person's risk factors.", "Causes": "Asymptomatic bacteriuria occurs in a small number of healthy people. It affects women more often than men. The reasons for the lack of symptoms are not well understood.Most people who have this condition do not need treatment because the bacteria are not causing any harm. People who have urinary catheters often will have bacteriuria, but most will not have symptoms.Certain people are at a higher risk for kidney infections if they develop this problem. The following increases your risk:Diabetes, Infected kidney stones, Kidney transplant, Older age, Pregnancy -- up to 40% of pregnant women with untreated asymptomatic bacteriuria will develop a kidney infection, Vesicoureteral reflux (backward movement of urine from the bladder into ureters or kidneys) in young children . "}, "Acute cholecystitis": {"description": "See also: Chronic cholecystitis", "Possible Complications": "Empyema (pus in the gallbladder), Gangrene, Injury to the bile ducts draining the liver (may occur after gallbladder surgery), Pancreatitis, Perforation, Peritonitis (inflammation of the lining of the abdomen) . ", "Symptoms": ["Sharp, cramping, or dull pain", "Steady pain", "Pain that spreads to\u00a0your back or below\u00a0your right shoulder blade ", "Clay-colored stools", "Fever", "Nausea and vomiting", "Yellowing of skin and whites of the eyes (jaundice) "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam will show that it hurts to touch your belly.Your doctor may order the following blood tests:Amylase and lipase, Bilirubin, Complete blood count (CBC), Liver function tests. Imaging tests can show gallstones or inflammation. You may have one of these tests:Abdominal ultrasound, Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal x-ray, Oral cholecystogram, Gallbladder radionuclide scan. ", "Treatment": "If you have severe belly pain, seek medical attention right away.In the emergency room, you'll be given fluids through a vein. You also may be given antibiotics to fight infection.Cholecystitis may clear up on its own. However, if you have gallstones, you will probably need surgery to remove your gallbladder. Nonsurgical treatment includes:Antibiotics to fight infection, Low-fat diet (if you are able to eat), Pain medicines . You may need emergency surgery if you have complications such as:Gangrene (tissue death), Perforation (a hole that forms in the wall of the gallbladder), Pancreatitis (inflamed pancreas), Persistent bile duct blockage, Inflammation of the common bile duct . If you are very ill, a tube may be placed in your gallbladder and through your skin to drain it. Then, once you are feeling better, you may have surgery.", "Prevention": "Removing the gallbladder and gallstones will prevent further attacks.", "Causes": "The gallbladder is an organ that sits below the liver. It stores bile, which your body uses to digest fats in the small intestine. Acute cholecystitis occurs when bile becomes trapped in the gallbladder. This often happens because a gallstone blocks the cystic duct. This is the tube that bile travels into and out of the gallbladder. When a stone blocks this duct, bile builds up, causing irritation and pressure in the gallbladder. This can lead to swelling and infection.Other causes include:Serious illnesses such as HIV or diabetes, Tumors of the gallbladder (rare) . Some people are more at risk for gallstones. Risk factors include:Being female, Pregnancy, Hormone therapy, Older age, Being Native American or Hispanic, Obesity, Losing or gaining weight rapidly, Diabetes . Sometimes the bile duct becomes blocked temporarily. When this occurs repeatedly, it can lead to chronic cholecystitis. This is swelling and irritation that continues over time. Eventually, the gallbladder becomes thick and hard. It also does not\u00a0store and release bile as well. "}, "Anemia - B12 deficiency": {"description": "Vitamin B12 deficiency anemia is a low red blood cell count due to a lack of vitamin B12.", "Possible Complications": "A woman with a low B12 level may have a false positive Pap smear. This is because vitamin B12 deficiency affects the way certain cells (epithelial cells) in the cervix look.", "Symptoms": ["Diarrhea or constipation", "Fatigue, lack of energy, or light-headedness when standing up or with exertion", "Loss of appetite", "Pale skin", "Problems concentrating", "Shortness of breath, mostly during exercise", "Swollen, red tongue or bleeding gums ", "Confusion or change in mental status (dementia) in severe cases", "Depression", "Loss of balance", "Numbness and tingling of hands and feet "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam. This may reveal problems with your reflexes. Tests that may be done include: Complete blood count (CBC), Reticulocyte count, LDH level, Vitamin B12 level . Other procedures that may be done include:Esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD) to examine the stomach, Enteroscopy to examine the small intestine, Bone marrow biopsy if the diagnosis is not clear. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of B12 deficiency anemia. The goal of treatment is to increase your vitamin B12 level.Treatment may include a shot of vitamin B12 once a month. Persons with a severely low level of B12 may need more shots in the beginning. You may need shots every month for the rest of your life. , Some patients may also need to take vitamin B12 supplements by mouth. For some people, high-dose vitamin B12 tablets taken by mouth work well, and shots are not needed.. Treatment may no longer be needed after Crohn disease, celiac disease, or alcoholism is properly treated.Your doctor or nurse will also recommend eating a well-balanced diet.", "Prevention": "You can prevent anemia caused by a lack of vitamin B12 by following a well-balanced diet. Shots of vitamin B12 can prevent anemia after surgeries known to cause vitamin B12 deficiency. Early diagnosis and prompt treatment can reduce or prevent complications related to a low vitamin B12 level.", "Causes": "Your body needs vitamin B12 to make red blood cells. In order to provide vitamin B12 to your cells:You must eat plenty of foods that contain vitamin B12, such as meat, poultry, shellfish, eggs, and dairy products., Your body must absorb enough vitamin B12. A special protein, called intrinsic factor, helps your body do this. This protein is released by cells in the stomach. . A lack of vitamin B12 may be due to dietary factors, including:Eating a vegetarian diet, Poor diet in infants, Poor nutrition during pregnancy . Certain health conditions can make it difficult for your body to absorb enough vitamin B12. They include:Chronic alcoholism, Crohn disease, celiac disease, infection with the fish tapeworm, or other problems that make it difficult for your body to digest foods, Pernicious anemia, a type of vitamin B12 anemia that occurs when your body destroys cells that make intrinsic factor, Surgeries that remove certain parts of your stomach or small intestine, such as some weight-loss surgeries, Taking antacids and other heartburn medicines for a long period of time . "}, "Antithyroid microsomal antibody": {"description": "Antithyroid microsomal antibody is a test to measure antithyroid microsomal antibodies in the blood. Microsomes are found inside thyroid cells. The body produces antibodies to microsomes when there has been damage to thyroid cells."}, "Anterior knee pain": {"description": "Anterior knee pain is pain that occurs at the front and center of the knee. It can be caused by many different problems, including:", "Possible Complications": "\u00a0", "Symptoms": ["Behind the kneecap (patella)", "Below the kneecap", "On the sides of the kneecap ", "Deep knee bends", "Going down stairs", "Running downhill", "Standing up after sitting for awhile "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. The knee may be tender and mildly swollen. Also, the kneecap may not be perfectly lined up with the thigh bone (femur).When you flex your knee, you may feel a grinding feeling below the kneecap. Pressing the kneecap when the knee is straightening out may be painful.Your provider may want you to do a single leg squat to look at muscle imbalance and your core stabilityX-rays are very often normal. However, a special x-ray view of the kneecap may show signs of arthritis or tilting.MRI scans are rarely needed.", "Treatment": "Resting the knee for a short period of time and taking nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) such as ibuprofen, naproxen, or aspirin may help relieve pain. Other things you can do to relieve anterior knee pain include:Change the way you exercise, Learn exercises to both strengthen and stretch the quadriceps and hamstring muscles, Learn exercises to strengthen your core, Lose weight (if you are overweight), Use special shoe inserts and support devices (orthotics) if you have flat feet, Tape your knee to realign the kneecap, Wear the correct running or sports shoes. Rarely, surgery for pain behind the kneecap is needed. During the surgery: Kneecap cartilage that has been damaged may be removed , Changes may be made to the tendons to help the kneecap move more evenly. ", "Causes": "Your kneecap (patella) sits over the front of your knee joint. As you bend or straighten your knee, the underside of the patella glides over the bones that make up the knee.Strong tendons help attach the kneecap to the bones and muscles that surround the knee. These tendons are called:The patellar tendon (where the kneecap attaches to the shin bone), The quadriceps tendon (where the thigh muscles attach to the top of the kneecap) . Anterior knee pain begins when the kneecap does not move properly and rubs against the lower part of the thigh bone. This may occur because:The kneecap is in an abnormal position (also called poor alignment of the patellofemoral joint)., There is tightness or weakness of the muscles on the front and back of your thigh., You are doing too much activity that places extra stress on the kneecap (such as running, jumping or twisting, skiing, or playing soccer)., You have flat feet. . Anterior knee pain is more common in:People who are overweight, People who have had a dislocation, fracture, or other injury to the kneecap, Runners, jumpers, skiers, bicyclists, and soccer players who exercise often, Teenagers and healthy young adults, more often girls . Other possible causes of anterior knee pain include:Arthritis, Pinching of the inner lining of the knee during movement (called synovial impingement or plica syndrome) . "}, "ALP isoenzyme test": {"description": "The\u00a0alkaline phosphatase test is a related test."}, "Autism spectrum disorder": {"description": "Autism spectrum disorder (ASD) is a developmental disorder that appears in the first 3 years of life. ASD affects the brain's normal development of social and communication skills.", "Possible Complications": "ASD can be associated with other disorders that affect the brain, such as:Fragile X syndrome, Intellectual disability, Tuberous sclerosis. Some people with autism develop seizures.The stresses of dealing with autism can lead to social and emotional complications for families and caregivers, as well as for\u00a0the person with autism. ", "Symptoms": ["Pretend play", "Social interactions", "Verbal and nonverbal communication ", "Be overly sensitive\u00a0in sight, hearing, touch, smell, or taste (for example, they may refuse to wear \"itchy\" clothes and become distressed if they are forced to wear the clothes)", "Be very distressed when\u00a0routines are changed", "Perform repeated body movements", "Show unusual attachments to objects ", "Cannot start or maintain a social conversation", "Communicates with gestures instead of words", "Develops language slowly or not at all", "Does not adjust gaze to look at objects that others are looking at", "Does not refer to self correctly (for example, says \"you want water\" when the child means \"I want water\")", "Does not point to direct others' attention to objects (normally occurs in the first 14 months of life)", "Repeats words or memorized passages, such as commercials ", "Does not make friends", "Does not play interactive games", "Is withdrawn", "May not respond to eye contact or smiles, or may avoid eye contact", "May treat others as if they are objects", "Prefers to spend time alone, rather than with others", "Shows a lack of empathy ", "\u00a0Does not startle at loud noises", "Has heightened or low senses of sight, hearing, touch, smell, or taste", "May find normal noises painful and hold hands over ears", "May withdraw from physical contact because it is overstimulating or overwhelming", "Rubs surfaces, mouths or licks objects", "Seems to have a heightened or low response to pain ", "Does not imitate the actions of others", "Prefers solitary or ritualistic play", "Shows little pretend or imaginative play ", "Acts up with intense tantrums", "Gets stuck on a single topic or task", "Has a short attention span", "Has very narrow interests", "Is overactive or very passive", "Shows aggression to others or self", "Shows a strong need for sameness", "Uses repetitive body movements "], "Exams and Tests": "All children should have routine developmental exams done by their pediatrician. Further testing may be needed if the doctor or parents are concerned. This is particularly true if a child fails to meet any of the following language milestones:Babbling by 12 months, Gesturing (pointing, waving bye-bye) by 12 months, Saying single words by 16 months, Saying two-word spontaneous phrases by 24 months (not just echoing), Losing any language or social skills at any age . These children might receive a hearing evaluation, blood lead test, and screening test for ASD.A health care provider experienced in diagnosing and treating\u00a0ASD is usually needed to make the actual diagnosis. Because there is no biological test, such as a blood test, for ASD,\u00a0the diagnosis will often be based on guidelines from a medical book called the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM-V).An evaluation of\u00a0ASD will often include a complete physical and nervous system (neurologic) examination. Tests may be done to see if there is a problem with genes or the body's metabolism.ASD\u00a0includes a broad spectrum of symptoms. Therefore, a single, brief evaluation cannot predict a child's true abilities. It is best to have a team of specialists evaluate the child. They might evaluate:Communication, Language, Motor skills, Speech, Success at school, Thinking abilities . Some parents do not want to have their child diagnosed because they are afraid the child will be labeled. But without a diagnosis, the child may not get the necessary treatment and services.", "Treatment": "At this time, there is no cure for ASD. An early, intensive, appropriate treatment program will greatly improve the outlook for most young children with ASD. Most programs build on the interests of the child in a highly structured schedule of constructive activities. The best treatment plan may use a combination of techniques, including:Applied behavior analysis (ABA), Medications, Occupational therapy, Physical therapy, Speech-language therapy . APPLIED BEHAVIORAL ANALYSIS (ABA)This program is for younger children. It can be effective in some cases. ABA uses one-on-one teaching that reinforces the practice of various skills. The goal is to get the child close to normal developmental functioning.ABA programs are usually done in a child's home under the supervision of a behavioral psychologist. These programs can be very expensive and have not been widely adopted by school systems. Parents often must seek funding and staffing from other sources, which can be hard to find in many communities.TEACCHAnother program is called the Treatment and Education of Autistic and Related Communication Handicapped Children (TEACCH). TEACCH was developed as a statewide program in North Carolina. It uses picture schedules and other visual cues that help the child work independently and organize and structure their environments.Though TEACCH tries to improve a child's adaptation and skills, it also accepts the problems associated with ASD. Unlike ABA programs, TEACCH programs do not expect children to achieve typical development with treatment.MEDICINEThere is no medicine that treats ASD itself. But medicines are often used to treat behavior or emotional problems that people with\u00a0ASD may have, including:Aggression, Anxiety, Attention problems, Extreme compulsions that the child cannot stop, Hyperactivity, Impulsiveness, Irritability, Mood swings, Outbursts, Sleep difficulty, Tantrums . Currently, only risperidone is approved to treat children ages 5\u00a0through 16 for the irritability and aggression that can occur with ASD. Other medicines that may also be used include mood stabilizers and stimulants.DIETSome children with\u00a0ASD appear to respond to a gluten-free or casein-free diet. Gluten is found in foods containing wheat, rye, and barley. Casein is found in milk, cheese, and other dairy products. Not all experts agree that dietary changes will make a difference, and not all studies of this method have shown positive results.If you are considering these or other dietary changes, talk to both a doctor who specializes in the digestive system (gastroenterologist) and a registered dietitian. You want to be sure that the child is still receiving enough calories, nutrients, and a balanced diet.OTHER APPROACHESBeware that there are widely publicized treatments for\u00a0ASD that do not have scientific support, and reports of miracle cures that do not live up to expectations. If your child has ASD, it may be helpful to talk with other parents of children with\u00a0ASD and\u00a0ASD specialists. Follow the progress of research in this area, which is rapidly developing.", "Causes": "Autism spectrum disorder (ASD) is a\u00a0physical condition linked to abnormal biology and chemistry in the brain. The exact causes of these abnormalities are not known. There is likely a combination of factors that lead to ASD. It may run in some families, and research shows that a number of genes may be involved. Many other possible causes have been suspected, but not proven. Some researchers believe that damage to a specific part of the brain, called the amygdala, may be involved. Other researchers are looking at whether a virus may trigger symptoms.Some parents have heard that vaccines children receive may cause ASD. Several research studies have found no connection between vaccines and ASD. The American Academy of Pediatrics and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention report that there is no link between ASD and vaccines.Some doctors think the increase in the number of children with ASD is due to better diagnosis and newer definitions of ASD. The term autism spectrum disorder now includes conditions that used to be diagnosed separately:Autistic disorder, Asperger syndrome, Childhood disintegrative disorder, Pervasive developmental disorder. "}, "Acid loading test (pH)": {"description": "The acid loading test (pH) measures the ability of the kidneys to send acid to the urine when there is too much acid in the blood. This test involves both a blood test and urine test."}, "Acoustic neuroma": {"description": "An acoustic neuroma is not cancerous (benign). This means that it does not spread to other parts of the body. However, it can damage several important nerves as it grows.", "Possible Complications": "Brain surgery can completely remove the tumor in most cases., Most people with small tumors will have no permanent paralysis of the face after surgery. However, about two-thirds of people with large tumors will have some permanent weakness of the face after surgery., About one-half of patients with small tumors may still be able to hear in the affected ear after surgery., There may be delayed radiation effects after radiosurgery, including nerve damage, loss of hearing, and paralysis of the face.. ", "Symptoms": ["\r\n  Abnormal feeling of movement (vertigo)\r\n  ", "Hearing loss in the affected ear that makes it hard to hear conversations\r\n  ", "\r\n  Ringing (tinnitus) in the affected ear\r\n  ", "Difficulty understanding speech", "Dizziness", "Headache", "Loss of balance", "Numbness in the face or one ear", "Pain in the face or one ear", "Weakness of the face "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may suspect an acoustic neuroma based on your medical history, an exam of your nervous system, or tests.Often, the physical exam is normal when the tumor is diagnosed. Sometimes, the following signs may be present:Decreased feeling on one side of the face\r\n  , Drooping on one side of the face, Unsteady walk. The most useful test to identify an acoustic neuroma is an MRI of the brain. Other tests to diagnose the tumor and tell it apart from other causes of dizziness or vertigo include:\r\nHearing test (audiology)\r\n  , Test of equilibrium and balance (electronystagmography), Test of hearing and brainstem function (brainstem auditory evoked response) . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the size and location of the tumor, your age, and your overall health. You and your health care provider must decide whether to watch the tumor (observation), use radiation to stop it from growing, or try to remove it.Many acoustic neuromas are small and grow very slowly. Small tumors with few or no symptoms may be watched for changes, especially\u00a0in older patients. Regular MRI scans will be done.If they are not treated, some acoustic neuromas can damage the nerves involved in hearing and balance. They can also affect the nerves responsible for movement and feeling in the face. Very large tumors can lead to a buildup of fluid (hydrocephalus) in the brain, which can be life threatening.Removing an acoustic neuroma is more commonly done for:Larger tumors, Tumors that are causing symptoms, Tumors that are growing quickly, Tumors that are pressing on the brain . Surgery is done to remove the tumor and prevent other nerve damage. Any hearing that is left is often lost with surgery.Stereotactic radiosurgery focuses high-powered x-rays on a small area. It is considered to be a form of radiation therapy, not a surgical procedure. It may be used:To slow down or stop the growth of tumors that are hard to remove with surgery, To treat patients who are unable to have surgery, such as the elderly or people who are very sick . Removing an acoustic neuroma can damage nerves, which may cause loss of hearing or weakness in the face muscles. This damage is more likely to occur when the tumor is large.", "Causes": "Acoustic neuromas have been linked with the genetic disorder neurofibromatosis type 2 (NF2).Acoustic neuromas are uncommon."}, "Aging changes in the lungs": {"description": "As You Grow Older, You Will Have Other Changes, Including:"}, "Ascariasis": {"description": "Ascariasis is an infection with the parasitic roundworm Ascaris lumbricoides.", "Possible Complications": "These complications may occur:Blockage in the bile ducts of the liver, Blockage in the intestine, Hole in the gut . ", "Symptoms": ["Bloody sputum\u00a0(mucus coughed up by the lower airways)", "Cough", "Low-grade fever", "Passing worms in stool", "Shortness of breath", "Skin rash", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting worms", "Wheezing", "Worms leaving the body through the nose or mouth "], "Exams and Tests": "The infected person may show signs of malnutrition. Tests to diagnose this condition include:Abdominal x-ray or other imaging tests, Complete blood count, Eosinophil count, Stool exam to look for worms and worm eggs. ", "Treatment": "Treatment includes medicines that paralyze or kill intestinal parasitic worms.If there is a blockage of the intestine caused by a large number of worms, endoscopy may be used to remove the worms. In rare cases, surgery is needed.People who are treated for roundworms should be checked again in 3 months. This involves examining the stools to check for eggs of the worm. If eggs are present, treatment should be given again.", "Prevention": "Improved sanitation and hygiene in developing countries will reduce the risk in those areas. In areas where this disorder is common, routine or preventive treatment with deworming medicicines may be advised.", "Causes": "People get ascariasis by consuming food or drink that is contaminated with roundworm eggs. Ascariasis is the most common intestinal worm infection. It is related to poor personal hygiene and poor sanitation. People who live in places where human feces (stool) are used as fertilizer are also at risk for this disease.Once consumed, the eggs hatch and release immature roundworms called larvae inside the small intestine. Within a few days, the larvae move through the bloodstream to the lungs. They travel up through the large airways of the lungs, and are swallowed back into the stomach and small intestine.As the larvae move through the lungs they may cause an uncommon form of pneumonia called eosinophilic pneumonia. Eosinophils are a type of white blood cell. Once the larvae are back in the small intestine, they mature into adult roundworms. Adult worms live in the small intestine, where they lay eggs that are present in feces. They can live 10 to 24 months.An estimated 1 billion people are infected worldwide. Ascariasis occurs in people of all ages, though children are affected more severely than adults."}, "Abdominal aortic aneurysm repair - open - discharge ": {"description": "AAA - open - discharge; Repair - aortic aneurysm - open - discharge"}, "Aspiration pneumonia": {"description": "\r\n Aspiration pneumonia occurs when food, saliva,\u00a0liquids, or vomit is breathed into the lungs or airways leading to the lungs.", "Possible Complications": "Lung abscess, Shock, Spread of infection to the bloodstream (bacteremia), Spread of infection to other areas of the body, Respiratory failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish discoloration of the skin caused by lack of oxygen", "Chest pain", "Coughing up\u00a0foul-smelling, greenish or dark\u00a0phlegm (sputum) or phlegm that has pus or blood", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Shortness of breath", "Wheezing", "Breath odor", "Excessive sweating", "Problems swallowing"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination may reveal:Crackling sounds in the lungs, Decreased oxygen, Rapid pulse (fast heartbeat), Decreased mental awareness. The following tests may also help diagnose this condition:Arterial blood gas, Blood culture, Bronchoscopy, Chest x-ray, Complete blood count (CBC), CT scan of the chest, Sputum culture, Swallowing tests . ", "Treatment": "Some people may need to be hospitalized. Treatment depends on how severe the pneumonia is. Sometimes a ventilator (breathing machine) is needed to support breathing.You will likely receive antibiotics. You may need to have your swallowing function tested. Persons who have trouble swallowing may need to use other feeding methods to reduce the risk of aspiration.", "Causes": "The type of bacteria that caused the pneumonia depends on:Your health, Where you live (at home or in a long-term nursing facility, for example), Whether you were recently hospitalized, Recent antibiotic use. Risk factors for aspiration or breathing in of foreign material into the lungs are:Being less alert due to medicines, illness, or other reasons, Coma, Drinking large amounts of alcohol, Medicine to put you into a deep sleep for surgery (general anesthesia), Old age, Poor gag reflex in people who are not alert (unconscious or semi-conscious) after a stroke or brain injury, Problems with swallowing. "}, "Allergy shots": {"description": "Allergy injections; Allergen immunotherapy"}, "Acne - self-care": {"description": "Acne vulgaris - self-care; Cystic acne - self-care; Pimples - self-care; Zits - self-care"}, "Anorexia nervosa": {"description": "Persons with this disorder may have an intense fear of weight gain, even when they are underweight. They may diet or exercise too much or use other ways to lose weight.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Bone weakening, Decrease in white blood cells, which leads to increased risk of infection, Low potassium levels in the blood, which may cause dangerous heart rhythms, Severe lack of water and fluids in the body\u00a0(dehydration), Lack of protein, vitamins, minerals, and other important nutrients in the body\u00a0(malnutrition), Seizures due to fluid or sodium loss from repeated diarrhea or vomiting, Thyroid gland problems, Tooth decay . ", "Symptoms": ["Has an intense fear of gaining weight or becoming fat, even when underweight", "Refuses to keep weight at what is considered normal for\u00a0their age and height (15% or more below the normal weight)", "Have a body image that is very distorted, be very focused on body weight or shape, and refuse to admit the danger of weight loss ", "Cutting food into small pieces or moving them around the plate instead of eating", "Exercising all the time, even when the weather is bad, they are hurt, or their schedule is busy", "Going to the bathroom right after meals", "Refusing to eat around other people", "Using pills to make themselves urinate (water pills or diuretics), have a bowel movement (enemas and laxatives), or decrease their appetite (diet pills) ", "Blotchy or yellow skin that is dry and covered with fine hair", "Confused or slow thinking, along with poor memory or judgment", "Depression", "Dry mouth", "Extreme sensitivity to cold (wearing several layers of clothing to stay warm)", "Loss of bone strength", "Wasting away of muscle and loss of body fat "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests should be done to help find the cause of weight loss, or see what damage the weight loss has caused. Many of these tests will be repeated over time to monitor the person.These tests may include:Albumin, Bone density test to check for thin bones (osteoporosis), CBC, Electrocardiogram (ECG or EKG), Electrolytes, Kidney function tests, Liver function tests, Total protein, Thyroid function tests, Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "The biggest challenge in treating anorexia nervosa is helping the person recognize that\u00a0they have an illness. Most people with anorexia deny that they have an eating disorder. People often enter treatment only when their condition is serious.Goals of treatment are to restore normal body weight and eating habits. A weight gain of 1 to 3 pounds per week is considered a safe goal.Different programs have been designed to treat anorexia. Sometimes the person can gain weight by:Increasing social activity, Reducing the amount of physical activity, Using schedules for eating . Many patients start with a short hospital stay and follow-up with a day treatment program.A longer hospital stay may be needed if:The person has lost a lot of weight (being below 70% of their ideal body weight for their age and height). For severe and life-threatening malnutrition, the person may need to be fed through a vein or stomach tube., Weight loss continues, even with treatment, Medical complications, such as heart problems, confusion, or low potassium levels develop, The person has severe depression or thinks about committing suicide . Care providers who are usually involved in these programs include:Nurse practitioners, Physicians, Physician assistants, Dietitians, Mental health care providers . Treatment is often very difficult. Patients and their families must work hard. Many therapies may be tried until the patient overcomes this disorder.Patients may drop out of programs if they have unrealistic hopes of being \"cured\" with therapy alone.Different kinds of talk therapy are used to treat people with anorexia:Cognitive behavioral therapy (a type of talk therapy), group therapy, and family therapy have all been successful., Goal of therapy is to change patients' thoughts or behavior to encourage them to eat in a healthier way. This kind of therapy is more useful for treating younger patients who have not had anorexia for a long time., If the patient is young, therapy may involve the whole family. The family is seen as a part of the solution, instead of the cause of the eating disorder., Support groups may also be a part of treatment. In support groups, patients and families meet and share what they have been through. . Medicines such as antidepressants, antipsychotics, and mood stabilizers may help some anorexic patients when given as part of a complete treatment program. These medicines can help treat depression or anxiety. Although medicines may help, none has been proven to decrease the desire to lose weight.", "Causes": "The exact causes of anorexia nervosa are not known. Many factors may be involved. Genes and hormones may play a role. Social attitudes that promote very thin body types may also be involved.Risk factors for anorexia include:Being more worried about, or paying more attention to, weight and shape, Having an anxiety disorder as a child, Having a negative self-image, Having eating problems during infancy or early childhood, Having certain social or cultural ideas about health and beauty, Trying to be perfect or overly focused on rules . Anorexia often begins during the pre-teen or teen years or young adulthood. It is more common in females, but may also be seen in males. The disorder is seen mainly in white women who are high achievers in school and who have a goal-oriented family or personality."}, "Amniocentesis": {"description": "Amniocentesis is a test that can be done during pregnancy to look for birth defects and genetic problems in the developing baby."}, "Arthritis - resources": {"description": "The following organizations provide more information on arthritis:"}, "Aplastic": {"description": "Aplastic is a medical term that means:"}, "Adjustment disorder": {"Symptoms": ["Acting defiant or showing impulsive behavior", "Acting nervous or tense", "Crying, feeling sad or hopeless, and possibly withdrawing from other people", "Skipped heartbeats and other physical complaints", "Trembling or twitching ", "The symptoms clearly come after a stressor, most often within 3 months", "The symptoms are more severe than would be expected", "There do not appear to be other disorders involved", "The symptoms are not part of normal grieving for the death of a loved one "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will do a mental health assessment to find out about your behavior and symptoms. You may be referred to a psychiatrist to confirm the diagnosis.", "description": "The symptoms occur because you are having a hard time coping. Your reaction is stronger than expected for the type of event that occurred.", "Causes": "Many different events may trigger symptoms of an adjustment disorder. Whatever the trigger is, the event may become too much for you.Stressors for people of any age include:\r\n  Death of a loved one\r\n  , \r\n  Divorce or problems with a relationship\r\n  , \r\n  General life changes\r\n  , \r\n  Illness or other health issues in yourself or a loved one\r\n  , \r\n  Moving to a different home or a different city\r\n  , \r\n  Unexpected catastrophes\r\n  , \r\n  Worries about money\r\n  . Triggers of stress in teenagers and young adults may include:Family problems or conflict, School problems, Sexuality issues . There is no way to predict which people who are affected by the same stress are likely to develop adjustment disorder. Your social skills before the event, and how you have learned to deal with stress in the past may play roles. ", "Treatment": "The main goal of treatment is to relieve symptoms and help you return to a similar level of functioning as before the stressful event occurred.Most mental health professionals recommend some type of talk therapy. This type of therapy can help you identify or change your responses to the stressors in your life. Cognitive behavioral therapy (CBT) is a type of talk therapy. It can help you deal with your feelings:First the therapist helps you recognize the negative feelings and thoughts that occur., Then the therapist teaches you how to change these into helpful thoughts and healthy actions. . Other types of therapy may include: \r\n  Long-term therapy, where you will explore your thoughts and feelings over many months or more\r\n  , \r\n  Family therapy, where you will meet with a therapist along with your family\r\n  , \r\n  Self-help groups, where the support of others may help you get better\r\n  . Medicines may be used, but only along with talk therapy. These medicines may help if you are:Nervous or anxious most of the time, Not sleeping very well, Very sad or depressed . "}, "Apnea of prematurity": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Most preterm and some sick full-term babies have some degree of apnea so, these babies are hooked up to monitors in the hospital. The monitors keep track of their breathing, heart rate, and oxygen levels. Apnea or a drop in heart rate can set off the alarms on these monitors.", "description": "Apnea is breathing that slows down or stops from any cause. Apnea of prematurity refers to short episodes of stopped breathing in babies who were born before they were due.", "Causes": "There are several reasons why newborns, in particular those who were born early, may have apnea, including:Their brain is not fully developed, The muscles that keep the airway open are weak. Other stresses in a sick or premature baby may worsen apnea, including:Anemia, Feeding problems, Heart or lung problems, Infection, Low oxygen levels, Overstimulation, Temperature problems. ", "Treatment": "How apnea is treated depends on the cause, how often the breathing stops, and the severity of spells. Babies who appear to be otherwise healthy and have few spells\u00a0per day are simply watched. They can be gently stimulated during periods when breathing stops.Babies who are well, but who have many episodes in which they stop breathing, may be given a caffeine preparation to help stimulate their breathing. Sometimes the nurse will suction children with apnea, change their position, or use a bag and mask to help them breathe.Proper positioning, slower feeding time, oxygen, and (in extreme cases) a breathing machine may be needed to assist in breathing.Studies have not been able to show a benefit to putting babies on home monitors, so these monitors are not used very often anymore."}, "Acromegaly": {"description": "Acromegaly is a condition in which there is too much growth hormone in the body.", "Symptoms": ["Body odor", "Carpal tunnel syndrome", "Decreased muscle strength (weakness)", "Decreased peripheral vision", "Easy fatigue", "Excessive height (when excess growth hormone production begins in childhood)", "Excessive sweating", "Headache", "Hoarseness", "Joint pain, limited joint movement, swelling of the bony areas around a joint", "Large bones of the face", "Large feet (change in shoe size), large hands (change in ring or glove size)", "Large glands in the skin (sebaceous glands)", "Large jaw (prognathism) and tongue (macroglossia)", "Sleep apnea", "Thickening of the skin, skin tags", "Widely spaced teeth", "Widened fingers or toes, with swelling, redness, and pain ", "Colon polyps", "Excess hair growth in females (hirsutism)", "Type 2 diabetes", "Weight gain (unintentional) "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms.The following tests may be ordered to confirm diagnosis of acromegaly:Blood glucose, Growth hormone\u00a0, High insulin-like growth factor 1 (IGF-1) level, Spine x-ray, MRI of the brain, including the\u00a0pituitary gland, Echocardiogram, Prolactin\u00a0 . ", "Causes": "Acromegaly is a rare condition. It is caused when the pituitary gland makes too much growth hormone. The pituitary gland is a pea-sized endocrine gland located at the base of the brain. It controls, makes, and releases several hormones, including growth hormone.Usually a noncancerous (benign) tumor of the pituitary gland causes the gland to release too much growth hormone. In children, too much growth hormone causes gigantism rather than acromegaly.", "Prevention": "Acromegaly cannot be prevented. Early treatment may prevent complications of the disease from getting worse.", "Treatment": "Surgery to remove the pituitary tumor that is causing this condition often corrects the abnormal growth hormone. Sometimes the tumor is too large to remove completely. People who do not respond to surgery may have radiation of the pituitary gland. Medications are used after surgery. Some patients are treated with medicines instead of surgery.After treatment, you will need to see your health care provider regularly to make sure that the pituitary gland is working normally. Yearly evaluations are recommended."}, "Annular pancreas": {"description": "An annular pancreas is a ring of pancreatic tissue that encircles the duodenum (the first part of the small intestine). The normal position of the pancreas is next to, but not surrounding the duodenum.", "Possible Complications": "Obstructive jaundice, Pancreatic cancer, Pancreatitis (inflammation of the pancreas), Peptic ulcer, Perforation (tearing a hole) of the intestine due to obstruction, Peritonitis. ", "Symptoms": ["Fullness after eating", "Nausea or vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests include:Abdominal ultrasound, Abdominal x-ray, CT scan, Upper GI and small bowel series. ", "Treatment": "Treatment most often involves surgery to bypass the blocked part of the duodenum.", "Causes": "Annular pancreas is problem present at birth (congenital defect). Symptoms occur when the ring of pancreas squeezes and narrows the small intestine so that food cannot pass easily or at all.Newborns may have symptoms of complete blockage of the intestine. However, up to half of people with this condition do not have symptoms until adulthood. There are also cases that are not detected because the symptoms are mild.Conditions that may be associated with annular pancreas include:Down syndrome, Excess amniotic fluid during pregnancy (polyhydramnios), Other congenital gastrointestinal problems, Pancreatitis . "}, "Autoinoculation": {"description": "Autoinoculation can also refer to the movement of microorganisms from one part of the body to another."}, "Arteriovenous malformation - cerebral": {"description": "A cerebral arteriovenous malformation is an abnormal connection between the arteries and veins in the brain that usually forms before birth.", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage, Intracerebral hemorrhage, Language difficulties, Numbness of any part of the face or body, Persistent headache, Seizures, Subarachnoid hemorrhage, Vision changes, Water on the brain (hydrocephalus), Weakness in part of the body. Possible complications of open brain surgery include:Brain swelling, Hemorrhage, Seizure, Stroke. ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion", "Ear noise/buzzing (also called pulsatile tinnitus)", "Headache\r\nin one or more parts of the head, may seem like a migraine\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 ", "Problems walking", "Seizures", "Symptoms due to\u00a0pressure on one area of the brain:\r\n Blurred, decreased, or double vision, Dizziness, Muscle weakness in any part of the body or face, Numbness in any part of the body. ", "Blurred, decreased, or double vision", "Dizziness", "Muscle weakness in any part of the body or face", "Numbness in any part of the body"], "Exams and Tests": "A complete physical examination and neurologic examination are needed, but they may be completely normal.Tests that may be used to diagnose an AVM include:Cerebral angiogram, Computed tomography (CT) angiogram\r\n , Cranial MRI, Electroencephalogram (EEG), Head CT scan, Magnetic resonance angiography (MRA), Magnetic resonance veinogram. ", "Treatment": "Finding the best treatment for an AVM that is found on an x-ray or other imaging tests but is not causing any symptoms can be difficult. Your doctor will discuss with you:The risk that your AVM will break open (rupture). If this happens, there may be permanent brain damage., The risk of any brain damage if you have one of the surgical treatments listed below.. Your doctor may discuss different factors that may increase your risk of bleeding, including:Current or planned pregnancies, What the AVM looks like on imaging tests, Size of the AVM, Your age, Your symptoms. A bleeding AVM is a medical emergency. The goal of treatment is to prevent further complications by controlling bleeding and seizures and, if possible, removing the AVM.Three surgical treatments are available. Some treatments are used together.Open brain surgery -- removes the abnormal connection through an opening made in the skull. It must be done by a highly skilled surgeon.Embolization (endovascular treatment): A catheter is guided through a small cut in your groin to an artery and then to the small blood vessels in your brain where the aneurysm is located., A glue-like substance is injected into the abnormal vessels to stop blood flow in the AVM and reduce the risk of bleeding. This may be the first choice for some kinds of AVMs, or if surgery cannot be done.. Stereotactic radiosurgery is another alternative.This procedure delivers very focused radiation directly to the area of the AVM to cause scarring and shrinkage., It is particularly useful for small AVMs deep in the brain, which are difficult to remove by surgery.. Anticonvulsant medications, such as phenytoin, are usually prescribed if seizures occur.", "Causes": "The cause of cerebral arteriovenous malformation (AVM) is unknown. The condition occurs when arteries in the brain connect directly to nearby veins without having the normal vessels (capillaries) between them.Arteriovenous malformations vary in size and location in the brain.An AVM rupture occurs because of pressure and damage to blood vessel tissue. This allows blood to leak into the brain or surrounding tissues, and reduces blood flow to the brain.Cerebral AVMs occur in less than 1% of people. Although the condition is present at birth, symptoms may occur at any age. Hemorrhages occur most often in people ages 15 - 20, but can also occur later in life. Some patients with an AVM also have cerebral aneurysms."}, "Angioplasty and stent placement - peripheral arteries - discharge ": {"description": "Your surgeon inserted a catheter (flexible tube) into your blocked artery through a tiny hole in your groin. Your surgeon used x-rays to guide the catheter up to the area of the blockage. Then your surgeon passed a guide wire through the catheter to the blockage. A balloon catheter was pushed over the guide wire and into the blockage. The balloon on the end was blown up. This opened the blocked vessel and restored proper blood flow to your heart. A stent is usually placed to prevent the vessel from collapsing again."}, "Absent pulmonary valve": {"description": "Absent pulmonary valve is a rare defect in which the pulmonary valve, through which oxygen-poor blood flows from the heart to the lungs (where it picks up oxygen) is either missing or poorly formed. This condition is present at birth (congenital).", "Possible Complications": "Brain infection (abscess), Lung collapse (atelectasis), Pneumonia, Right-sided heart failure, Stroke. ", "Symptoms": ["Blue coloring to the skin (cyanosis)", "Coughing", "Failure to thrive", "Poor appetite", "Rapid breathing", "Respiratory failure", "Wheezing "], "Exams and Tests": "Absent pulmonary valve may be diagnosed before the baby is born with a test that uses sound waves to create an image of the heart (echocardiogram).During an examination, the doctor may hear a murmur in the infant's chest.Tests for absent pulmonary valve include:A test to measure the electrical activity of the heart (electrocardiogram), Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray, Echocardiogram, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the heart. ", "Treatment": "Infants who have breathing symptoms typically\u00a0need immediate surgery. Infants without severe symptoms typically have surgery within the first 3 to 6 months of life.Depending on the type of other heart defects the infant has, surgery may involve:Closing the hole in the wall between the left and right ventricles of the heart (ventricular septal defect), Closing a blood vessel that connects the aorta of the heart to the pulmonary artery (ductus arteriosis), Enlarging the flow from the right ventricle to the lungs . Types of surgery for absent pulmonary valve include:Moving the pulmonary artery to the front of the aorta and away from the airways, Rebuilding the artery wall in the lungs to reduce pressure on the airways (reduction pulmonary arterioplasty), Rebuilding the windpipe and breathing tubes to the lungs, Replacing the abnormal pulmonary valve with one taken from human or animal tissue . Infants with severe breathing symptoms may need to get oxygen or be put on a breathing machine (ventilator).", "Prevention": "Although there is no way to prevent this condition, families may be evaluated to determine their risk of congenital defects.", "Causes": "Absent pulmonary valve occurs when the pulmonary valve does not\u00a0form or develop properly while the baby is in the mother's womb. When present, it often occurs as part of a heart condition called tetralogy of Fallot.When the pulmonary valve is missing or does not work well, not enough blood can flow efficiently to the lungs to get oxygen.There is also usually a hole between the left and right ventricles of the heart (ventricular septal defect). This defect will also lead to low-oxygen blood being pumped out to the body.The skin will have a blue appearance (cyanosis), because the body's blood contains a low amount of oxygen.Absent pulmonary valve also results in very enlarged (dilated) branch pulmonary arteries (the arteries that carry blood to the lungs). They can become so enlarged that they press on the tubes that bring air to the lungs (bronchi) and cause breathing problems.Other heart defects that can occur with absent pulmonary valve include:Abnormal tricuspid valve, Atrial septal defect, Double outlet right ventricle, Ductus arteriosis, Endocardial cushion defect, Marfan syndrome, Tricuspid atresia. Heart problems that occur with absent pulmonary valve may be due to defects of the genes (chromosomes)."}, "APGAR": {"description": "The test may rarely be done 10 minutes after birth. "}, "Angina - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your angina."}, "Abortion - surgical - aftercare": {"description": "\r\nYou have had a surgical abortion. This is a procedure that ends pregnancy by removing the fetus and placenta from your womb (uterus). \r\n"}, "Anorchia": {"description": "Anorchia is the absence of both testes at birth.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include:Face, neck, or back abnormalities in some cases, Infertility, Psychological problems due to gender . ", "Symptoms": ["Normal outside genitals before puberty", "Failure to start puberty at the correct time "], "Exams and Tests": "Signs include:Empty scrotum, Lack of male sex characteristics (penis and pubic hair growth, deepening of the voice, and increase in muscle mass) . Tests include:Anti-Mullerian hormone levels, Bone density, FSH and LH levels, Surgery to look for male reproductive tissue, Testosterone levels (low), Ultrasound or MRI to look for testes in the abdomen, X,Y karyotype . ", "Treatment": "Treatment includes:Artificial (prosthetic) testicle implants , Male hormones (androgens), Psychological support. ", "Causes": "The embryo develops early sex organs in the first several weeks after the egg is fertilized. If early testes do not develop in males before 8 weeks into the pregnancy, the baby will have female genitals.If the testes disappear between 8 and 10 weeks, the baby will be born with ambiguous genitalia. This means the child will have parts of both male and female genitals.However, if the testes disappear between 12 and 14 weeks, the baby will have normal male genitals (penis and scrotum), but no testes. This is known as congenital anorchia, or the \"vanishing testes syndrome.\"The cause is unknown. Genetic factors may be involved in some cases. .This condition should not be confused with bilateral undescended testes, in which the testes are located in the abdomen or groin. "}, "Aging changes in the heart and blood vessels": {"description": "You can help your circulatory system (heart and blood vessels). Heart disease risk factors that you have some control over include high blood pressure, cholesterol levels, diabetes, obesity, and smoking."}, "ALS - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on amyotrophic lateral sclerosis:"}, "Abortion - medical": {"description": "Surgical abortion uses surgery to end a pregnancy."}, "Alzheimer\u2019s - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on Alzheimer's disease:"}, "A1C test": {"description": "A1C is a lab test that shows the average level of blood sugar (glucose) over the previous 3 months. It shows how well you are controlling your diabetes."}, "Adolescent pregnancy": {"description": "Adolescent pregnancy is pregnancy in girls age 19 or\u00a0younger.", "Possible Complications": "Adolescent pregnancy is associated with higher rates of illness and death for both the mother and infant. Death from violence is the second leading cause of death during pregnancy for teens, and is higher in teens than in any other group.Pregnant teens are at much higher risk of having serious medical complications such as:Placenta previa, Pregnancy-induced hypertension, Premature delivery, Significant anemia, Toxemia. Infants born to teens are 2 - 6 times more likely to have low birth weight than those born to mothers age 20 or older. Prematurity plays the greatest role in low birth weight, but intrauterine growth retardation (inadequate growth of the fetus during pregnancy) is also a factor.Teen mothers are more likely to have unhealthy habits that place the infant at greater risk for inadequate growth, infection, or chemical dependence. The younger a mother is below age 20, the greater the risk of her infant dying during the first year of life.It is very important for pregnant teens to have early and adequate prenatal care.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal distention", "Breast enlargement and breast tenderness", "Fatigue", "Light-headedness or actual fainting", "Missed period", "Nausea/vomiting", "Frequent urination"], "Exams and Tests": "The adolescent may or may not admit to being involved sexually. If the teen is pregnant, there are usually weight changes (usually a gain, but there may be a loss if nausea and vomiting are significant). Examination may show increased abdominal girth, and the health care provider may be able to feel the fundus (the top of the enlarged uterus).Pelvic examination may reveal bluish or purple coloration of vaginal walls, bluish or purple coloration and softening of the cervix, and softening and enlargement of the uterus.A pregnancy test of urine and/or serum HCG are usually positive., A pregnancy ultrasound may be done to confirm or check accurate dates for pregnancy.. ", "Treatment": "All options made available to the pregnant teen should be considered carefully, including abortion, adoption, and raising the child with community or family support. Discussion with the teen may require several visits with a health care provider to explain all options in a non-judgmental manner and involve the parents or the father of the baby as appropriate.Early and adequate prenatal care, preferably through a program that specializes in teenage pregnancies, ensures a healthier baby. Pregnant teens need to be assessed for smoking, alcohol use, and drug use, and they should be offered support to help them quit.Adequate nutrition can be encouraged through education and community resources. Appropriate exercise and adequate sleep should also be emphasized. Contraceptive information and services are important after delivery to prevent teens from becoming pregnant again.Pregnant teens and those who have recently given birth should be encouraged and helped to remain in school or reenter educational programs that give them the skills to be better parents, and provide for their child financially and emotionally. Accessible and affordable child care is an important factor in teen mothers continuing school or entering the work force.", "Prevention": "There are many different kinds of teen pregnancy prevention programs.Abstinence education programs encourage young people to wait to have sex until marriage, or until they are mature enough to handle sexual activity and a potential pregnancy in a responsible manner., Knowledge-based programs focus on teaching kids about their bodies. It also provides detailed information about birth control and how to prevent sexually transmitted infections (STIs). Research shows knowledge-based programs help decrease teen pregnancy rates. Abstinence-only education without information about birth control does not., Clinic-focused programs give kids easier access to information, counseling by health care providers, and birth control services. Many of these programs are offered through school-based clinics., Peer counseling programs typically involve older teens, who encourage other kids to resist peer and social pressures to have sex. For teens who are already sexually active, peer counseling programs teach them relationship skills and give them information on how to get and successfully use birth control.. ", "Causes": "Adolescent pregnancy and babies born to adolescents have dropped since reaching an all-time high in 1990. This is mostly due to the increased use of condoms.Adolescent pregnancy is a complex issue with many reasons for concern. Kids age 12 - 14 years old are more likely than other adolescents to have unplanned sexual intercourse . They are more likely to be talked into having into sex.Up to two-thirds of adolescent pregnancies occur in teens age 18 - 19 years old.Risk factors for adolescent pregnancy include:Younger age, Poor school performance, Economic disadvantage, Older male partner, Single or teen parents. "}, "Angioplasty and stent placement - carotid artery - discharge ": {"description": "Then your health care provider passed a guide wire through the catheter to the blockage. A balloon catheter was pushed over the guide wire and into the blockage. The tiny balloon on the end was inflated. This opened the blocked artery."}, "Arm MRI scan": {"description": "Single MRI images are called slices. The images can be stored on a computer or printed on film. One exam produces many images."}, "Anesthesia - what to ask your doctor - child": {"description": "Your child is scheduled to have a surgery or procedure. You will need to talk with your child's doctor about the type of anesthesia that will be best for your child. Below are some questions you may want to ask."}, "Albinism": {"description": "Albinism is a defect of melanin production that results in little or no color (pigment) in the skin, hair, and eyes.", "Possible Complications": "Decreased vision, blindness, Skin cancer. ", "Symptoms": ["Absence of color in the hair, skin, or iris of the eye", "Lighter than normal skin and hair", "Patchy, missing skin color", "Crossed eyes (strabismus)", "Light sensitivity (photophobia)", "Rapid eye movements (nystagmus)", "Vision problems, or functional blindness"], "Exams and Tests": "Genetic testing offers the most accurate way to diagnose albinism. Such testing is helpful if you have a family history of albinism. It is also useful for certain groups of people who are known to get the disease.Your doctor may also diagnose the condition based on the appearance of your skin, hair, and eyes. An ophthalmologist may perform an electroretinogram, which is a test that can reveal vision problems related to albinism. A visual evoked potentials test can be very useful when the diagnosis is uncertain.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to relieve symptoms. Treatment depends on the severity of the disorder.Treatment involves protecting the skin and eyes from the sun:Reduce sunburn risk by avoiding the sun, using sunscreen, and covering up completely with clothing when exposed to the sun., Sunscreen should have a high sun protection factor (SPF)., Sunglasses (UV protected) may relieve light sensitivity.. Glasses are often prescribed to correct vision problems and eye position. Eye muscle surgery is sometimes recommended to correct abnormal eye movements (nystagmus).", "Prevention": "Because albinism is inherited, genetic counseling is important. People with a family history of albinism or hypopigmentation should consider genetic counseling.", "Causes": "Albinism occurs when one of several genetic defects makes the body unable to produce or distribute melanin, a natural substance that gives color to your hair, skin, and iris of the eye.The defects may be passed down through families.The most severe form of albinism is called oculocutaneous albinism. People with this type of albinism have white or pink hair, skin, and iris color, as well as vision problems.Another type of albinism, called ocular albinism type 1 (OA1), affects only the eyes. The person's skin and eye colors are usually in the normal range. However, an eye exam will show that there is no coloring in the back of the eye (retina).Hermansky-Pudlak syndrome (HPS) is a form of albinism caused by a single gene. It can occur with a bleeding disorder, as well as with lung and bowel diseases.Other complex diseases may lead to loss of coloring in only a certain area (localized albinism). These conditions include:Chediak-Higashi syndrome (lack of coloring all over the skin, but not complete), Tuberous sclerosis (small areas without skin coloring ), Waardenburg syndrome (often a lock of hair that grows on the forehead, or no coloring in one or both irises) . "}, "After chemotherapy - discharge": {"description": "You will probably get tired easily. Your appetite may be poor, but you should be able to drink and eat."}, "Acid soldering flux poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Decreased urine output", "Kidney failure", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the food pipe (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Irregular heart beat", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Breathing difficulty (from breathing in chemical)", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Burn", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Adult Still's disease": {"description": "The disease is much less common and now called adult-onset Still's disease (AOSD).", "Possible Complications": "Arthritis in several joints, Liver disease, Pericarditis, Pleural effusion, Spleen enlargement. ", "Symptoms": ["Joint pain, warmth, and swelling are common. Most often, several joints are involved at the same time. Often, patients have morning stiffness of joints that lasts for several hours.", "The fever comes on quickly once per day, most commonly in the afternoon or evening.", "The skin rash is often salmon-pink colored and comes and goes with the fever.", "Abdominal pain and swelling", "Pain with a deep breath (pleurisy)", "Sore throat", "Swollen lymph nodes (glands)", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Adult Still's disease can only be diagnosed after other diseases are ruled out. You may need many medical tests before a final diagnosis is made.A physical exam may show a fever, rash, and arthritis. The health care provider will use a stethoscope to listen for changes in the sound of your heart or lungs.The following blood tests can be helpful in diagnosing adult Still's disease:Complete blood count (CBC) may show a high number of white blood cells and reduced number of red blood cells., C-reactive protein (CRP), a measure of inflammation, will be higher than normal., ESR (sedimentation rate), a measure of inflammation, will be higher than normal., Ferritin level will be very high., Fibrinogen level will be high., Liver function tests will show high levels of AST and ALT., Rheumatoid factor and ANA test will be negative.. Other tests may be needed to check for inflammation of the joints, chest, liver, and spleen:Abdominal ultrasound, CT scan of the abdomen, X-rays of the joints, chest, or stomach area (abdomen). ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment for adult Still's disease is to control the symptoms of arthritis. Aspirin and other nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs), such as ibuprofen, are usually used first.Prednisone may be used for more severe cases.If the disease persists for a long time (becomes chronic), medicines that suppress the immune system might be needed. Such medicines include:Anakinra (interleukin-1 receptor agonist), Methotrexate, Tumor necrosis factor (TNF) antagonists such as Enbrel (etanercept). ", "Causes": "Fewer than 1 out of 100,000 people develop adult Still's disease each year. It affects women more often than men.Still's disease that occurs in children is called systemic juvenile idiopathic arthritis.The cause of adult Still's disease is unknown. No risk factors for the disease have been identified."}, "Alcoholic neuropathy": {"description": "Alcoholic neuropathy is damage to the nerves that results from excessive drinking of alcohol.", "Possible Complications": "Disability, Long-term (chronic) discomfort or pain, Injury to extremities, Falling, especially at night, Urinary incontinence or retention. ", "Symptoms": ["Numbness in the arms and legs", "Abnormal sensations, such as\"pins and needles\"", "Painful sensations in the arms and legs", "Muscle weakness", "Muscle cramps or muscle aches", "Heat intolerance, especially after exercise", "Impotence (in men)", "Problems urinating, incontinence\u00a0(leaking urine), feeling of incomplete bladder emptying, difficulty beginning to urinate", "Constipation", "Diarrhea", "Nausea, vomiting", "\r\n  Swallowing difficulty\r\n  ", "Speech impairment", "Loss of muscle function or feeling", "Muscle contractions or spasm", "Muscle atrophy", "Movement disorders"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms. An eye exam may show eye problems.Alcoholism often makes your body unable to use or store certain vitamins and minerals. Blood tests will be\u00a0ordered to check for a deficiency (lack of):Thiamine (vitamin B1), Pyridoxine (vitamin B6), Pantothenic acid and biotin, Vitamin B12, Folic acid, Niacin (vitamin B3), Vitamin A. Additional tests may be\u00a0ordered to rule out other possible causes of neuropathy. Tests may include:Electrolyte levels, Electromyography (EMG), Liver and kidney function tests, Thyroid function tests, Levels of vitamins and minerals in the body, Nerve conduction tests, Nerve biopsy, Upper GI and small bowel series, Esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD), Voiding cystourethrogram. ", "Treatment": "Once the alcohol problem has been addressed, treatment goals include:Controlling symptoms, Maximizing ability to function independently, Preventing injury. It is important to supplement the diet with vitamins, including thiamine and folic acid.Physical therapy and orthopedic appliances (such as splints) may be needed to\u00a0make sure\u00a0muscle function and limb position are maintained.Medicines may be needed\u00a0to treat pain or uncomfortable sensations.\u00a0Because persons with alcoholic neuropathy have alcohol dependence problems, they\u00a0are advised to take the least amount of medicine needed to reduce symptoms to help prevent drug dependence and other side effects of chronic use.Positioning or the use of a bed frame that keeps the covers off the legs may reduce pain for some people.Light-headedness or dizziness when standing up (orthostatic hypotension) may require several different treatments before finding one that successfully reduces symptoms. Treatments that may help include:Wearing compression stockings, Eating extra salt, Sleeping with the head elevated, Using medicines. Bladder\u00a0problems may be treated with:Manual expression of urine, Intermittent catheterization (male or female), Medicines. Impotence, diarrhea, constipation, or other symptoms are treated when necessary. These symptoms often respond poorly to treatment in people with alcoholic neuropathy.It is important to protect body parts with reduced sensation from injury. This may include:Checking the temperature of bath water to prevent burns, Changing footwear, Frequently inspecting the feet and shoes to reduce injury caused by pressure or objects in the shoes, Guarding the extremities to prevent injury from pressure. Alcohol must be stopped to prevent the damage from getting worse. Treatment for alcoholism may include counseling or social support such as Alcoholics Anonymous (AA), or taking medicines.", "Prevention": "The only way to prevent alcoholic neuropathy is not to drink alcohol.", "Causes": "The exact cause of alcoholic neuropathy is unknown. It\u00a0likely includes both a direct poisoning of the nerve by the alcohol and the effect of poor nutrition associated with alcoholism. Up to half of long-term heavy alcohol users develop this condition.In severe cases, nerves that regulate internal body functions (autonomic nerves) may be involved.Risks\u00a0of alcoholic neuropathy include:Long-term, heavy alcohol use, Alcoholism that is present for 10 years or more. "}, "Acid-fast stain": {"description": "The acid-fast stain is a laboratory test that determines if a sample of tissue, blood, or other body substance is infected with the bacteria that causes tuberculosis and other illnesses."}, "Allergic conjunctivitis": {"description": "Allergic conjunctivitis occurs when the conjunctiva becomes swollen or inflamed due to a reaction to pollen, dander, mold, or other allergy-causing substances. The conjunctiva is a clear layer of tissue lining the eyelids and covering the white of the eye.", "Possible Complications": "There are no serious complications.", "Symptoms": ["Intense itching or burning eyes", "Puffy eyelids, especially in the morning", "Red eyes", "Stringy eye discharge", "Tearing (watery eyes)", "Widened (dilated) vessels in the clear tissue covering the white of the eye "], "Exams and Tests": "Your\u00a0health care provider\u00a0may look for the following:Certain white blood cells, called eosinophils, Small, raised bumps on the inside of the eyelids (papillary conjunctivitis), Positive skin test for suspected allergens on allergy tests. ", "Treatment": "The best treatment is to avoid what causes your allergy symptoms as much as possible. Common triggers to avoid include dust, mold and pollen.Some things you can do to ease symptoms are:Use lubricating eye drops., Apply cool compresses to the eyes., Take over-the-counter oral antihistamines. These medicines can offer more relief, but they can sometimes make your eyes dry. . If home-care does not help, you may need to see a health care provider for treatments such as: Antihistamine or anti-inflammatory drops. Mild eye steroid drops can\u00a0be prescribed for more severe reactions. You may also use eye drops that prevent a type of white blood cell called mast cells from releasing histamine. These drops are given along with antihistamines. These medicines work best if you take them before you come in contact with the allergen.", "Causes": "When your eyes are exposed to allergy-causing substances, a substance called histamine is released by your body. The blood vessels in the conjunctiva become swollen. The eyes can become red, itchy, and teary very quickly.The pollens that cause symptoms vary from person to person and from area to area. Tiny, hard-to-see pollens that may cause hay fever include grasses, ragweed and trees.Your symptoms may be worse when there is more pollen in the air. Higher levels of pollen are more likely on hot, dry, windy days. On cool, damp, rainy days most pollen is washed to the ground.Allergies tend to run in families. It is hard to know exactly how many people have allergies. Many conditions are often lumped under\u00a0the term \"allergy\" even when they might not truly be an allergy. "}, "Acetaminophen overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Appetite loss", "Coma", "Convulsions", "Diarrhea", "Irritability", "Jaundice", "Nausea", "Sweating", "Upset stomach", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or 1-800-222-1222 for a local poison control center near you."}, "Aging changes in immunity": {"description": "As You Grow Older, You Will Have Other Changes, Including:"}, "Acute arterial occlusion - kidney": {"description": "Acute arterial occlusion of the kidney is a sudden, severe blockage of the artery that supplies blood to the kidney.", "Possible Complications": "Acute kidney failure, Chronic kidney disease, High blood pressure, Malignant hypertension. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Abrupt decrease in urine output", "Back pain", "Blood in the urine", "Flank pain or pain in the side", "Symptoms of high blood pressure such as headache, change in vision, and swelling "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will not be able to identify the problem with just an exam unless you have developed kidney failure. Tests you may need include:Duplex Doppler ultrasound exam of the renal arteries to test blood flow, MRI of the kidney arteries, which can show a lack of blood flow to the affected kidney, Renal arteriography shows the exact location of the blockage, Renal nuclear scan shows a lack of blood flow to the affected kidney, Ultrasound of the kidney to check kidney size . ", "Treatment": "Often, patients do not need treatment. Blood clots may get better on their own over time.You may have treatment to open the artery if the blockage is discovered quickly or it is affecting the only working kidney. Treatment to open the artery may include:Clot-dissolving medicines (thrombolytics), Medicines that prevent the blood from clotting (anticoagulants), such as warfarin (Coumadin), Surgical repair of the renal artery, Insertion of a tube (catheter) into the renal artery to open the blockage. You may need temporary dialysis to treat acute kidney failure. Medicines to lower cholesterol may be needed if the blockage is due to clots from plaque buildup in the arteries. ", "Prevention": "In many cases, the disorder is not preventable. The most important way to reduce your risk is to stop smoking.People at risk for developing blood clots may need to take anti-clotting medicines. Taking steps to control diseases related to atherosclerosis (hardening of the arteries) may reduce your risk.", "Causes": "The kidneys need a good blood supply. The main artery to the kidney is called the renal artery. Reduced blood flow through the renal artery can hurt kidney function. A complete blockage of blood flow to the kidney can often result in permanent kidney failure.Acute arterial occlusion of the renal artery can occur after injury or trauma to the abdomen, side, or back. Blood clots that travel through the bloodstream (emboli) can lodge in the renal artery. Pieces of plaque from the walls of the arteries can come loose (on their own or during a procedure). This debris can block the main kidney artery one or one of the smaller vessels. The risk of renal artery blockages increases in people who have certain heart disorders which make them likely to form blood clots. These include mitral stenosis and atrial fibrillation.A narrowing of the renal artery is called renal artery stenosis. This condition increases the risk of a sudden blockage. "}, "Asthma - what to ask the doctor - adult": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your asthma."}, "Anomalous left coronary artery from the pulmonary artery": {"description": "ALCAPA is present at birth (congenital).", "Possible Complications": " Complications of ALCAPA include:Heart attack, Heart failure, Heart rhythm problems, Permanent damage to the heart. ", "Symptoms": ["Crying or sweating during feeding", "Pale skin", "Poor feeding", "Rapid breathing", "Sweating", "Symptoms of pain or distress in the baby (often mistaken for colic)"], "Exams and Tests": "ALCAPA can be diagnosed in an infant. However, this defect may not be diagnosed until someone is a child or adult.Signs of ALCAPA include:Abnormal heart rhythm, Enlarged heart, Heart murmur (rare), Rapid pulse. Tests for anomalous left coronary artery include:A test of the electrical activity in the heart (electrocardiogram), A special dye injected into the blood vessels of the heart to see their structure and position (arteriography), A thin tube (catheter) inserted in a blood vessel of the heart to measure blood pressure and oxygen levels (cardiac catheterization), Cardiac magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), Chest x-rays, Ultrasound of the heart (echocardiogram). ", "Treatment": "Surgery\u00a0is needed to correct ALCAPA. Only one surgery is needed in most cases. However, the surgery will depend on the baby's condition and the size of the involved blood vessels.If the heart muscle supporting the mitral valve is seriously damaged from decreased oxygen, the baby may also need surgery to repair or replace the valve. The mitral valve controls blood flow between the chambers on the left side of the heart.If the baby's heart is already severely damaged from lack of oxygen, a heart transplant may be an option.Medicines used include:\"Water pills\" (diuretics ), Drugs that make the heart muscle pump harder (inotropic agents), Drugs that lower the workload on the heart (beta-blockers, ACE inhibitors). ", "Causes": "An anomalous left coronary artery from the pulmonary artery is a problem that occurs when the baby's heart is developing early in the pregnancy. The developing blood vessels in the heart do not connect correctly.In the normal heart, the left coronary artery starts in the aorta. The aorta is the major blood vessel that takes oxygen-rich blood from the heart to the rest of the body.In children with ALCAPA, the left coronary artery starts at the pulmonary artery. The pulmonary artery is the major blood vessel that takes oxygen-poor blood from the heart to the lungs.When this defect occurs, blood that is lacking in oxygen is carried to the left side of the heart. Therefore, the heart does not get enough oxygen. When the heart muscle is deprived of\u00a0oxygen, the tissue begins to die. This condition leads to a heart attack in the baby.A condition known as \"coronary steal\" further damages the heart in babies with ALCAPA. The low blood pressure in the pulmonary artery causes blood from the abnormal left coronary artery to flow toward the pulmonary artery instead of toward the heart. This results in less blood and oxygen to the heart. This problem will also lead to a heart attack in a baby. Coronary steal develops over time in babies with ALCAPA if the condition is not treated early."}, "Aicardi syndrome": {"description": "Aicardi syndrome is a rare disorder in which the structure that connects the two sides of the brain (called the corpus callosum) is partly or completely missing. Nearly all known cases of Aicardi syndrome occur in people with no history of the disorder in their family (sporadic).", "Possible Complications": "Complications depend on the severity of symptoms.", "Symptoms": ["Coloboma (cat's eye)", "Intellectual disability", "Smaller-than-normal eyes (microphthalmia)"], "Exams and Tests": "Children are diagnosed with Aicardi syndrome if they meet the following criteria:Corpus callosum that is partly or completely missing, Female sex, Seizures (typically beginning as infantile spasms), Sores on the retina (retinal lesions) or optic nerve. In rare cases, one of these features may be missing (especially lack of development of the corpus callosum).Tests to diagnose Aicardi syndrome include:CT scan of the head, EEG, Eye exam, MRI. Other procedures and tests may be done, depending on the person.", "Treatment": "Treatment is supportive. It involves managing seizures and any other health concerns, and using programs to help the family and child cope with delays in development.", "Causes": "The cause of Aicardi syndrome is unknown at this time. In some cases, experts believe it may be a result of a gene defect on the X chromosome.The disorder affects only girls."}, "Angioplasty and stent placement - peripheral arteries": {"description": "Angioplasty and stent placement are two ways to open blocked peripheral arteries."}, "Acute": {"description": "Acute means sudden or severe. Acute symptoms appear, change, or worsen rapidly. It is the opposite of chronic."}, "Angioplasty and stent placement - carotid artery": {"description": "Two procedures can be used to treat a carotid artery that is narrowed or blocked. These are:"}, "Aarskog syndrome": {"description": "Aarskog syndrome is an inherited disease that affects a person's height, muscles, skeleton, genitals, and appearance of the face. Inherited means that it is passed down through families.", "Possible Complications": "Changes in the brain, Difficulty growing in the first year of life, Poorly aligned teeth, Seizures \r\n , Undescended testicle. ", "Symptoms": ["Belly button that sticks out", "Bulge in the groin or scrotum (inguinal hernia)", "Delayed sexual maturity\r\n ", "Delayed teeth", "Downward palpebral slant to eyes", "Hairline with a \"widow's peak\"", "Mildly sunken chest (pectus excavatum)", "Mild to moderate mental problems", "Mild to moderate short height (stature), which may not be obvious until the child is 1 - 3 years old", "Poorly developed middle section of the face", "Rounded face", "\"Shawl\" scrotum, testicles that have not come down (undescended)", "Short fingers and toes with mild webbing", "Single crease in the palm of the hand", "Small, broad hands and feet with short fingers and curved-in fifth finger", "Small nose with nostrils tipped forward", "Top portion of the ear folded over slightly", "Wide groove above the upper lip, crease below the lower lip", "Wide-set eyes with droopy eyelids"], "Exams and Tests": "Genetic testing for changes (mutations) in the FGD1 gene, X-rays. ", "Treatment": "Moving the teeth (orthodontic treatment) may be done for some of the abnormal facial features.", "Prevention": "Genetic testing may be available for persons with a family history of the condition or a known mutation of the gene.", "Causes": "Aarskog syndrome is a genetic disorder that is linked to the X chromosome. It affects mainly males, but females may have a milder form. The condition is caused by changes (mutations) in a gene called \"faciogenital dysplasia\" (FGD1)."}, "Antihistamines for allergies": {"description": "Antihistamines are drugs that treat allergy symptoms. When taken by mouth, they come as pills, chewable tablets, capsules, and liquids. "}, "ACTH blood test": {"description": "The ACTH test measures the level of adrenocorticotropic hormone (ACTH) in the blood. ACTH is a hormone released from the pituitary gland in the brain."}, "Ammonia poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Cough", "Chest pain (severe)", "Chest tightness", "Difficulty breathing", "Rapid breathing", "Wheezing", "Fever", "Tearing and burning of eyes", "Temporary blindness", "Throat pain (severe)", "Mouth pain", "Lip swelling", "Rapid, weak pulse", "Collapse and shock", "Confusion", "Difficulty walking", "Dizziness", "Lack of coordination", "Restlessness", "Stupor (altered level of consciousness)", "Bluish-colored lips and fingernails", "Severe burns if contact is longer than a few minutes", "Severe stomach pain", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Agitation": {"description": "Agitation is an unpleasant state of extreme arousal. An agitated person may feel\u00a0stirred up, excited, tense, confused, or irritable.", "Causes": "There are many causes of agitation, some of which include:Alcohol intoxication or withdrawal, Allergic reaction, Caffeine intoxication, Certain forms of heart, lung, liver, or kidney disease, Intoxication or withdrawal from drugs of abuse (such as cocaine, marijuana, hallucinogens, PCP, or opiates), Hospitalization (older adults often have delirium while in the hospital), Hyperthyroidism (overactive thyroid gland), Infection (especially in elderly people), Nicotine withdrawal, Poisoning (for example, carbon monoxide poisoning), Theophylline, amphetamines, steroids, and certain other medicines, Trauma, Vitamin B6 deficiency . Agitation can occur with brain and mental health disorders, such as:Anxiety, Dementia (such as Alzheimer disease), Depression, Mania, Schizophrenia. "}, "Auscultation": {"description": "Auscultation is the method of listening to the sounds of the body during a physical examination."}, "Acute respiratory distress syndrome": {"description": "Acute respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS) is a life-threatening lung condition that prevents enough oxygen from getting to the lungs and into the blood. Infants can also have respiratory distress syndrome.", "Possible Complications": "Failure of many organ systems, Lung damage (such as a collapsed lung--also called\u00a0pneumothorax) due to injury from the breathing machine needed to treat the disease, Pulmonary fibrosis \r\n (scarring of the lung), Ventilator-associated pneumonia. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty breathing ", "Low blood pressure and organ failure", "Rapid breathing", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "Listening to the chest with a stethoscope (auscultation) reveals abnormal breath sounds, such as crackles, which may be signs of fluid in the lungs. Often, blood pressure is low. Cyanosis (blue skin, lips, and nails caused by lack of oxygen to the tissues) is often seen.Tests used to diagnose ARDS include:Arterial blood gas, Blood tests, including CBC and blood chemistries, Blood and urine cultures, Bronchoscopy, Chest x-ray, Sputum cultures and analysis, Tests for possible infections . An echocardiogram or Swan-Ganz catheterization may be needed to rule out congestive heart failure, which can look similar to ARDS on a chest x-ray.", "Treatment": "ARDS often needs to be treated in an intensive care unit (ICU).The goal of treatment is to provide breathing support and treat the cause of ARDS. This may involve medicines to treat infections, reduce inflammation, and remove fluid from the lungs.A ventilator is used to deliver high doses of oxygen and continued pressure (positive end-expiratory pressure, or PEEP) to the damaged lungs. Patients often need to be deeply sedated with medicines. During treatment, doctors and nurses make every effort to protect the lungs from further damage.", "Causes": "ARDS can be caused by any major direct or indirect injury to the lung. Common causes include:\r\n Breathing vomit into the lungs (aspiration)\r\n , \r\n Inhaling chemicals\r\n , \r\n Lung transplant\r\n , Pneumonia, Septic shock (infection throughout the body)\r\n , \r\n Trauma\r\n . ARDS leads to a buildup of fluid in the air sacs (alveoli). This fluid prevents enough oxygen from passing into the bloodstream.The fluid buildup also makes the lungs heavy and stiff, which decreases the lungs' ability to expand. The level of oxygen in the blood can stay dangerously low, even if the person receives oxygen from a breathing machine (ventilator) through a breathing tube (endotracheal tube).ARDS often occurs along with the failure of other organ systems, such as the liver or kidneys. Cigarette smoking and heavy alcohol use may be risk factors."}, "Autoimmune disorders": {"description": "An autoimmune disorder occurs when the body\u2019s immune system attacks and destroys healthy body tissue by mistake. There are more than 80 types of autoimmune disorders.", "Possible Complications": "Complications depend on the disease. Medicines used to suppress the immune system can cause severe side effects, such as higher risk of infections. ", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Fever", "General ill-feeling (malaise)", "Joint pain", "Rash"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a physical exam. Signs depend on the type of disease.Tests that may be done to diagnose an autoimmune disorder may include:Antinuclear antibody tests, Autoantibody tests, CBC, Comprehensive metabolic panel, C-reactive protein (CRP), Erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to:Reduce symptoms, Control the autoimmune process, Maintain the body's ability to fight disease. The treatments your doctor suggests will depend on your disease and symptoms. Types of treatments include:Supplements to replace a substance that the body lacks, such as thyroid hormone, vitamin B12, or insulin,\u00a0due to the autoimmune disease, Blood transfusions if blood is affected, Physical therapy to help with movement if the bones, joints, or muscles are affected. Many people take medicines to reduce the immune system's abnormal response. These are often called immunosuppressive medicines. Examples include corticosteroids (such as prednisone) and nonsteroid drugs such as azathioprine, cyclophosphamide, mycophenolate, sirolimus, or tacrolimus.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention for most autoimmune disorders.", "Causes": "The white blood cells in the body\u2019s immune system help protect against harmful substances. Examples include bacteria, viruses, toxins, cancer cells, and blood and tissue from outside the body. These substances contain antigens. The immune system produces antibodies against these antigens that enable it to destroy these harmful substances.When you have an autoimmune disorder, your immune system does not distinguish between healthy tissue and antigens. As a result, the body sets off a reaction that destroys normal tissues. The exact cause of autoimmune disorders is unknown. One theory is that some microorganisms (such as bacteria or viruses) or drugs may trigger changes that confuse the immune system. This may happen more often in people who have genes that make them more prone to autoimmune disorders.An autoimmune disorder may result in:The destruction of body tissue, Abnormal growth of an organ, Changes in organ function. An autoimmune disorder may affect one or more organ or tissue types. Areas often affected by autoimmune disorders include:Blood vessels, Connective tissues, Endocrine glands such as the thyroid or pancreas, Joints, Muscles, Red blood cells, Skin. A person may have more than one autoimmune disorder at the same time. Common autoimmune disorders include:Addison's disease, Celiac disease - sprue (gluten-sensitive enteropathy), Dermatomyositis, Graves' disease, Hashimoto's thyroiditis, Multiple sclerosis, Myasthenia gravis, Pernicious anemia, Reactive arthritis, Rheumatoid arthritis, Sjogren syndrome, Systemic lupus erythematosus, Type I diabetes. "}, "Aortic arch syndrome": {"Symptoms": ["Blood pressure changes", "Breathing problems", "Dizziness, blurred vision, weakness, and other brain and nervous system (neurological) changes", "Numbness of an arm", "Reduced pulse", "Transient ischemic attacks"], "description": "Aortic arch syndrome refers to a group of signs and symptoms associated with structural problems in the arteries that branch off the aortic arch. The aortic arch is the top part of the main artery carrying blood away from the heart.", "Causes": "Aortic arch syndrome problems are most often due to trauma, blood clots, or malformations that develop before birth. These defects result in abnormal blood flow to the head, neck, or arms.In children, there are many types of aortic arch syndromes, including:Congenital absence of a branch of the aorta, Isolation of the subclavian arteries, Vascular rings . An inflammatory disease called Takayasu syndrome may result in narrowing (stenosis) of the vessels of the aortic arch in women and girls. This disease is seen more often in people of Asian descent.", "Treatment": "Surgery is most often needed to treat the underlying cause of aortic arch syndrome."}, "Asthma": {"description": "Asthma is a disease that causes the airways of the lungs to swell and narrow, leading to wheezing, shortness of breath, chest tightness, and coughing.", "Possible Complications": "The complications of asthma can be severe, and may include:Death, Decreased ability to exercise and take part in other activities, Lack of sleep due to nighttime symptoms, Permanent changes in the function of the lungs, Persistent cough, Trouble breathing that requires breathing assistance (ventilator). ", "Symptoms": ["Cough with or without sputum (phlegm) production", "Pulling in of the skin between the ribs when breathing (intercostal retractions)", "Shortness of breath that gets worse with exercise or activity", "Wheezing\u00a0 ", "Bluish color to the lips and face", "Decreased level of alertness, such as severe drowsiness or confusion, during an asthma attack", "Extreme difficulty breathing", "Rapid pulse", "Severe anxiety due to shortness of breath", "Sweating ", "Abnormal breathing pattern -- breathing out takes more than twice as long as breathing in", "Breathing temporarily stops", "Chest pain", "Tightness in the chest "], "Exams and Tests": "\r\nThe doctor or nurse will use a stethoscope to listen to\u00a0your lungs. Wheezing or other asthma-related sounds may be heard. Tests that may be ordered include:Allergy testing\u00a0- skin\u00a0or a blood test to see if a person with asthma is allergic to certain substances, Arterial blood gas (usually only done with patients who are having a severe asthma\r\n  attack)\r\n  , Chest x-ray, Lung function tests, including peak flow measurements\r\n  . ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are:Control airway swelling, Stay away from\u00a0substances that trigger your symptoms\u00a0, Help you to be able to do normal activities without asthma symptoms . You and your doctor should work as a team to manage your asthma. Follow your doctor's instructions on taking medicines, eliminating asthma triggers, and monitoring symptoms.MEDICINES FOR ASTHMA\u00a0There are two kinds of medicines for treating asthma:Control medicines to help prevent attacks, Quick-relief (rescue)\u00a0medicines for use during attacks . Long-term MedicinesThese are also called maintenance or control medicines.\u00a0They are used to prevent symptoms in people with moderate to severe asthma. You must take them every day for them to work. Take them even when you feel OK. Some long-term medicines are breathed in (inhaled), such as steroids and long-acting beta-agonists. Others are taken by mouth (orally). Your doctor will prescribe the right medicine for you. Quick-relief MedicinesThese are also called rescue medicines. They are taken:For coughing, wheezing, trouble breathing, or an asthma attack, Just before exercising to help prevent asthma symptoms caused by exercise . Tell your doctor if you are using quick-relief medicines twice a week or more. Your asthma may not be under control and your doctor may need to change your dose of daily control drugs. Quick-relief\u00a0medicines include:Short-acting inhaled bronchodilators, Oral corticosteroids for\u00a0when you have an asthma attack that is not going away . A severe asthma attack requires a checkup by a doctor. You may also need a hospital stay. There, you will likely be given\u00a0oxygen, breathing assistance, and medications given through a vein (IV).ASTHMA CARE AT HOMEKnow the asthma symptoms to watch for., Know how to take your peak flow reading and what it means., Know which triggers make your asthma worse and what to do when this happens. . Asthma action plans are written documents for\u00a0managing asthma. An asthma action plan should include:Instructions for taking asthma medicines when your condition is stable, A list of asthma triggers and how to avoid them, How to recognize when your asthma is getting worse, and when to call your doctor or nurse . A peak flow meter is a simple device to measure how quickly you can move air out of your lungs.It can help you see if an attack is coming, sometimes even before symptoms appear. Peak flow measurements help\u00a0let you know\u00a0when you need to take\u00a0medicine or other action., Peak flow values of 50% - 80% of\u00a0your best results are a sign of a moderate asthma attack.\u00a0Numbers below 50% are a sign of a severe attack. . ", "Prevention": "You can reduce asthma symptoms by avoiding triggers and substances that irritate the airways.Cover bedding with allergy-proof casings to reduce exposure to dust mites., Remove carpets from bedrooms and vacuum regularly., Use only unscented detergents and cleaning materials in the home., Keep humidity levels low and fix leaks to reduce the growth of organisms such as mold., Keep the house clean and keep food in containers and out of bedrooms. This helps reduce the possibility of cockroaches. Body parts and droppings\u00a0from cockroaches\u00a0can trigger asthma attacks in some people., If a person is allergic to an animal that cannot be removed from the home, the animal should be kept out of the bedroom. Place filtering material over the heating outlets to trap animal dander. Change the filter in furnaces and air conditioners often., Eliminate tobacco smoke from the home. This is the single most important thing a family can do to help\u00a0someone with asthma. Smoking outside the house is not enough. Family members and visitors who smoke outside carry smoke residue inside on their clothes and hair. This can trigger asthma symptoms. If you smoke, now is a good time to quit., Avoid air pollution, industrial dust, and irritating fumes as much as possible.. ", "Causes": "Asthma is caused by inflammation (swelling)\u00a0in the airways. When an asthma attack occurs, the lining of the air passages swells and the muscles surrounding the airways become tight. This reduces the amount of air that can pass through the airway.In persons who have sensitive airways, asthma symptoms can be triggered by breathing in\u00a0substances called allergens or triggers.Common asthma triggers include:Animals (pet hair or dander), Dust mites, Certain medicines (aspirin and other NSAIDS), Changes in weather (most often cold weather), Chemicals in the air or in food, Exercise, Mold, Pollen, Respiratory infections, such as the common cold, Strong emotions (stress), Tobacco smoke . Many people with asthma have a personal or family history of allergies, such as hay fever (allergic rhinitis) or eczema. Others have no history of allergies."}, "Ammonium hydroxide poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from inhalation)", "Coughing", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Wheezing", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Vision loss", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe) and stomach", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting, possibly with blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure (develops rapidly)", "Severe change in pH (too much or too little acid in the blood, which leads to damage in all of the body organs)", "Burns", "Holes in skin tissue (necrosis)", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Aspirin overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Upset stomach and stomach pain", "Nausea", "Vomiting -- may cause an ulcer or irritation of the stomach known as gastritis", "Fatigue", "Slight fever", "Confusion", "Collapse", "Rapid heart beat", "Uncontrollable rapid breathing", "Ringing in the ears", "Temporary deafness", "Hyperactivity", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Hyperactivity", "Seizures", "Coma"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or 1-800-222-1222 to find a local poison control center near you."}, "Acoustic trauma": {"description": "Acoustic trauma is injury to the hearing mechanisms in the inner ear. It is due to very loud noise.", "Possible Complications": "Progressive hearing loss is the main complication of acoustic trauma.Tinnitus (ear ringing) can also occur.", "Symptoms": ["Partial hearing loss that most often involves exposure to high-pitched sounds. The hearing loss may slowly get worse.", "Noises, ringing in the ear (tinnitus)"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will most often suspect acoustic trauma if hearing loss occurs after noise exposure. Audiometry may determine how much hearing has been lost.", "Treatment": "The hearing loss may not be treatable. The goal of treatment is to protect the ear from further damage. Eardrum repair may be needed.A hearing aid may help you communicate. You can also learn coping skills, such as lip reading.", "Prevention": "Wear protective ear plugs or earmuffs to prevent hearing damage from loud equipment., Be aware of risks\u00a0to your hearing from activities such as shooting guns, using chain saws, or driving motorcycles and snowmobiles., Do not listen to loud music for long periods of time.. ", "Causes": "Acoustic trauma is a common cause of sensory hearing loss. Damage to the hearing mechanisms within the inner ear may be caused by:\r\nExplosion near the ear\r\n , \r\nFiring a gun\r\nnear the ear\u00a0 , \r\nLong-term exposure to loud noises (such as loud music or machinery)\r\n . "}, "Aging changes in the bones - muscles - joints": {"description": "RELATED TOPICS"}, "Aftershave poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Change in alertness level (unconsciousness)", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Eye irritation (burning, redness, tearing)", "Headache", "Low body temperature", "Low blood pressure", "Low blood sugar", "Nausea", "Rapid heart rate", "Slowed breathing", "Slurred speech", "Stupor", "Throat pain", "Unable to walk in a normal manner", "Urination difficulties (too much or too little urine output)", "Vomiting (may contain blood) ", "Dizziness", "Unresponsive reflexes", "Uncoordinated movement", "Confusion", "Irritability", "Nausea", "Sleepiness", "Weakness "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Anemia of chronic disease": {"description": "Anemia of chronic disease is anemia that is found in people with certain long-term (chronic) medical conditions.", "Possible Complications": "Discomfort from symptoms is the main complication in most cases. Anemia may lead to a higher risk of death in patients with heart failure.", "Symptoms": ["Feeling weak or tired", "Headache", "Paleness", "Shortness of breath "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. Anemia may be the first symptom of a serious illness, so finding its cause is very important. Tests that may be done to diagnose anemia or rule out other causes include:Hemoglobin level , Red blood count , Reticulocyte count , Serum ferritin level , Serum iron level , Other blood tests . ", "Treatment": "Anemia is often mild enough that it does not need treatment. It will likely get better when the disease that is causing it is treated.The condition is rarely severe enough to need a blood transfusion.Iron supplements may sometimes be used, but only for patients whose iron levels are low. Taking iron pills when your body does not need them can lead to serious medical problems. Do not take iron pills before talking with your health care provider first.", "Causes": "Anemia is a lower-than-normal number of red blood cells in the blood. Some conditions can lead to anemia of chronic disease include:Autoimmune disorders, such as Crohn disease, systemic lupus erythematosus, rheumatoid arthritis, and ulcerative colitis, Cancer, including lymphoma and Hodgkin disease, Chronic kidney disease, Long-term infections, such as bacterial endocarditis, osteomyelitis (bone infection), HIV/AIDS, hepatitis B or hepatitis C. "}, "Abdominal CT scan": {"description": "An abdominal CT scan is an imaging method that uses x-rays to create cross-sectional pictures of the belly area. CT stands for computed tomography."}, "Ankle replacement - discharge ": {"description": "You received pain medication and were shown how to treat swelling around your new ankle joint."}, "Anesthesia - what to ask your doctor - adult": {"description": "You are scheduled to have a surgery or procedure. You will need to talk with your doctor about the type of anesthesia that will be best for you. Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor."}, "Aging changes in the face": {"description": "The outer surface of the eye (cornea) may develop a grayish-white ring. The colored portion of the eye (iris) loses pigment, making most very elderly people appear to have gray or light blue eyes.\r\n"}, "Aspergillosis precipitin": {"description": "Aspergillosis precipitin is a laboratory test to detect antibodies in the blood resulting from exposure to the fungus Aspergillus."}, "Alstr\u00f6m syndrome": {"description": "Alstr\u00f6m syndrome is a very rare disease passed down through families (inherited)\u00a0that can lead to blindness, deafness, diabetes, and obesity.", "Possible Complications": "Complications from diabetes, Coronary artery disease (from diabetes and high cholesterol), Fatigue and shortness of breath (if poor heart function is not\u00a0treated). ", "Symptoms": ["Blindness or severe vision impairment in infancy", "Dark patches of skin (acanthosis nigricans)", "Deafness", "Impaired heart function (cardiomyopathy), which may lead to heart failure", "Obesity", "Progressive kidney failure", "Slowed growth", "Symptoms of childhood-onset or type 2 diabetes", "Gastrointestinal reflux", "Hypothyroidism", "Liver dysfunction", "Small penis"], "Exams and Tests": "An eye doctor (ophthalmologist) will examine the eyes. The patient may have reduced vision.Tests may be done to check:Blood sugar levels (to diagnose hyperglycemia), Hearing, Heart function, Thyroid function, Triglyceride levels. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for this syndrome. Treatment for symptoms may include:Diabetes medication, Hearing aids, Heart medications, Thyroid hormone replacement. ", "Causes": "Alstr\u00f6m syndrome is\u00a0inherited in an\u00a0autosomal recessive manner. This means both your parents must pass on a copy of the defective gene (ALMSI)\u00a0in order for you to have this disease. It is unknown how the defective gene\u00a0causes the disorder.The condition is extremely rare. It is more common in Holland and Sweden than in the United States."}, "Anti-reflux surgery - children": {"description": "This article discusses anti-reflux surgery repair in children."}, "Appendectomy": {"description": "An appendectomy is surgery to remove the appendix."}, "Autoerythrocyte sensitivity": {"description": "Autoerythrocyte sensitivity means your body is sensitive to its own red blood cells (erythrocytes). This generally results in the destruction of red blood cells."}, "Angina - discharge": {"description": "Chest pain - discharge; Stable angina - discharge; Chronic angina - discharge; Variant angina - discharge; Angina pectoris - discharge; Accelerating angina - discharge; New-onset angina - discharge; Angina - unstable - discharge; Progressive angina - discharge; Angina - stable - discharge; Angina - chronic - discharge; Angina - variant - discharge; Prinzmetal\u2019s angina - discharge"}, "Antidiarrheal drug overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Apathy", "Coma", "Confusion", "Constipation", "Delirium or hallucinations", "Drowsiness", "Dry mouth and skin", "Flushing", "Loss of desire to do anything", "Change in pupil size\u00a0", "Rapid heartbeat", "Rapid side to side eye movement", "Slow breathing "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medicines in child-proof containers and out of reach of children. Read all medicine labels and take only medicines that have been prescribed for you."}, "Abdominal pain": {"description": "Abdominal pain is pain that you feel anywhere between your chest and groin. This is often referred to as the stomach region or belly.", "Causes": "Many different conditions can cause abdominal pain. The key is to know when you need to get immediate medical care. Sometimes you may only need to call a doctor if your symptoms continue.Less serious causes of abdominal pain include:Constipation, Irritable bowel syndrome, Food allergies or intolerance (such as lactose intolerance), Food poisoning, Stomach flu . Other possible causes include:Appendicitis, Abdominal aortic aneurysm (bulging and weakening of the major artery in the body), Bowel blockage or obstruction, Cancer of the stomach, colon (large bowel), and other organs, Cholecystitis (inflammation of the gallbladder) with or without gallstones, Decreased blood supply to the intestines (ischemic bowel), Diverticulitis (inflammation and infection of the colon), Heartburn, indigestion, or gastroesophageal reflux (GERD), Inflammatory bowel disease (Crohn's disease or ulcerative colitis), Kidney stones, Pancreatitis (swelling or infection of the pancreas), Ulcers. Sometimes, abdominal pain may occur due to a problem somewhere else in your body, such as your chest or pelvic area. For example, you may have abdominal pain if you have:Severe menstrual cramps, Endometriosis, Muscle strain, Pelvic inflammatory disease (PID), Tubal (ectopic) pregnancy, Urinary tract infections. "}, "Adrenal glands": {"description": "The adrenal glands are two triangle-shaped glands. One gland is located on top of each kidney. "}, "Arterial insufficiency": {"Symptoms": ["If it affects your heart arteries, you may have chest pain or a heart attack.", "If it affects your brain arteries, you may have a stroke.", "If it affects the arteries that bring blood to your legs, you may have frequent leg cramping when you walk.", "If it affects the arteries in your belly area, you may have pain after you eat."], "description": "Arterial insufficiency is any condition that slows or stops the flow of blood through your arteries. Arteries are blood vessels that carry blood from the heart to other places in your body.", "Causes": "One of the most common causes of arterial insufficiency is atherosclerosis or \"hardening of the arteries.\" Fatty material (called plaque) builds up on the walls of your arteries. This causes them to become narrow and stiff. As a result, it is hard for blood to flow through your arteries.Blood flow may be suddenly stopped due to a blood clot. Clots can form on the plaque or travel from another place in the heart or artery (also called embolus). "}, "Ataxia - telangiectasia": {"description": "Ataxia refers to uncoordinated movements, such as walking. Telangiectasias are enlarged blood vessels (capillaries) just below the surface of the skin. Telangiectasias appear as tiny, red, spider-like veins.", "Possible Complications": "Cancer such as lymphoma, Diabetes, Kyphosis, Progressive movement disorder that leads to wheelchair use, Scoliosis, Severe, recurrent lung infections. ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased coordination of movements (ataxia) in late childhood that\u00a0can include ataxic gait (cerebellar ataxia), jerky gait, unsteadiness ", "Decreasing mental development, slows or stops after age 10 - 12", "Delayed walking", "Discoloration of skin areas exposed to sunlight", "Discoloration of skin (coffee-with-milk-colored spots)", "Enlarged blood vessels in skin of nose, ears, and inside of the elbow and knee", "Enlarged blood vessels in the whites of the eyes", "Jerky or abnormal eye movements (nystagmus) late in the disease", "Premature graying of the hair", "Seizures", "Sensitivity to radiation, including medical x-rays", "Severe respiratory infections that keep coming back (recurring) "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. Examination may show signs of the following:Below normal sized tonsils, lymph nodes, and spleen, Decreased to absent deep tendon reflexes, Delayed or absent physical and sexual development, Growth failure, Mask-like face, Multiple skin coloring and texture changes . Possible tests include:Alpha fetoprotein, B and T cell screen, Carcinoembryonic antigen, Genetic testing to look for mutations in the ATM gene, Glucose tolerance test, Serum immunoglobulin levels (IgE, IgA), X-rays to look at the size of the thymus gland . ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for ataxia-telangiectasia. Treatment is directed at specific symptoms.", "Prevention": "Couples with a family history of this condition who are considering pregnancy may consider genetic counseling.Parents of a child with this disorder may have a slight increased risk of cancer. They should have genetic counseling and more intensive cancer screenings.", "Causes": "Ataxia-telangiectasia is inherited, which means it is passed down through families. It is an autosomal recessive trait. This means that both parents must provide a defective gene for the child to have symptoms of the disorder.The disease results from defects in the ataxia telangiectasia mutated (ATM) gene. Defects in this gene can lead to abnormal cell death in various places of the body, including the part of the brain that helps coordinate movement.Boys and girls are equally affected."}, "Acute adrenal crisis": {"description": "Acute adrenal crisis is a life-threatening condition that occurs when there is not enough cortisol. This is a hormone produced by the adrenal glands.", "Possible Complications": "Coma, Seizures, Shock, Hypoglycemia. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Confusion or coma", "Dehydration", "Dizziness or light-headedness", "Fatigue", "Flank pain", "Headache", "High fever", "Loss of appetite", "Loss of consciousness", "Low blood pressure", "Nausea", "Profound weakness", "Rapid heart rate", "Rapid respiratory rate (see tachypnea)", "Slow, sluggish movement", "Unusual and excessive sweating on face or palms", "Vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be ordered to help diagnose acute adrenal crisis include:ACTH (cosyntropin) stimulation test, Cortisol level, Blood sugar, Serum potassium, Serum sodium, Serum pH . ", "Treatment": "In adrenal crisis, patients need an immediate injection of hydrocortisone through a vein (intravenous) or muscle (intramuscular). You may receive intravenous fluids if you have low blood pressure.You will need to go to the hospital for treatment and monitoring. If infection or another medical problem caused the crisis, you may need additional treatment.", "Prevention": "If you have Addison disease, learn to recognize signs of potential stress that may cause an acute adrenal crisis. If you have been instructed by your doctor, be prepared to give yourself an emergency shot of glucocorticoid or to increase your dosage of oral glucocorticoid medication in times of stress.Always carry medical ID (card, bracelet, or necklace) that says you have adrenal insufficiency. The ID should also say the type of medicine and dosage you need in case of an emergency.Never miss taking your medicines.", "Causes": "The adrenal glands are located just above the kidneys. The adrenal gland consists of two parts. The outer portion, called the cortex, produces cortisol. This is an important hormone for controlling blood pressure. The inner portion, called the medulla, produces the hormone adrenaline (also called epinephrine).\u00a0Both cortisol and adrenaline are released in response to stress.Cortisol production is regulated by the pituitary gland. This is a small gland behind the nose and under the brain. The pituitary gland releases adrenocorticotropic hormone (ACTH). This is a hormone that causes the adrenal glands to release cortisol. Adrenaline production is regulated by nerves coming from the brain and spinal cord and by circulating hormones.Adrenal crisis occurs when:The adrenal gland is damaged due to, for example, Addison disease or other adrenal gland disease, surgery, The pituitary gland is injured and cannot release ACTH, Adrenal insufficiency is not properly treated . Risk factors for adrenal crisis include:Dehydration, Infection and other physical stress, Injury to the adrenal or pituitary gland, Stopping treatment too suddenly with glucocorticoid medications such as prednisone or hydrocortisone, Surgery, Trauma . "}, "Appetite - increased": {"description": "Increased appetite means you have an excess desire for food.", "Causes": "Causes may include:Anxiety, Certain drugs (such as corticosteroids, cyproheptadine, and tricyclic antidepressants), Bulimia (most common in women 18\u00a0to 30 years old), Diabetes mellitus (including gestational diabetes), Graves disease, Hyperthyroidism, Hypoglycemia, Premenstrual syndrome. "}, "Anaplastic thyroid cancer": {"description": "Anaplastic thyroid carcinoma is a rare and aggressive form of cancer of the thyroid gland.", "Possible Complications": "Spread of tumor within the neck\r\n, Metastasis (spread) of cancer to other body tissues or organs. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough", "Coughing up blood", "Difficulty swallowing", "Hoarseness or changing voice", "Loud breathing", "Lower neck lump, which often grows quickly"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination almost always show a growth in the neck region.A CT scan or MRI of the neck may show a tumor growing from the thyroid gland., A thyroid biopsy makes the diagnosis., An examination of the airway with a fiberoptic scope (laryngoscopy) may show a paralyzed vocal cord., A thyroid scan shows this growth to be \"cold,\" meaning it does not absorb a radioactive substance. . Thyroid function blood tests are usually normal.", "Treatment": "This type of cancer cannot be cured by surgery. Complete removal of the thyroid gland does not prolong most patients' lives.Of other treatment options, only radiation therapy combined with chemotherapy has a significant benefit.Surgery to place a tube in the throat to help with breathing (tracheostomy) or in the stomach to help with eating (gastrostomy) may be needed during treatment.For some patients, enrolling in a clinical trial of new thyroid cancer treatments may be an option.", "Causes": "Anaplastic thyroid cancer grows very rapidly and is an invasive type of thyroid cancer. It occurs most often in people over age 60. The cause is unknown.Anaplastic cancer accounts for only about 1% of all thyroid cancers."}, "Apolipoprotein B100": {"description": "This article discusses the test used to measure the level of apoB100 in the blood."}, "Acute nephritic syndrome": {"description": "Acute nephritic syndrome is a group of symptoms that occur with some disorders that cause glomerulonephritis, or swelling and inflammation of the glomeruli in the kidney.", "Possible Complications": "Chronic glomerulonephritis, Congestive heart failure, Nephrotic syndrome, Pulmonary edema. ", "Symptoms": ["Blood in the urine (urine appears dark, tea-colored, or cloudy)", "Decreased urine output (little or no urine may be produced)", "Swelling of the face, eye socket, legs, arms, hands, feet, abdomen, or other areas", "Blurred vision", "Cough containing mucus or pink, frothy material", "Decreased alertness, drowsiness, confusion", "General aches and pains (joint pain, muscle aches)", "General ill feeling (malaise)", "Headache", "Shortness of breath", "Slow, sluggish, lethargic movement "], "Exams and Tests": "During an examination, your health care provider may find the following signs:Abnormal heart and lung sounds, Enlarged liver, Enlarged neck veins from increased pressure, General swelling, High blood pressure, Signs of acute kidney failure, Signs of fluid overload (in the abdomen). Tests that may be done include:Blood electrolytes, Blood urea nitrogen (BUN), Creatinine - blood, Creatinine clearance, Potassium test, Protein in the urine, Urinalysis, Urine appearance and color. A kidney biopsy will show inflammation of the glomeruli, which may indicate the cause of the condition.Tests to find the cause of acute nephritic syndrome may include:ANA titer (lupus), Anti-glomerular basement membrane antibody, Antineutrophil cytoplasmic antibody for vasculitis (ANCA), Blood culture, Culture of the throat or skin, Serum complement (C3 and C4). ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce inflammation in the kidney and control high blood pressure. You may need to stay in a hospital to be diagnosed and treated. Treatment may include antibiotics or other medications or therapies.Your doctor may recommend bedrest. You may need to limit salt, fluids, and potassium in your diet. Your health care provider may prescribe medications to control high blood pressure. Corticosteroids or other anti-inflammatory medications may be used to reduce inflammation.You may also need other treatments for acute kidney failure.", "Prevention": "Many times, the disorder cannot be prevented, although treatment of illness and infection may help to reduce the risk.", "Causes": "Acute nephritic syndrome is often caused by an immune response triggered by an infection or other disease.Common causes in children and adolescents include:Hemolytic uremic syndrome, Henoch-Schonlein purpura, IgA nephropathy, Post-streptococcal glomerulonephritis. Common causes in adults include:Abdominal abscesses, Goodpasture syndrome, Hepatitis B or C, Infective endocarditis , Membranoproliferative GN I, Membranoproliferative GN II, Rapidly progressive (crescentic) glomerulonephritis, SLE or lupus nephritis, Vasculitis, Viral diseases such as mononucleosis, measles, mumps. The inflammation affects the function of the glomerulus -- the part of the kidney that filters blood to make urine and remove waste. As a result, blood and protein appear in the urine, and excess fluid builds up in the body.Swelling of the body occurs when the blood loses a protein called albumin. (Albumin keeps fluid in the blood vessels. When it is lost, fluid collects in the body tissues). Blood loss from the damaged kidney structures leads to blood in the urine.Acute nephritic syndrome may be related to:Acute kidney failure, High blood pressure . "}, "Aspergillosis": {"description": "Aspergillosis is an infection or allergic response due to the Aspergillus fungus.", "Possible Complications": "Amphotericin B can cause kidney damage and unpleasant side effects such as fever and chills, Bronchiectasis (permanent scarring and enlargement of the small sacs in the lungs), Invasive lung disease can cause massive bleeding from the lung, Mucus plugs in the airways, Permanent airway blockage, Respiratory failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough", "Coughing up blood or brownish mucus plugs", "Fever", "General ill feeling (malaise)", "Wheezing", "Weight loss ", "Bone pain", "Chest pain", "Chills", "Decreased urine output", "Headaches", "Increased phlegm production, which may be bloody", "Shortness of breath", "Skin sores (lesions)", "Vision problems"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests to diagnose Aspergillus infection include:Aspergillus antibody test, Chest x-ray, Complete blood count, CT scan, Galactomannan (a molecule from the fungus that is sometimes found in the blood), Immunoglobulin E (IgE) blood level, Lung function tests, Sputum stain and culture for Aspergillus, Tissue biopsy. ", "Treatment": "A fungus ball is usually not treated (with antifungal medicines) unless there is bleeding into the lung tissue. In\u00a0such a\u00a0case, surgery and medicines\u00a0are needed.Invasive aspergillosis is treated with several weeks of an antifungal medicine. It can be given by mouth or IV\u00a0(into a vein). Endocarditis caused by Aspergillus is treated by surgically removing the infected heart valves. Long-term antifungal therapy is also needed.Antifungal\u00a0medicines alone do not help people with allergic aspergillosis. Allergic aspergillosis is treated with\u00a0medicines that suppress the immune system (immunosuppressive drugs), such as prednisone.", "Prevention": "Precautions should be taken\u00a0when using medicines that suppress the immune system. Preventing AIDS also prevents certain diseases, including aspergillosis, that are associated with a damaged or weakened immune system.", "Causes": "Aspergillosis is caused by a fungus (Aspergillus). The fungus is commonly found growing on dead leaves, stored grain, compost piles, or in other decaying vegetation. It can also be found on marijuana leaves.Although most people are often exposed to Aspergillus, infections caused by the fungus rarely occur in people who have a\u00a0healthy immune system. Rare infections caused by aspergillus include pneumonia and fungus ball (aspergilloma).There are several forms of aspergillosis:Pulmonary aspergillosis\u00a0is an\u00a0allergic bronchopulmonary type that\u00a0is an allergic reaction to the fungus.\u00a0This infection\u00a0usually develops in people who already have lung problems such as asthma or cystic fibrosis., Aspergilloma is a growth (fungus ball) that develops in an area of past lung disease or lung scarring such as tuberculosis or lung abscess., Pulmonary aspergillosis\u00a0is an\u00a0invasive type that is a serious infection with pneumonia that can spread to other parts of the body. This infection almost always occurs in people with a weakened immune system due to cancer, AIDS, leukemia, an organ transplant, chemotherapy, or other conditions or medications that lower the number or function\u00a0of normal white blood cells or weaken the immune system.. "}, "Arterial embolism": {"description": "Arterial embolism is a sudden interruption of blood flow to an organ or body part due to a clot (embolus).", "Possible Complications": "Acute MI, Infection in the affected tissue, Septic shock, Stroke (CVA), Temporary or permanent decrease or loss of other organ functions, Temporary or permanent kidney failure, Tissue death (necrosis) and gangrene, Transient ischemic attack (TIA). ", "Symptoms": ["Cold arm or leg", "Decreased or no pulse in an arm or leg", "Fingers or hands feel cool", "Lack of movement in the arm or leg", "Muscle pain in the affected area", "Muscle spasm in the affected area", "Numbness and tingling in the arm or leg", "Pale color of the arm or leg (pallor)", "Weakness of an arm or leg", "Blisters of the skin fed by the affected artery", "Shedding (sloughing) of skin", "Skin erosion (ulcer)", "Tissue death (necrosis; skin is dark and damaged)", "Pain in the part of the body that is involved", "Temporarily decreased organ function"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may find decreased or no pulse, and decreased or no blood pressure in the arm or leg. There may be signs of tissue death or gangrene.Tests to diagnose arterial embolism or reveal the source of emboli may include:Angiography of the affected extremity or organ, Doppler ultrasound exam of an extremity, Duplex Doppler ultrasound exam of extremity, Echocardiogram, MRI of the arm or leg\r\n , Myocardial contrast echocardiography (MCE), Plethysmography, Transcranial Doppler exam of arteries to the brain, Transesophageal echocardiography (TEE). This disease may also affect the results of the following tests:Euglobulin lysis time (ELT), Factor VIII assay, Isotope study of the affected organ, Plasminogen activator inhibitor-1 (PAI-1) activity, Platelet aggregation test, Tissue-type plasminogen activator (t-PA) levels. ", "Treatment": "Arterial embolism requires prompt treatment at a hospital. The goals of treatment are to control symptoms and to improve the interrupted blood flow to the affected area of the body. The cause of the clot, if found, should be treated to prevent further problems.Medicines include:\r\n  Anticoagulants (such as warfarin or heparin) can prevent new clots from forming\r\n  , \r\n  Antiplatelet medications (such as aspirin or clopidogrel) can prevent new clots from forming\r\n  , \r\n  Painkillers given through a vein (by IV)\r\n  , \r\n  Thrombolytics (such as streptokinase) can dissolve clots\r\n  . Some people need surgery. Procedures include:\r\n  Bypass of the artery (arterial bypass) to create a second source of blood supply\r\n  , \r\n  Clot removal through a balloon catheter placed into the affected artery or through open surgery on the artery (embolectomy)\r\n  , \r\n  Opening of the artery with a balloon catheter (angioplasty) with or without a stent \r\n  . ", "Prevention": "Prevention begins with finding the source of the blood clot. Your health care provider may prescribe blood thinners (such as warfarin or heparin) to prevent clots from forming. Antiplatelet drugs may also be needed.You have a higher risk atherosclerosis and clots if you are:A smoker, Inactive and do little exercise, Overweight, Stressed . ", "Causes": "An embolus is a blood clot or a piece of plaque that acts like a clot. Emboli means there is more than one clot or piece of plaque. When the clot travels from the site where it formed to another location in the body, it is called an embolism.An arterial embolism may be caused by one or more clots. The clots can get stuck in an artery and block blood flow. The blockage starves tissues of blood and oxygen. This can result in damage or tissue death (necrosis).Arterial emboli often occur in the legs and feet. Emboli that occur in the brain cause a stroke. Ones that occur in the heart cause a heart attack. Less common sites include the kidneys, intestines, and eyes.Risk factors for arterial embolism include:A type of abnormal heart rhythm called atrial fibrillation, Injury or damage to an artery wall, Conditions that increase blood clotting (such as a very high platelet count) . Another condition that poses a high risk for embolization (especially to the brain) is mitral stenosis. Endocarditis (infection of the inside of the heart) can also cause arterial emboli.A common source for an embolus is from areas of hardening (atherosclerosis) in the aorta and other large blood vessels. These clots can break loose and flow down to the legs and feet.Paradoxical embolization can take place when a clot in a vein enters the right side of the heart and passes through a hole into the left side. The clot can then move to an artery and block blood flow to the brain (stroke) or other organs.If a clot involves the arteries supplying blood flow to the lungs, it is called a pulmonary embolus."}, "Astigmatism": {"description": "Other types of refractive errors are:", "Possible Complications": "In children, uncorrected astigmatism in only one eye may cause amblyopia.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Astigmatism is easily diagnosed by a standard eye exam with refraction test. Special tests are not usually required.Children or adults who cannot respond to a normal refraction test can have their refraction measured by a test that uses reflected light (retinoscopy).", "Treatment": "Mild astigmatism may not need to be corrected.Glasses or contact lenses will correct astigmatism, but do not cure it.Laser surgery can help change the shape of the cornea surface to eliminate astigmatism, along with nearsightedness or farsightedness.", "Causes": "People are able to see because the front part of the eye (cornea) is able to bend (refract) light and focus it onto the back surface of the eye, called the retina.If the light rays are not clearly focused on the retina, the images you see may be blurry.With astigmatism, the cornea is abnormally curved. This curve causes vision to be out of focus.The cause of astigmatism is unknown. It is usually present from birth. Astigmatism often occurs together with nearsightedness or farsightedness. If astigmatism gets worse, it may be a sign of keratoconus.Astigmatism is very common. It sometimes occurs after certain types of eye surgery, such as cataract surgery."}, "Aging changes in the senses": {"description": "As You Grow Older, You Will Have Other Changes, Including:"}, "Aging changes in skin": {"description": "Aging changes in the skin are a group of common conditions and developments that occur as people grow older."}, "Anemia caused by low iron - infants and toddlers": {"description": "Iron helps make red blood cells, so a lack of iron in the body may lead to anemia. The medical name of this problem is\u00a0 iron deficiency anemia.", "Possible Complications": "A low iron level can cause decreased attention span, reduced alertness and learning problems in children.A low iron level can cause the body to absorb too much lead.", "Symptoms": ["Act irritable", "Become short of breath", "Crave unusual foods (called pica)", "Eat less food", "Feel tired or weak all the time", "Have a sore tongue", "Have headaches or dizziness", "Blue-tinged or pale whites of eyes", "Brittle nails", "Pale skin color "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. All babies should have a blood test to check for anemia. Blood tests that measure iron level in the body include:Hematocrit, Serum ferritin, Serum iron, Total iron binding capacity (TIBC). A measurement called iron saturation (serum iron/TIBC) often can show whether the child has enough iron in the body.", "Treatment": "Since children only absorb a small amount of the iron they eat, most children need to have 8 to 10 mg of iron per day. DIET AND IRONDuring the first year of life:Do not give your baby cow's milk until age 1 year. Babies under age 1 have a difficult time digesting cow's milk. Use either breast milk or formula fortified with iron., After 6 months, your baby will start to need more iron in their diet. Start solid foods with iron-fortified baby cereal mixed with breast milk or formula., Iron-rich pureed meats, fruits, and vegetables can also be started.. After one year of age, you may give your baby whole milk in place of breast milk or formula.Eating healthy foods is the most important way to prevent and treat iron deficiency. Good sources of iron include:Apricots, Chicken, turkey, fish, and other meats, Dried beans, lentils, and soybeans, Eggs, Liver, Molasses, Oatmeal, Peanut butter, Prune juice, Raisins and prunes, Spinach, kale and other greens. IRON SUPPLEMENTSIf a healthy diet does not prevent or treat your child's low iron level and anemia, the doctor will likely recommend iron supplements for your child. These are taken by mouth.\u00a0 Do not give your child iron supplements or vitamins with iron without checking with your child's doctor. The doctor will prescribe the right kind of supplement for your child. If your child takes too much iron, it can cause poisoning.", "Prevention": "Eating healthy foods is the most important way to prevent and treat iron deficiency.", "Causes": "\r\n \r\nAnemia caused by a low iron level is the most common form of anemia. The body gets iron through certain foods. It also reuses iron from old red blood cells.A diet that does not have enough iron is the most common cause. During periods of rapid growth, even more iron is needed.Babies are born with iron stored in their bodies. Because they grow rapidly, infants and toddlers need to absorb a lot of iron each day. Iron deficiency anemia most commonly affects babies 9 through 24 months old. Breastfed babies need less iron because iron is absorbed better when it is in breast milk. Formula with iron added (iron fortified) also provides enough iron.Infants younger than 12 months who drink cow's milk rather than breast milk or iron-fortified formula are more likely to have anemia. Cow's milk leads to anemia because it:Has less iron, Causes small amounts of blood loss from the intestines, Makes it harder for the body to absorb iron. Children older than 12 months who drink too much cow's milk may also have anemia if they do not eat enough other healthy foods that have iron."}, "Achilles tendon rupture - aftercare": {"description": "Heel cord tear; Calcaneal tendon rupture"}, "Allergic rhinitis - what to ask your doctor - adult": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your allergies."}, "Abdominal MRI scan": {"description": "Single MRI images are called slices. The images can be stored on a computer or printed on film. One exam produces dozens or sometimes hundreds of images."}, "Amebiasis": {"description": "Amebiasis is an infection of the intestines caused by the parasite Entamoeba histolytica.", "Possible Complications": "Liver abscess, Medication side effects, including nausea\r\n, Spread of the parasite through the blood to the liver, lungs, brain, or other organs. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramps", "Diarrhea: Passage of 3\u00a0to 8 semiformed stools per day, or\u00a0passage of soft stools with mucus and occasional blood \r\n ", "Fatigue", "Excessive gas", "Rectal pain while having a bowel movement (tenesmus)", "Unintentional weight loss", "Abdominal tenderness", "Bloody stools, including passage of liquid stools with streaks of blood, passage of 10\u00a0to 20 stools per day \r\n ", "Fever", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. You will be asked about your medical history, especially if you have recently traveled overseas. Examination of the abdomen may show liver enlargement or tenderness in the abdomen.Tests that may be ordered include:Blood test for amebiasis, Examination of the inside of the lower large bowel (sigmoidoscopy), Stool test, Microscope examination of stool samples, usually with multiple samples over several days. ", "Treatment": "\r\nTreatment depends on how severe the infection is. Usually,\u00a0antibiotics are prescribed. \r\n If you are vomiting, you may need to receive medicines through a vein (intravenously) until you can take them by mouth.\u00a0Medicines to stop diarrhea\u00a0are usually not prescribed, because they can make the condition worse.After antibiotic treatment,\u00a0your stool\u00a0will likely\u00a0be rechecked to make sure the infection has been cleared.", "Prevention": "When traveling in countries where sanitation is poor, drink purified or boiled water. Do not eat uncooked vegetables or unpeeled fruit.", "Causes": "Entamoeba histolytica can live in the large intestine (colon) without causing damage to the intestine.\u00a0In some cases,\u00a0it invades the colon wall, causing colitis, acute dysentery, or long-term (chronic) diarrhea. The infection can also spread through the blood to the liver.\u00a0In rare cases, it can spread\u00a0to the lungs, brain, or other organs.This condition occurs worldwide. It is most common in tropical areas\u00a0that have\u00a0crowded living conditions and poor sanitation. Africa, Mexico, parts of South America, and India have\u00a0major health problems\u00a0due to\u00a0this disease.Entamoeba histolytica is spread through food or water contaminated with stools. This contamination is common when human waste is used as fertilizer. It can also be spread from person to person, particularly by contact with the mouth or rectal area of an infected person.Risk factors for severe amebiasis include:Alcoholism, Cancer, Malnutrition, Older or younger age, Pregnancy, Recent travel to a tropical region, Use of corticosteroid medication to suppress the immune system. In the United States, amebiasis is most common among those who live in institutions or people who have traveled to an area where amebiasis is common."}, "Autonomic neuropathy": {"description": "Autonomic neuropathy is a group of symptoms that occur when there is damage to the nerves that manage every day body functions such as blood pressure, heart rate, sweating, bowel and bladder emptying, and digestion.", "Possible Complications": "Fluid or electrolyte imbalance such as low blood potassium (if excessive vomiting or diarrhea), Injuries from falls (with postural dizziness), Kidney failure (from urine backup), Malnutrition, Psychological/social effects of impotence. ", "Symptoms": ["Constipation (hard stools)", "Diarrhea (loose stools)", "Feeling full after only a few bites (early satiety)", "Nausea after eating", "Problems controlling bowel movements", "Swallowing problems", "Swollen abdomen", "Vomiting of undigested food", "Abnormal heart rate or rhythm", "Blood pressure changes with position and causes dizziness when standing", "High blood pressure", "Shortness of breath with activity or exercise", "Difficulty beginning to urinate", "Feeling of incomplete bladder emptying", "Leaking urine\u00a0", "Sweating too much or not enough", "Heat intolerance brought on with activity and exercise", "Sexual problems including erection problems in men and vaginal dryness and orgasm difficulties in women", "Small pupil in one eye", "Weight loss without trying"], "Exams and Tests": "Signs\u00a0of\u00a0autonomic nerve damage are not always seen when yourdoctor or nurse examines you. Your blood pressure or heart rate may change when lying down, sitting, and standing. Special tests to measure sweating and heart rate may be done. This is\u00a0called \"autonomic testing.\"Other tests depend on what type of symptoms you have. ", "Treatment": "Treatment to reverse nerve damage is most often not possible. As a result, treatment and self-care are focused on managing your symptoms and preventing further problems.Your doctor or nurse may recommend: Extra salt in the diet or taking salt tablets to increase fluid volume in blood vessels, Fludrocortisone or similar medications to help your body retain salt and fluid, Medicines to treat irregular heart rhythms, Pacemaker, Sleeping with the head raised, Wearing elastic stockings. The following may help your intestines and stomach work better:Daily bowel care program, Medications that increase gastric motility (such as Reglan), Sleeping with the head raised, Small, frequent meals. Medicines and self-care programs can help you if you have: Urinary incontinence, Neurogenic bladder, Erection problems. ", "Prevention": "Preventing or controlling disorders associated with autonomic neuropathy may reduce the risk. For example, people with diabetes should closely control blood sugar levels. ", "Causes": "Autonomic neuropathy is a group of symptoms, not a specific disease. There are many causes.Autonomic neuropathy involves damage to the nerves that carry information from the brain and spinal cord to the heart, bladder, intestines,\u00a0sweat glands, pupils, and blood vessels.Autonomic neuropathy may be seen with:\r\n  Alcohol abuse\r\n  , \r\n  Diabetes (diabetic neuropathy), Disorders involving scarring of tissues around the nerves, Guillain Barre syndrome or other diseases that inflame nerves, HIV and AIDS, Inherited nerve disorders, Multiple sclerosis, Parkinson's disease, Spinal cord injury\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 , Surgery or injury involving the nerves. "}, "Aortic aneurysm repair - endovascular": {"description": "An aortic aneurysm is when a part of this artery becomes too large or balloons outward due to weakness in the wall of the artery."}, "Autoimmune hepatitis": {"description": "Autoimmune hepatitis is inflammation of the liver. It occurs when immune cells mistake the liver's normal cells for harmful invaders and attack them.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Cirrhosis, Side effects from steroids and other medicines, Hepatocellular carcinoma, Liver failure . ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal distention", "Dark urine", "Fatigue", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)", "Itching", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea or vomiting", "Pale or clay-colored stools"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests for autoimmune hepatitis include:Anti-liver kidney microsome type 1 antibody (anti LKM-1), Anti-nuclear antibody (ANA), Anti-smooth muscle antibody (SMA), Serum IgG, Liver function tests, Liver biopsy to look for chronic hepatitis . ", "Treatment": "You may need prednisone or other corticosteroid medicines help reduce the inflammation. Azathioprine and 6-mercaptopurine are drugs used to treat other autoimmune disorders. They have been shown to help people with autoimmune hepatitis, as well.Some people may need a liver transplant.", "Prevention": "Autoimmune hepatitis cannot be prevented in most cases. Knowing the risk factors may help you detect and treat the disease early. ", "Causes": "This form of hepatitis is an autoimmune disease. The body's immune system cannot tell the difference between healthy body tissue and harmful, outside substances. The result is an immune response that destroys normal body tissues.Liver inflammation, or hepatitis, may occur along with other autoimmune diseases. These include:Graves disease, Inflammatory bowel disease, Rheumatoid arthritis, Scleroderma, Sjogren syndrome, Systemic lupus erythematosus, Thyroiditis, Type 1 diabetes, Ulcerative colitis. Autoimmune hepatitis may occur in family members of people with autoimmune diseases. There may be a genetic cause.This disease is most common in young girls and women."}, "Audiometry": {"description": "The normal range of human hearing is about 20 Hz - 20,000 Hz. Some animals can hear up to 50,000 Hz. Human speech is usually 500 - 3,000 Hz."}, "Adenomyosis": {"Symptoms": ["Long-term or heavy menstrual bleeding", "Painful menstruation, which gets worse", "Pelvic pain during intercourse "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will make the diagnosis if a woman has symptoms of adenomyosis that are not caused by other problems. The only way to confirm the diagnosis is by examining the tissue of the uterus after a hysterectomy.During a pelvic exam, the doctor may find a soft and slightly enlarged uterus. The exam may also reveal a uterine mass or uterine tenderness.An ultrasound of the uterus may help tell the difference between adenomyosis and other uterine tumors. MRI can be helpful when ultrasound does not give definite results.", "description": "Adenomyosis is a thickening of the uterus. It occurs when endometrial tissue, which normally lines the uterus, moves into the outer walls of the uterus.", "Causes": "The cause is unknown. Sometimes adenomyosis may cause a mass or growth within the uterus. This is called an adenomyoma.The disease most often occurs in women ages 40 - 50\u00a0who have had at least one pregnancy.", "Treatment": "Most women have some adenomyosis as they\u00a0get close to\u00a0menopause. However, only a few will have symptoms. Most women do not need treatment.Birth control pills and a progesterone-containing intrauterine device (IUD) can help decrease heavy bleeding. Anti-inflammatory medication such as ibuprofen or naproxen can also help manage symptoms.A hysterectomy may be necessary in women with severe symptoms."}, "Aging spots - should you be concerned": {"description": "See also: Skin cancer"}, "Aortic angiography": {"description": "Angiography is an imaging test that uses x-rays and a special dye to see inside the arteries. Arteries are blood vessels that carry blood away from the heart."}, "Autism - resources": {"description": "The following organizations and links are good resources for information on autism:"}, "Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis": {"description": "ALS is also known as Lou Gehrig's disease.", "Possible Complications": "Breathing in food or fluid (aspiration), Loss of ability to care for self, Lung failure (See: Adult respiratory distress syndrome), Pneumonia, Pressure sores, Weight loss. ", "Symptoms": ["Depression", "Difficulty breathing", "Difficulty swallowing -- choking easily, drooling, or gagging", "Head drop due to weakness of the neck muscles", "Muscle cramps", "Muscle stiffness, called spasticity", "Muscle contractions called fasciculations", "Muscle weakness that starts in one body part, such as the arm or hand, and slowly gets worse until it leads to difficulty lifting, climbing stairs, and walking", "Paralysis", "Speech problems, such as a slow or abnormal speech pattern (slurring of words)", "Voice changes, hoarseness", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you and ask questions about your medical history and symptoms.The physical exam may show:Weakness, often beginning in one area, Muscle tremors, spasms, twitching, or loss of muscle tissue, Twitching of the tongue (common), Abnormal reflexes, Stiff or clumsy walk, Decreased or increased reflexes at the joints, Difficulty controlling crying or laughing (sometimes called emotional incontinence), Loss of gag reflex . Tests that may be done include:Blood tests to rule out other conditions, Breathing test to see if lung muscles are affected, Cervical spine CT or MRI to be sure there is no disease or injury to the neck, which can mimic ALS, Electromyography to see which nerves or muscles do not work properly, Genetic testing, if there is a family history of ALS, Head CT or MRI to rule out other conditions, Swallowing studies, Spinal tap (lumbar puncture). ", "Treatment": "There is no known cure for ALS. A medicine called riluzole helps slow down the symptoms and helps people live slightly longer. Treatments to control other symptoms include:Baclofen or diazepam for spasticity that interferes with daily activities, Trihexyphenidyl or amitriptyline for people with problems swallowing their own saliva. Physical therapy, rehabilitation, use of braces or a wheelchair, or other measures may be needed to help with muscle function and general health.Choking is common. Patients may decide to have a tube placed into their stomach for feeding. This is called a gastrostomy.A nutritionist is very important. Patients with ALS tend to lose weight. The illness itself increases the need for food and calories. At the same time, problems with swallowing make it hard to eat enough.Breathing devices include machines that are used only at night, and constant mechanical ventilation.Patients should ask their doctor about medicine for depression if they are feeling sad. They also should discuss their wishes regarding artificial ventilation with their families and doctors.", "Prevention": "You may want to see a genetic counselor if you have a family history of ALS.", "Causes": "1 out of 10 cases of ALS are due to a genetic defect. The cause is unknown in most other cases.In ALS, motor nerve cells (neurons) waste away or die, and can no longer send messages to muscles. This eventually leads to muscle weakening, twitching, and an inability to move the arms, legs, and body. The condition slowly gets worse. When the muscles in the chest area stop working, it becomes hard or impossible to breathe.ALS affects approximately 5 out of every 100,000 people worldwide.Having a family member who has a hereditary form of the disease is a risk factor for ALS. Other risks include military service. Some risk factors are controversial."}, "Abdominal girth": {"description": "Abdominal girth is the measurement of the distance around the abdomen at a specific point. Measurement is most often made at the level of the belly button (navel). Abdominal girth is used to diagnose and monitor the following:"}, "Atrial septal defect (ASD)": {"description": "As a baby develops in the womb, a wall (called the interatrial septum) forms that divides the upper chamber into a left and right atrium. An abnormal formation of this wall can result in a hole that remains after birth. This is called an atrial septal defect, or ASD. ", "Possible Complications": "People with a larger or more complicated ASD are at an increased risk for developing\u00a0other problems, including:Arrhythmias, particularly atrial fibrillation, Heart failure, Heart infections (endocarditis), High blood pressure in the arteries of the lungs (pulmonary hypertension \r\n), Stroke. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty breathing (dyspnea)", "Frequent respiratory infections in children", "Feeling the heart beat (palpitations) in adults", "Shortness of breath with activity "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will check how large and severe an ASD is based on the symptoms, physical exam, and the results of heart tests.The doctor may hear abnormal heart sounds when listening to the chest with a stethoscope. A murmur may be heard only in certain body positions. Sometimes, a murmur may not be heard at all. A murmur means that blood is not flowing through the heart smoothly. The physical exam may also show signs of heart failure in some adults.An echocardiogram is a test that uses sound waves to create a moving picture of the heart. It is often the first test done.Other tests that may be done include:Cardiac catheterization, Coronary angiography (for patients over 35 years old), Doppler study of the heart, ECG, Heart MRI, Transesophageal echocardiography (TEE) . ", "Treatment": "ASD may not need treatment if there are few or no symptoms, or if the defect is small and is not associated with other abnormalities. Surgery to close the defect is recommended if the defect causes a large amount of shunting, the heart is swollen, or symptoms occur.A procedure has been developed to close the defect without surgery. The procedure involves placing an ASD closure device into the heart through tubes called catheters. , The health care provider makes a tiny cut in the groin, then inserts the catheters into a blood vessel and up into the heart. , The closure device is then placed across the ASD and the defect is closed.. Some people with atrial septal defects may be able to have this procedure, depending on the size and location of the defect. People who have surgery for ASD should get antibiotics before any dental procedures they have in the period following the procedure. Antibiotics are not needed later on.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent the defect. Some of the complications can be prevented with early detection.", "Causes": "Blood can flow between the two upper heart chambers through the ASD.When blood flows between the two heart chambers. This is called a shunt. Pressure in the lungs may build up. Over time, there will be less oxygen in the blood that goes to the body. Small atrial septal defects often cause very few problems, and may be discovered much later in life. Many problems can occur if the opening is large, or if there is more than one opening. ASD is not very common. "}, "Angioplasty and stent placement - heart": {"description": "A coronary artery stent is a small, metal mesh tube that expands inside a coronary artery. A stent is often placed during or immediately after angioplasty. It helps prevent the artery from closing up again. A drug-eluting stent has medicine embedded in it that helps prevent the artery from closing in the long term."}, "Amenorrhea - primary": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask questions about your medical history. A pregnancy test will be done.Blood tests may include:Estradiol, FSH, LH, Prolactin, TSH, T3 and T4. Other tests that may be done include:17 hydroxyprogesterone, Chromosome analysis, Head CT scan, Head MRI scan, Pelvic ultrasound, Serum progresterone, Serum testosterone levels. ", "description": "Primary amenorrhea is when a girl has not yet started her monthly periods, and she:", "Causes": "Most girls begin menstruating between ages 9 and 18, with an average of around 12 years old. Primary amenorrhea typically occurs when a girl is older than 15, if she has gone through other normal changes that occur during puberty. Primary amenorrhea may occur with or without other signs of puberty.Being born with incompletely formed genital or pelvic organs can lead to primary amenorrhea. Some of these defects include:Blockages or narrowing of the cervix, Hymen that has no opening, Missing uterus or vagina, Vaginal septum (a partition that divides the vagina into two sections). Hormones play a big role in a woman's menstrual cycle. Hormone problems can occur when:Changes occur to the parts of the brain where hormones that help manage the menstrual cycle are produced, The ovaries are not working correctly . Either of these problems may be due to:Anorexia (loss of appetite), Chronic or long-term illnesses, such as cystic fibrosis or heart disease, Genetic defects or disorders, Infections that occur in the womb or after birth, Other birth defects, Poor nutrition, Tumors . In many cases, the cause of primary amenorrhea is not known.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of the missing period. Primary amenorrhea that is caused by birth defects may require hormone medications, surgery, or both.If the amenorrhea is caused by a tumor in the brain:Medications may shrink certain types of tumors., Surgery to remove the tumor may also be needed., Radiation therapy is usually only done when other treatments have not worked. . If the condition is caused by a body-wide disease, treatment of the disease may allow menstruation to begin.If the amenorrhea is due to anorexia or too much exercise, periods will often begin when the weight returns to normal or the exercise level is decreased.If the amenorrhea cannot be corrected, medicines can sometimes create a menstrual-like situation. Medicines can help the woman feel more like her friends and female family members. They can also protect the bones from becoming too thin (osteoporosis)."}, "Acne": {"Symptoms": ["Crusting of skin bumps", "Cysts", "Papules (small red bumps)", "Pustules", "Redness around the skin eruptions", "Scarring of the skin", "Whiteheads", "Blackheads"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor can diagnose acne by looking at your skin. Testing is not needed in most cases.", "description": "Acne is a skin condition that causes pimples or \"zits.\" Whiteheads, blackheads, and red, inflamed patches of skin (such as cysts) may develop.", "Causes": "Acne occurs when tiny holes on the surface of the skin become clogged. These holes are called pores. Each pore opens to a follicle. A follicle contains a hair and an oil gland. The oil released by the gland helps remove old skin cells and keeps your skin soft., When glands produce too much oil, the pores can become blocked. Dirt, bacteria, and cells build up. The blockage is called a plug or comedone., If the top of the plug is white, it is called a\u00a0whitehead., If the top of the plug is\u00a0dark, it is called a blackhead., If the plug breaks open, swelling and red bumps occur., Acne that is deep in your skin can\u00a0cause hard, painful cysts. This is called cystic acne.. Acne is most common in teenagers, but anyone can get acne, even babies. The problem tends to run in families.Some things that may trigger acne include: Hormonal changes that make the skin oilier. These may be related to puberty, menstrual periods, pregnancy, birth control pills, or stress. , Greasy or oily cosmetic and hair products, Certain drugs (such as steroids, testosterone, estrogen, and phenytoin), Heavy sweating and humidity. Research does not show that chocolate, nuts, and greasy foods cause acne. However, diets high in refined sugars or dairy products may be related to acne in some people.", "Treatment": "SELF-CARESteps you can take to help your acne:Clean your skin gently with a mild, nondrying soap (such as Dove, Neutrogena, Cetaphil, CeraVe, or Basics)., Look for water-based or \"noncomedogenic\" formulas for cosmetics and skin creams. (Noncomedogenic products have been tested and proven not to clog pores and cause acne.), Remove all dirt or make-up. Wash once or twice a day, including after exercising., Avoid scrubbing or repeated skin washing., Shampoo your hair daily, especially if it is oily., Comb or pull your hair back to keep the hair out of your face. . What NOT to do:Try not to squeeze, scratch, pick, or rub the pimples. This can lead to skin infections and scarring., Avoid wearing tight headbands, baseball caps, and other hats., Avoid touching your face with your hands or fingers., Avoid greasy cosmetics or creams., Do not leave make-up on overnight. . If these steps do not clear up the blemishes, try over-the-counter acne medicines that you apply to your skin.These products may contain benzoyl peroxide, sulfur, resorcinol, or salicylic acid., They work by killing bacteria, drying up skin oils, or causing the top layer of your skin to peel., They may cause redness or peeling of the skin. . A small amount of sun exposure may improve acne slightly, but tanning mostly hides the acne. Too much exposure to sunlight or ultraviolet rays is not recommended because it increases the risk for skin cancer.MEDICINES FROM YOUR HEALTH CARE PROVIDERIf pimples are still a problem, a health care provider can prescribe stronger medications and discuss other options with you.Antibiotics may help some people with acne:Oral antibiotics (taken by mouth) such as tetracycline, doxycycline, minocycline, erythromycin, trimethoprim, and amoxicillin, Topical antibiotics (applied to the skin) such as clindamycin, erythromycin, or dapsone . Creams or gels applied to the skin may be prescribed:Retinoic acid cream or gel (tretinoin, Retin-A), Prescription formulas of benzoyl peroxide, sulfur, resorcinol, or salicylic acid, Topical azelaic acid . For women whose acne is caused or made worse by hormones:A pill called spironolactone may help, Birth control pills may help in some cases, though they may make acne worse in some women.. Minor procedures or treatments may also be helpful:A laser procedure called photodynamic therapy may be used., Your doctor may also suggest chemical skin peeling; removal of scars by dermabrasion; or removal, drainage, or injection of cysts with cortisone.. People who have cystic acne and scarring may try a medicine called isotretinoin (Accutane). You will be watched closely when taking this medicine because of its side effects.Pregnant women should NOT take Accutane, because it causes severe birth defects. Women taking Accutane must use two forms of birth control before starting the drug and enroll in the iPledge program., Your doctor will follow you on this drug and you will have regular blood tests. . "}, "Abscess - abdomen or pelvis": {"description": "An abdominal abscess is a pocket of infected fluid and pus located inside the belly (abdominal cavity). This type of abscess can be located near or inside the liver, pancreas, kidneys or other organs. There can be one or more abscesses.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:The abscess may not drain fully, The abscess may come back (recur), The abscess may cause severe illness and a bloodstream infection, The infection could spread. ", "Symptoms": ["May be found only in one area of your belly or over most of your belly", "May be sharp or dull", "May become worse over time", "Pain in\u00a0your back", "Pain in\u00a0your chest or shoulder", "Swollen belly", "Diarrhea ", "Fever or chills", "Lack of appetite and possible weight loss", "Nausea or vomiting", "Weakness", "Cough"], "Exams and Tests": "Your symptoms can be a sign of many different problems. Your health care provider will do some tests when they think you have an abdominal abscess. These may include the following tests:Complete blood count -- A high white blood cell count is a possible sign of an abscess of other infection., Comprehensive metabolic panel -- This will show any liver, kidney or blood problems.. Other tests that should show abdominal abscesses:Abdominal x-ray, Ultrasound of the abdomen and pelvis, CT scan of the abdomen\u00a0 and pelvis, MRI of the abdomen and pelvis. ", "Treatment": "Your health care team will try to identify and treat the cause of the abscess. Your abscess will be treated with antibiotics and drainage of the pus. At first, you will likely receive care in the hospital.ANTIBIOTICSYou will be given antibiotics to treat the abscess. You will take them for up to 4 to 6 weeks.You will start on IV antibiotics in the hospital and you may receive IV antibiotics at home., You then may change to pills. Be sure you take all of your antibiotics, even if you feel better.. DRAINAGEYour abscess needs to be drained of pus. Your health care provider and you will decide the best way to do this.Using a needle and drain -- Your provider puts a needle through the skin and into the abscess. Usually, this is done with the help of x-rays to make sure the needle is inserted into the abscess.Your provider will give you medicine to make you sleepy, and medicine to numb the skin before the needle is inserted into the skin.A sample of the abscess will be sent to the lab. This helps your provider choose which antibiotics to use.A drain is left in the abscess so that pus can drain out. Usually, the drain is kept in for days or weeks until the abscess gets better.Having surgery -- Sometimes a surgeon does surgery to clean out the abscess. You will be put under general anesthesia so that you are asleep for the surgery. Surgery may be needed if:Your abscess cannot be reached safely using a needle through the skin, Your appendix, intestines, or another organ has burst. The surgeon will make a cut into the belly area. Laparotomy involves a larger cut. Laparoscopy uses a very small cut and a laparascope (a tiny video camera). The surgeon will then:Clean and drain the abscess., Put a drain into the abscess. The drain stays in until the abscess gets better.. ", "Causes": "You can get abdominal abscesses because you have:A burst appendix, A burst intestine, A burst ovary, Inflammatory bowel disease, Infection in your gallbladder, pancreas, ovary or other organs, Pelvic infection, Parasite infection. You are more at risk for an abdominal abscess if you have:Trauma, Perforated ulcer disease, Surgery in your belly area, Weakened immune system. Germs may pass through your blood to an organ in your belly. Sometimes, no reason can be found for an abscess."}, "Abscess scan - radioactive": {"description": "Radioactive abscess scan looks\u00a0abscesses in the body using a radioactive material. An abscess occurs when pus collects due to an infection. "}, "Appendicitis": {"Symptoms": ["Chills and shaking", "Hard stools", "Diarrhea", "Fever", "Nausea and vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "How you describe your symptoms can lead your doctor to suspect appendicitis. Your doctor will do a physical exam. If you have appendicitis, your pain will increase when the doctor gently presses on your lower right belly area., If your appendix has ruptured, touching the belly area may cause a lot of pain and lead you to tighten your muscles., A rectal exam may find tenderness on the right side of your rectum. . A blood test will often show a high white blood cell count. Imaging tests may also help diagnose appendicitis. Imaging tests include:CT scan of the abdomen, Ultrasound of the abdomen. ", "description": "Appendicitis is swelling (inflammation) of the appendix. The appendix is a small pouch attached to the large intestine.", "Causes": "Appendicitis is a very common cause of emergency surgery. The problem most often occurs when the appendix becomes blocked by feces, a foreign object, or rarely, a tumor.", "Treatment": "Most of the time, a surgeon will remove your appendix as soon as you are diagnosed. If a CT scan shows that you have an abscess, you may be treated with antibiotics first. You will have your appendix removed after the infection and swelling have gone away.The tests used to diagnose appendicitis are not perfect. As a result, the operation may show that your appendix is normal. In that case, the surgeon will remove your appendix and explore the rest of your abdomen for other causes of your pain."}, "Atheroembolic renal disease": {"description": "Atheroembolic renal disease (AERD) occurs when small particles made of hardened cholesterol and fat spread to the small blood vessels of the kidneys.", "Causes": "AERD is linked to atherosclerosis. Atherosclerosis is a common disorder of the arteries. It occurs when fat, cholesterol, and other substances build up in the walls of arteries and form a hard substance called plaque.In AERD, cholesterol crystals break off from the plaque lining the arteries. These crystals move into the bloodstream. Once in circulation, the crystals get stuck in tiny blood vessels called arterioles. There, they reduce blood flow to tissues and cause swelling (inflammation) and tissue damage that can harm the kidneys or other parts of the body. Acute arterial occlusion occurs when the artery that supplies blood to the kidney suddenly becomes blocked.The kidneys are involved about half of the time. Other body parts that may be involved include the skin, eyes, muscles and bones, brain and nerves, and organs in the abdomen. Acute kidney failure is possible if the blockages of the kidney blood vessels are severe.Atherosclerosis of the aorta is the most common cause of AERD. The cholesterol crystals may also break off during aortic angiography, cardiac catheterization, or surgery of the aorta or other major arteries.In some cases, AERD may occur without a known cause.The risk factors for AERD are the same as risk factors for atherosclerosis, including age, male gender, cigarette smoking, high blood pressure, and diabetes."}, "Autosomal dominant": {"description": "In an autosomal dominant disease, if you inherit the abnormal gene from only one parent, you can get the disease. Often, one of the parents may also have the disease."}, "Avian influenza": {"description": "Avian influenza A viruses cause the flu infection in birds. The viruses that cause the disease in birds can change (mutate) so it can spread to humans.", "Possible Complications": "Acute respiratory failure, \r\n  Organ failure\r\n  , Pneumonia, Sepsis. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough", "Diarrhea", "Trouble breathing", "Fever greater than 100.4\u00b0F (38\u00b0C)", "Headache", "General ill feeling (malaise)", "Muscle aches", "Runny nose", "Sore throat "], "Exams and Tests": "If you think you have been exposed to the virus, call your health care provider before your visit. This will give the staff a chance to take steps to protect themselves and other patients during your office visit.There are tests for the avian flu but they are not widely available. One type of test can give results in about 4 hours.Your health care provider might also do the following tests:Auscultation (to detect abnormal breath sounds), Chest x-ray, Nasopharyngeal virus detection by reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR), Nasopharyngeal culture, Throat virus detection by RT-PCR, White blood cell differential . Other tests may be done to look at how well your heart, kidneys, and liver are working. ", "Treatment": "Treatment varies based on your symptoms.In general, treatment with the antiviral medication oseltamivir (Tamiflu) or zanamivir (Relenza) may make the disease less severe. You need to start taking the medicine within 48 hours after your symptoms start for it to work.Oseltamivir may also be prescribed for persons who live in the same house people with avian flu. This may prevent them from getting the illness.The virus that causes human avian flu is resistant to the antiviral medicines amantadine and rimantadine. These medicines should not be used in the case of an H5N1 outbreak occurs.People with severe infection may need to be placed on a breathing machine. People infected with the virus also should be kept separate from non-infected people. Health care providers recommend that people get an influenza (flu) shot. This may cut down the chance that the avian flu virus will mix with a human flu virus. This might create a new virus that may easily spread.The U.S. Food and Drug Administration has approved a vaccine to protect humans from the avian flu. This vaccine could be used if the current H5N1 virus starts spreading between people. The U.S. Federal Government keeps a stockpile of H5N1 vaccine.", "Prevention": "At this time, the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) does not recommend against travel to countries affected by avian influenza.The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention makes the following recommendations.As a general precaution:Avoid wild birds and watch them only from a distance., Avoid touching sick birds and surfaces that may be covered in their feces., Use protective clothing and special breathing masks if you work with birds or if you go into buildings with sick or dead birds, feces, or liltter from infected birds., If you have had contact with infected birds, watch for signs of infection. If you do become infected, tell your doctor., Avoid undercooked or uncooked meat. This\u00a0reduces the risk of exposure to avian flu and other foodborne diseases.. If traveling to other countries:Avoid visits to live-bird markets and poultry farms., Avoid preparing or eating undercooked poultry products., See your doctor if you become sick after you return from your trip.. Current information regarding avian flu is available at: http://www.cdc.gov/flu/avianflu/avian-in-humans.htm.", "Causes": "The first avian influenza in humans was reported in Hong Kong in 1997. It was called avian influenza (H5N1). The outbreak was linked to chickens.Since then there have been human cases of avian influenza A in Asia, Africa, Europe, Indonesia, Vietnam, the Pacific, and the near East. Hundreds of people have become sick with this virus. Up to half of the people who get this virus die from the illness.Between December 15, 2014, and May 29, 2015 there have been more than 200 cases of birds infected with highly-pathogenic avian influenza (HPAI) H5.Most of these infections have occurred in both backyard and commercial poultry flocks., These recent HPAI H5 viruses have not yet infected any people in the United States.. The chance of a worldwide outbreak in humans goes up the more the avian flu virus spreads. Your risk of getting the bird flu virus is higher if: You work with poultry (such as farmers), You travel to countries where the virus is present, You touch an infected bird, You go into a building with sick or dead birds, feces, or litter from infected birds, You eat raw or undercooked poultry meat, eggs, or blood from infected birds . No one has gotten avian flu virus from eating properly cooked poultry or poultry products.Health care workers and people who live in the same house as people with bird flu may also be at higher risk of infection. Avian flu viruses can live in the environment for long periods of time. Infection may be spread just by touching surfaces that have the virus on them. Birds who were infected with the flu can give off the virus in their feces and saliva for as long as 10 days."}, "Allergic rhinitis - what to ask your doctor - child": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your child\u2019s doctor or nurse to help you take care of your child's allergies."}, "Asbestosis": {"description": "Asbestosis is a lung disease that occurs from breathing in asbestos fibers.", "Possible Complications": "Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), Lung cancer, Malignant mesothelioma, Pleural effusion, Pleural plaques . ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Cough", "Shortness of breath with exertion (slowly gets worse over time)", "Tightness in the chest ", "Clubbing of fingers", "Nail abnormalities"], "Exams and Tests": "When listening to the chest with a stethoscope (auscultation), the doctor may hear a crackling sound called rales.These tests may help diagnose the disease:Chest x-ray, CT scan of the lungs, Gallium lung scan, Pulmonary function tests. ", "Treatment": "There is no cure. Stopping exposure to asbestos is essential. To ease symptoms, drainage, chest percussion, and vibration can help remove fluids from the lungs.The doctor may prescribe aerosol medications to thin lung fluids. People with this condition may need to receive oxygen by mask or by a plastic piece that fits into the nostrils. Certain patients may need a lung transplant.", "Prevention": "In people who have been exposed to asbestos for more than 10 years, screening with a chest x-ray every 3 to 5 years may detect asbestos-related diseases early. Stopping cigarette smoking can dramatically reduce the risk of asbestos-related lung cancer.", "Causes": "Breathing in asbestos fibers can cause scar tissue (fibrosis) to form inside the lung. Scarred lung tissue does not expand and contract normally.How severe the disease is depends on how long the person was exposed to asbestos and the amount he or she breathed in. Often, people do not notice symptoms for 20 years or more after the asbestos exposure.Asbestos fibers were commonly used in construction before 1975. Asbestos exposure occurred in asbestos mining and milling, construction, fireproofing, and other industries. Families of asbestos workers can also be exposed from particles brought home on the worker's clothing.Other asbestos-related diseases include:Pleural plaques (calcification), Malignant mesothelioma\u00a0(cancer of the pleura, the lining of the lung), which can develop 20 to 40 years after exposure, Pleural effusion, which is a collection that develops around the lung a few years after asbestos exposure, Lung cancer. Workers today are less likely to get asbestos-related diseases because of government regulations.Cigarette smoking increases the risk of getting asbestos-related diseases."}, "Anencephaly": {"description": "Anencephaly is the absence of a large part of the brain and the skull.", "Symptoms": ["Absence of the skull", "Absence of the brain (cerebral hemispheres and cerebellum)", "Facial feature abnormalities", "Heart defects"], "Exams and Tests": "A pregnancy ultrasound is done to confirm the diagnosis. The ultrasound may reveal too much fluid is in the uterus. This condition is called polyhydramnios.Other tests that may be done on the pregnant mother:Amniocentesis (to look for increased levels of alpha-fetoprotein), Alpha-fetoprotein level (increased levels suggest a neural tube defect), Urine estriol level. A pre-pregnancy serum folic acid test may also be done.", "Causes": "Anencephaly is one of the most common neural tube defects. Neural tube defects are birth defects that affect the tissue that grows into the spinal cord and brain.Anencephaly occurs early in the development of an unborn baby. It results when the upper part of the neural tube fails to close. Why this happens is not known. Possible causes include environmental toxins and low intake of folic acid by the mother during pregnancy.Anencephaly occurs in about 1 out of 10,000 births. The exact number is unknown, because many of these pregnancies result in miscarriage. Having one infant with this condition increases the risk of having another child with neural tube defects.", "Prevention": "It is important for women who may become pregnant to get enough folic acid.There is good evidence that folic acid can help reduce the risk of certain birth defects, including anencephaly. Women who are pregnant or planning to become pregnant should take a multivitamin with folic acid every day. Many foods are now fortified with folic acid to help prevent these kinds of birth defects.Getting enough folic acid can reduce the chance of neural tube defects by 50 percent.For specific recommendations, see folic acid (folate).", "Treatment": "There is no current therapy. Talk to your doctor about care decisions."}, "Alcohol and pregnancy": {"description": "Drinking alcohol while pregnant has been shown to cause harm to a baby as it develops in the womb. Alcohol used during pregnancy may also lead to long-term medical problems and birth defects. "}, "Alcoholism - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on alcoholism:"}, "Autonomic hyperreflexia": {"description": "Autonomic hyperreflexia is an abnormal, overreaction of the involuntary (autonomic) nervous system to stimulation. This reaction may include: ", "Possible Complications": "Complications may occur due to medication side effects. If the pulse rate drops severely, it can cause cardiac arrest.Long-term, severe high blood pressure may cause seizures, bleeding in the eyes, stroke, or death.", "Symptoms": ["Anxiety or worry", "Bladder or bowel problems", "Blurry vision", "Fainting", "Fever", "Flushing (skin turning red)", "Goosebumps", "Heavy sweating", "Irregular heartbeat", "Light-headedness or dizziness", "Muscle spasms, especially in the jaw", "Nasal congestion", "Throbbing headache ", "Flushed (red) skin above the level of the spinal cord injury", "High blood pressure", "Slow pulse or fast pulse", "Widened (dilated) pupils "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will do a complete nervous system and medical examination. Tell your doctor about all medications you are taking now, and that you took in the past. This will help determine which tests you need.Tests may include:Blood and urine tests, CT or MRI scan, EKG (measurement of the heart's electrical activity), Lumbar puncture, Tilt-table testing (testing of blood pressure as the body position changes), Toxicology screening (tests for any drugs, including medications, in your bloodstream), X-rays . ", "Treatment": "This condition is life threatening, so it is important to quickly find and treat the problem.A person with symptoms of autonomic hyperreflexia should:Sit up and raise their head, Remove tight clothing . Proper treatment depends on the cause. If medications or drugs are causing the symptoms, those drugs must be stopped. Any illness that is causing the symptoms needs to be treated. For example, the health care provider will check for a blocked urinary catheter and signs of constipation.If a slowing of the heart rate is causing the symptoms, drugs called anticholinergics (such as atropine) may be used.Very high blood pressure needs to be treated quickly but carefully, because the blood pressure can drop suddenly.You may need a pacemaker for an unstable heart rhythm.", "Prevention": "To prevent autonomic hyperreflexia, avoid medications that cause this condition or make it worse. In people with spinal cord injury, the following may also help prevent this condition:Do not let the bladder become too full, Keep pain levels low , Practice proper bowel care to avoid stool impaction, Practice proper skin care to avoid bedsores and skin infections, Prevent bladder infections. ", "Causes": "The most common cause of autonomic hyperreflexia is spinal cord injury. The nervous system of people with this condition over-responds to the types of stimulation that do not bother healthy people.Other causes include: Guillain-Barre syndrome, Medication side effects, Severe head trauma and other brain injuries, Subarachnoid hemorrhage (a form of brain bleeding), Use of illegal stimulant drugs\u00a0such as cocaine and amphetamines\u00a0 . The following conditions share many symptoms with autonomic hyperreflexia, but have a different cause:Carcinoid syndrome, Neuroleptic malignant syndrome (a condition caused by some medicines that leads to muscle stiffness, high fever, and drowsiness), Pheochromocytoma, Serotonin syndrome, Thyroid storm. "}, "Anticoagulant rodenticides poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blood in the urine", "Bloody stools", "Bruising and bleeding under the skin", "Confusion, lethargy, or altered mental status from bleeding in the brain", "Low blood pressure", "Nosebleed", "Pale skin", "Shock", "Vomiting blood"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Amelogenesis imperfecta": {"description": "Amelogenesis imperfecta is a tooth development disorder in which the teeth are covered with thin, abnormally formed enamel.", "Possible Complications": "The enamel is easily fractured and damaged, which affects the appearance of the teeth, especially if left untreated.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "A dentist can identify and diagnose the condition.", "Treatment": "The treatment depends on the severity of the problem. Full crowns will improve the appearance of the teeth and protect them from damage. Eating a diet that is low in sugar and practicing very good oral hygiene can reduce the chance of developing cavities.", "Causes": "Amelogenesis imperfecta is passed down through families as a dominant trait. That means you only need to get the abnormal gene from one parent in order for you to get the disease."}, "Angina - when you have chest pain": {"description": "Most times, people have angina when they are exposed to cold weather. People also feel it during physical activity. Examples are climbing stairs, walking uphill, lifting something heavy, or having sex."}, "Antibody titer": {"description": "Antibody titer is a laboratory test that measures the\u00a0level of antibodies in a\u00a0blood sample."}, "Allergies, asthma, and pollen ": {"description": "Allergic rhinitis - pollen"}, "Aspiration": {"description": "Aspiration as a medical procedure may also be used to remove tissue samples for a biopsy. This is sometimes called a needle biopsy or aspirate. For example, aspiration of a breast lesion.\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 "}, "Abdominal tap ": {"description": "An abdominal tap is used to remove fluid from the area between the belly wall and the spine. This space is called the abdominal cavity."}, "Anoscopy": {"description": "Anoscopy is a method to look at the anus, anal canal, and lower rectum."}, "Acquired platelet function defect": {"description": "Acquired platelet function defects are conditions that prevent clotting elements in the blood called platelets from working as they should. The term \"acquired\" means these conditions are not present at birth.", "Possible Complications": "Prolonged bleeding, Severe anemia. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal menstrual periodsHeavy menstrual periods, Prolonged menstrual bleeding (more than 5 days per menstrual period). ", "Heavy menstrual periods", "Prolonged menstrual bleeding (more than 5 days per menstrual period)", "Abnormal vaginal bleeding", "Bleeding in the urine", "Bleeding under the skin or in the muscles (soft tissues)", "Gastrointestinal bleedingBloody, dark black, or tarry bowel movements, Vomiting blood or material that looks like coffee grounds. ", "Bloody, dark black, or tarry bowel movements", "Vomiting blood or material that looks like coffee grounds", "Nosebleeds", "Prolonged bleeding, easy bruising", "Skin rashBruises, Pinpoint red spots (petechiae). ", "Bruises", "Pinpoint red spots (petechiae)"], "Exams and Tests": "Bleeding time, Platelet aggregation test, Platelet count, PT and PTT. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at the cause of the problem.Bone marrow disorders are treated with platelet transfusions or removing platelets from the blood (platelet pheresis). Chemotherapy is can used to treat an underlying condition that is causing the problem., Platelet function defects caused by kidney failure are treated with dialysis or a drug called desmopressin (ddAVP)., Platelet problems caused by a certain medicine are treated by stopping the drug.. ", "Prevention": "Using medicines as directed \u00a0can reduce the risk of drug-related acquired platelet function defects. Treating other disorders may also reduce the risk. Some cases cannot be prevented. ", "Causes": "With platelet disorders can affect the number of platelets, how well they function, or both. Any platelet disorder affects normal blood clotting.Disorders that can cause problems in platelet function include:Chronic myelogenous leukemia,  \r\n Primary myelofibrosis, Polycythemia vera, Primary thrombocythemia. Other causes include:Kidney (renal) failure, Multiple myeloma, Medicines such as aspirin, ibuprofen and other anti-inflammatory drugs, penicillins, phenothiazines, and prednisone (after long-term use). "}, "Ambiguous genitalia": {"description": "Ambiguous genitalia is a birth defect where the outer genitals do not have the typical appearance of either a boy or a girl.", "Causes": "Pseudohermaphroditism. The genitalia are of one sex, but some physical characteristics of the other sex are present., True hermaphroditism.\u00a0This is a\u00a0very rare condition, in which tissue from both the ovaries and testicles is present. The child may have parts of both male and female genitals., Mixed gonadal dysgenesis (MGD).\u00a0This is an\u00a0intersex condition, in which there are some male structures (gonad, testis), as well as a uterus, vagina, and fallopian tubes., Congenital adrenal hyperplasia. This condition has several forms, but the most common form causes the genetic female to appear male. Many states test for this potentially life-threatening condition during newborn screening exams., Chromosomal abnormalities, including Klinefelter's syndrome (XXY) and Turner's syndrome (XO)., If the mother takes certain medications (such as androgenic steroids), they may make a genetic female look more male., Lack of production of certain hormones can cause the embryo to develop with a female body type, regardless of genetic sex, Lack of testosterone cellular receptors. Even if the body makes the hormones needed to develop into a physical male, the body cannot respond to those hormones. This produces a female body-type, even if the genetic sex is male. . "}, "Alopecia areata": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "A\u00a0scalp biopsy may be done. Several blood tests may also be done to check for\u00a0autoimmune conditions and thyroid problems.", "description": "Alopecia areata is a condition that causes round patches of hair loss. It can lead to total hair loss.", "Causes": "The cause of alopecia areata is unknown.\u00a0Some people with this condition have a family history of alopecia.Alopecia areata is thought to be an autoimmune condition. This occurs when the immune system mistakenly attacks and destroys healthy body tissue.Alopecia areata is seen in men, women, and children. In a few people, hair loss may occur after a\u00a0major life event such as an illness, pregnancy, or trauma. Forms of alopecia include:Alopecia areata -- patches of hair loss, Alopecia totalis -- complete loss of scalp hair, Alopecia universalis -- total loss of all body hair. ", "Treatment": "If hair loss is not widespread, the hair will\u00a0often regrow in a few months without treatment.For more severe hair loss, it is not clear how much treatment can help change the course of the condition.Common treatments may include:Steroid injection under the skin surface, Medicines\u00a0applied to\u00a0the skin, Ultraviolet light therapy . Wigs may be used to hide areas of hair loss."}, "Apoplexy": {"description": "Functional apoplexy is when a person appears to be having stroke-like symptoms but there is no brain abnormality."}, "Aspartic acid": {"description": "Animal sources include:"}, "Aortopulmonary window": {"description": "Aortopulmonary window is a rare heart defect in which there is a hole connecting the major artery taking blood from the heart to the body (the aorta) and the one taking blood from the heart to the lungs (pulmonary artery). The condition is congenital, which means it is present\u00a0at birth.", "Possible Complications": "Delaying treatment can lead to complications such as:Congestive heart failure, Pulmonary hypertension, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Delayed growth", "Heart failure", "Irritability", "Poor eating and lack of weight gain", "Rapid breathing", "Rapid heartbeat", "Respiratory infections"], "Exams and Tests": "The pediatrician will usually hear an abnormal heart sound (murmur) when listening to the child's heart with a stethoscope.The doctor may order tests such as:Cardiac catheterization - a thin tube inserted into the arteries around the heart to view the heart and blood vessels and directly measure pressure in the heart and lungs, Chest x-ray, Echocardiogram, MRI of the heart. ", "Treatment": "The condition usually requires open heart surgery to repair the defect. Surgery should be done as soon as possible after the diagnosis is made, usually when the child is still a newborn.During the procedure, a heart-lung machine takes over for the child's heart. The surgeon opens the aorta and closes the defect with a patch made either from a piece of the sac that encloses the heart (the pericardium) or a man-made material.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent aortopulmonary window.", "Causes": "Normally, blood flows through the pulmonary artery into the lungs, where it picks up oxygen. Then the blood travels back to the heart and is pumped to the aorta and the rest of the body.Babies with an aortopulmonary window have a hole in between the aorta and pulmonary artery. Because of this hole, blood from the aorta flows into the pulmonary artery, and too much blood flows to the lungs. This causes high blood pressure in the lungs (a condition called pulmonary hypertension) and heart failure. The bigger the defect, the more blood can enter the pulmonary artery.The condition occurs when the aorta and pulmonary artery do not divide normally as the baby develops in the womb.Aortopulmonary window is very rare. It accounts for only 0.1% of all congenital heart defects.This condition can occur on its own or with other heart defects such as tetralogy of Fallot or pulmonary atresia. Fifty percent of patients usually have no other heart defects."}, "Abdomen - swollen": {"description": "A swollen abdomen is when your belly area is bigger than usual.", "Causes": "Abdominal swelling, or distention, is more often caused by overeating than by a serious illness. This problem also can be caused by:Air swallowing (a nervous habit), Buildup of fluid in the abdomen (this can be a sign of a serious medical problem), Gas in the intestines from eating foods that are high in fiber (such as fruits and vegetables), Irritable bowel syndrome, Lactose intolerance, Ovarian cyst, Partial bowel blockage, Pregnancy, Premenstrual syndrome (PMS), Uterine fibroids, Weight gain. "}, "Asthma - quick-relief drugs ": {"description": "Plan ahead. Make sure you do not run out. Take enough with you when you travel."}, "Angioedema": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramping", "Breathing difficulty", "Swollen eyes and mouth", "Swollen lining of the eyes (chemosis) "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will look at your skin and ask you if you have been exposed to any irritating substances. A physical exam might reveal abnormal sounds (stridor) when you breathe in if\u00a0your throat is affected.Blood tests or allergy testing may be ordered.", "description": "Hives are often called welts. They are a surface swelling. It is possible to have angioedema without hives.", "Causes": "Angioedema may be caused by an allergic reaction. During the reaction, histamine and other chemicals are released into the bloodstream. The body releases histamine when the immune system detects a foreign substance called an allergen.In most cases, the cause of angioedema is never found.The following may cause angioedema:Animal dander (scales of shed skin), Exposure to water, sunlight, cold or heat, Foods (such as berries, shellfish, fish, nuts, eggs, and milk), Insect bites, Medicines (drug allergy), such as antibiotics (penicillin and sulfa drugs), nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs), and blood pressure medicines (ACE inhibitors), Pollen . Hives and angioedema may also occur after infections or with other illnesses (including autoimmune disorders such as lupus, and leukemia and lymphoma).A form of angioedema runs in families and has different triggers, complications, and treatments. This is called hereditary angioedema.", "Treatment": "Mild symptoms may not need treatment. Moderate to severe symptoms may need to be treated. Breathing difficulty is an emergency condition.People with angioedema should:Avoid any known allergen or trigger that causes their symptoms, Avoid any medicines, herbs, or supplements that are not prescribed by a health care provider . Cool compresses or soaks can relieve pain.Medications used to treat angioedema include:\r\n  Antihistamines\r\n  , \r\n  Anti-inflammatory medicines (corticosteroids)\r\n  , Epinephrine shots (people with a history of severe symptoms can carry these with them), Inhaler medicines that help open up the airways. If the person has trouble breathing, seek immediate medical help. A severe, life-threatening airway blockage may occur if the throat swells."}, "Alternative medicine - pain relief": {"description": "Both acupuncture and hypnosis are often offered by pain management centers in the United States. Other non-drug methods used at such centers include:"}, "Amino acids": {"description": "You do not need to eat essential and nonessential amino acids at every meal, but getting a balance of them over the whole day is important."}, "Alcohol withdrawal": {"description": "Alcohol withdrawal refers to symptoms that may occur when a person who has been drinking too much alcohol every day suddenly stops drinking alcohol.", "Symptoms": ["Anxiety or nervousness", "Depression", "Fatigue", "Irritability", "Jumpiness or shakiness", "Mood swings", "Nightmares", "Not thinking clearly ", "Clammy skin", "Enlarged (dilated) pupils", "Headache", "Insomnia (sleeping difficulty)", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea and vomiting", "Pallor", "Rapid heart rate", "Sweating", "Tremor of the hands or other body parts ", "Agitation", "Fever", "Seeing or feeling things that aren't there (hallucinations)", "Seizures", "Severe confusion "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam. This may reveal:Abnormal eye movements, Abnormal heart rhythms, Dehydration (not enough fluids in the body), Fever, Rapid breathing, Rapid heart rate, Shaky hands. Blood and urine tests, including a toxicology screen, may be done.", "Causes": "Alcohol withdrawal occurs most often in adults, but it may occur in teenagers or children.The more you drink every day, the more likely you are to develop alcohol withdrawal symptoms when you stop drinking.You may have more severe withdrawal symptoms if you have certain other medical problems.", "Prevention": "Reduce or avoid alcohol. If you have alcoholism, you should stop drinking completely.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment includes:Reducing withdrawal symptoms, Preventing complications of alcohol use, Therapy to get you to stop drinking (abstinence) . INPATIENT TREATMENTPeople with moderate-to-severe symptoms of alcohol withdrawal may need inpatient treatment at a hospital or other facility that treats alcohol withdrawal. You will be watched closely for hallucinations and other signs of delirium tremens.Treatment may include:Monitoring of blood pressure, body temperature, heart rate, and blood levels of different chemicals in the body, Fluids or medications through a vein (by IV), Sedation using medication called benzodiazepines until withdrawal is complete . OUTPATIENT TREATMENTIf you have mild-to-moderate alcohol withdrawal symptoms, you can often be treated in an outpatient setting. You will need someone to commit to staying with you during this process and who can keep an eye on you. Daily visits to your health care provider are often needed until you are stable.Treatment usually includes:Sedative drugs to help ease withdrawal symptoms, Blood tests, Patient and family counseling to discuss the long-term issue of alcoholism\u00a0, Testing and treatment for other medical problems linked to alcohol use . It is important that the patient goes to a living situation that helps support them in staying sober. Some areas have housing options that provide a supportive environment for those trying to stay sober.Permanent and life-long abstinence from alcohol is the best treatment for those who have gone through withdrawal."}, "Amaurosis fugax": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Tests include a complete eye and nervous system exam. The doctor or nurse will also use a stethoscope to listen to the carotid arteries in your neck. In some cases, an eye exam will reveal a bright spot where the clot is blocking the retinal artery. A carotid ultrasound or magnetic resonance angiography (MRA) scan should be done to see if you have a blockage in the carotid artery. Blood tests should be done to check your cholesterol and blood sugar (glucose) levels.Tests will be done to see if your heart is pumping blood normally or if there is a blood clot in your heart. Your heart will be monitored with an electrocardiogram (ECG) to make sure your heart rhythm is regular.", "description": "Amaurosis fugax is a temporary loss of vision in one eye due to a lack of blood flow to the retina. ", "Causes": "Amaurosis fugax occurs when a blood clot or a piece of plaque blocks an artery in the eye. The blood clot or plaque usually travels from a larger artery, such as the carotid artery in the neck or an artery in the heart, to an artery in the eye.Plaque is a hard substance that forms when fat, cholesterol, and other substances build up in the walls of arteries. Risk factors include:Heart disease, especially irregular heartbeat, Alcohol abuse, Cocaine use, Diabetes, Family history of stroke, High blood pressure, High cholesterol, Increasing age, Smoking (people who smoke one pack a day double their risk of a stroke) . ", "Treatment": "Treatment of amaurosis fugax depends on its cause. The goal of treatment is to prevent a stroke.The following can help prevent a stroke:Avoid fatty foods and follow a healthy, low-fat diet.\u00a0Do not drink more than 1 to 2 alcoholic drinks a day., Exercise regularly: 30 minutes a day if you are not overweight; 60 - 90 minutes a day if you are overweight., Quit smoking., Most people should aim for a blood pressure below 120-130/80 mmHg. If you have diabetes or have had a stroke, your doctor may tell you to aim for a lower blood pressure., If you have diabetes, heart disease, or hardening of the arteries, your LDL \"bad\" cholesterol should be lower than 70 mg/dL., Follow your doctor's treatment plans if you have high blood pressure, diabetes, high cholesterol, or heart disease. . Your doctor may also\u00a0recommend:No treatment. You may only need regular visits to check the health of your heart and carotid arteries., Aspirin, warfarin (Coumadin), or other blood-thinning drugs to lower your risk of stroke. . If a large part of the carotid artery appears blocked, carotid endarterectomy surgery is done to remove the blockage. The decision to do surgery is also based on your overall health. "}, "Asperger syndrome": {"Symptoms": ["Children with Asperger syndrome will present many facts about their subject of interest, but there will seem to be no point or conclusion.", "They often do not recognize that the other person has lost interest in the topic.", "Areas of interest may be quite narrow, such as an obsession with train schedules, phone books, a vacuum cleaner, or collections of objects.", "Their body language may be unusual.", "They may speak in a monotone, and may not respond to other people's comments or emotions.", "They may not understand sarcasm or humor, or they may take a figure of speech literally.", "They do not recognize the need to change the volume of their voice in different settings.", "They have problems with eye contact, facial expressions, body postures, or gestures (nonverbal communication).", "They may be singled out by other children as \"weird\" or \"strange.\"", "Are unable to respond emotionally in normal social interactions", "Are not flexible about routines or rituals", "Have difficulty showing, bringing, or pointing out objects of interest to other people", "Do not express pleasure at other people's happiness", "Delays in being able to ride a bicycle, catch a ball, or climb play equipment", "Clumsiness when walking or doing other activities", "Repetitive finger flapping, twisting, or whole body movements"], "Exams and Tests": "A health care provider experienced in diagnosing and treating autism is usually needed to make the actual diagnosis. Because there is no physical test for Asperger syndrome, the diagnosis will often be based on very specific criteria from a certain medical handbook. Most doctors look for a core group of behaviors to help them diagnose Asperger syndrome. These behaviors include:Abnormal eye contact, Aloofness, Failure to turn when called by name, Failure to use gestures to point or show, Lack of interactive play, Lack of interest in peers. Symptoms may be noticeable in the first few months of life. Problems should be obvious by age 3 years.Physical, emotional, and mental tests are done to rule out other causes and look more closely for signs of this syndrome. The team that will see your child may include a psychologist, neurologist, psychiatrist, speech therapist, and other professionals who are experts in diagnosing children with Asperger syndrome.", "description": "Asperger syndrome is often considered a high functioning form of autism. It can lead to\u00a0difficulty interacting socially, repeat behaviors, and clumsiness. ", "Causes": "Hans Asperger labeled this disorder \"autistic psychopathy\" in 1944. The exact cause is unknown. More than likely, an abnormality in the brain is the cause of Asperger syndrome.Genetic factors may play a role, since the disorder tends to run in families. A specific gene has not been identified.Asperger syndrome is a pervasive developmental disorder (PDD) or autism spectrum disorder (ASD). The main difference between Asperger syndrome and autistic disorder is that children with Asperger syndrome do not have speech or cognitive delays.The condition appears to be more common in boys than in girls.Although people with Asperger syndrome often have difficulty socially, many have above-average intelligence. They may excel in fields such as computer programming and science. There is no delay in their cognitive development, ability to take care of themselves, or curiosity about their environment.", "Treatment": "There is no single best treatment for all children with Asperger syndrome. Most experts feel that the earlier treatment is started, the better.Programs for children with Asperger syndrome teach skills by building on a series of simple steps, using highly structured activities. Important tasks or points are repeated over time to help reinforce certain behaviors.Types of programs may include:Cognitive behavior or talk therapy, to help children manage their emotions, repetitive behaviors, and obsessions, Parent training, to teach techniques that can be used at home, Physical or occupational therapy, to help with motor skills and sensory problems, Social skills training, often taught in a group, Speech and language therapy, to help with the skill of everyday conversation. Medications such as selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs), antipsychotics, and stimulants may be used to treat problems such as anxiety, depression, problems with paying attention, and aggression."}, "Abdominal exploration": {"description": "Surgery that opens the abdomen is called a laparotomy. "}, "Achilles tendinitis": {"description": "Achilles tendinitis occurs when the tendon that connects the back of your leg to your heel becomes swollen and painful near the bottom of the foot. This tendon is called the Achilles tendon. It allows you to push your foot down. You use your Achilles tendon when walking, running, and jumping. ", "Possible Complications": "Achilles tendinitis may make you more likely to have an Achilles rupture. This condition most often causes a sharp pain that feels as if you have\u00a0been hit in the back of the heel with a stick. Surgical repair is necessary. However, the surgery may be hard to do because the tendon is not normal.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The health care professional will perform a physical exam. They will look for tenderness along the tendon and pain in the area of the tendon when you stand on your toes.X-rays can help diagnose bone problems.An MRI scan may be done if you are considering surgery or there is a chance that you have a tear in the Achilles tendon. ", "Treatment": "The main treatments for Achilles tendinitis do not involve surgery. It is important to remember that it may take at least 2 to 3 months for the pain to go away.Try putting ice on\u00a0the Achilles tendon area for 15 to 20 minutes, two to three times per day. Remove the ice if the area gets numb.Changes in activity may help manage the symptoms:Decrease or stop any activity that causes pain., Run or walk on smoother and softer surfaces., Switch to biking, swimming, or other activities that put less stress on the Achilles tendon. . Your health care provider or physical therapist can show you stretching exercises for the Achilles tendon.You may also need to make changes in your footwear, such as: Using a brace, boot or cast to keep the heel and tendon still and allow the swelling to go down, Placing heel lifts in the shoe under the heel, Wearing shoes that are softer in the areas over and under the heel cushion. Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs), such as aspirin and ibuprofen, can help\u00a0ease pain or swelling. If these treatments do not improve symptoms, you may need surgery to remove inflamed tissue and abnormal areas of the tendon. If there is a bone spur irritating the tendon, surgery can be used to remove the spur.Extracorporeal shock wave therapy (ESWT) may be an alternative to surgery for people who have not responded to other treatments. This treatment uses low-dose sound waves.", "Prevention": "Exercises to keep your calf muscles strong and flexible will help reduce the risk of tendinitis. Overusing a weak or tight Achilles tendon makes you more likely to develop tendinitis.", "Causes": "There are two large muscles in the calf. These create the power needed to push off with the foot or go up on the toes. The large Achilles tendon connects these muscles to the heel.Heel pain is most often due to overuse of the foot. Rarely, it is caused by an injury. Tendinitis due to overuse is most common in younger people. It can occur in walkers, runners, or other athletes. Achilles tendinitis may be more likely to occur if:There is a sudden\u00a0increase in\u00a0the amount or intensity of an activity., Your calf muscles are very tight (not stretched out)., You run on hard surfaces, such as concrete., You run too often., You jump a lot (such as when playing basketball)., You do not\u00a0wear shoes\u00a0that give your feet\u00a0proper support., Your foot suddenly turns in or out. . Tendinitis from arthritis is more common in middle-aged and older adults. A bone spur or growth may form in the back of the heel bone. This may irritate the Achilles tendon and cause pain and swelling. Flat feet will put more tension on the tendon."}, "Alpha-1 antitrypsin test": {"description": "Alpha-1 antitrypsin is a laboratory test to measure the amount of alpha-1 antitrypsin (A1AT) in your blood."}, "Aches and pains during pregnancy": {"description": "During pregnancy your body will go through a lot of changes as your baby grows and your hormones change. Along with the other common symptoms during pregnancy, you will often notice new aches and pains. "}, "Ankylosing spondylitis": {"Symptoms": ["Pain and stiffness are worse at night, in the morning, or when you are less active. The discomfort may wake you from sleep.", "The pain often gets better with activity or exercise.", "Back pain may begin in the sacroiliac joints (between the pelvis and spine). Over time, it may involve all or part of the spine.", "Your lower spine becomes less flexible. Over time, you may stand in a hunched forward position. ", "The joints between your ribs and breastbone, so that you cannot expand your chest fully", "Swelling and pain in the joints of the shoulders, knees and ankles", "Swelling of the eye", "Loss of appetite", "Slight fever", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests may include:CBC, ESR (a measure of inflammation), HLA-B27 antigen (which detects the gene linked to ankylosing spondylitis), X-rays of the spine and pelvis, MRI of the spine . ", "description": "These joints become swollen and inflamed. Over time, the affected spinal bones join together.", "Causes": "The cause of ankylosing spondylitis is unknown. Genes seem to play a role.The disease most often begins between ages 20 and 40, but it may begin before age 10. It affects more males than females. \u00a0", "Treatment": "Your doctor may prescribe nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) to reduce swelling and pain.Some NSAIDs can be bought over-the-counter (OTC), such as aspirin, ibuprofen (Advil, Motrin), and naproxen (Aleve, Naprosyn)., Other NSAIDs are prescribed by your health care provider., Talk to your health care provider or pharmacist before using any over-the-counter NSAID.. You may also need stronger medicines to control pain and swelling, such as:Corticosteroid therapy (such as prednisone) , Sulfasalazine, Methotrexate\u00a0, TNF-inhibitors (such as etanercept, adalimumab, infliximab, golimumab) . Surgery may be done if pain or joint damage is severe.Exercises can help improve posture and breathing. Lying flat on your back at night can help you keep a normal posture."}, "Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder": {"Symptoms": ["Not being able to focus\u00a0(inattentiveness)", "Being extremely active (hyperactivity)", "Not being able to control behavior\u00a0(impulsivity) ", "Fails to give close attention to details or makes careless mistakes in schoolwork", "Has difficulty keeping attention during tasks or play", "Does not seem to listen when spoken to directly", "Does not follow through on instructions and fails to finish schoolwork\u00a0or\u00a0chores and tasks", "Has\u00a0problems organizing tasks and activities", "Avoids or dislikes tasks that require sustained mental effort (such as schoolwork)", "Often loses toys, assignments, pencils, books, or tools needed for tasks or activities", "Is easily distracted", "Is often forgetful in daily activities ", "Fidgets with hands or feet or squirms in seat", "Leaves seat when remaining seated is expected", "Runs about or climbs in inappropriate situations", "Has\u00a0problems\u00a0playing or working quietly", "Is often \"on the go,\" acts as if \"driven by a motor\"", "Talks excessively ", "Blurts out answers before questions have been completed", "Has difficulty awaiting turn", "Interrupts or intrudes on others (butts into conversations or games) "], "Exams and Tests": "If ADHD is suspected, the person should be evaluated by a health care professional. There is no test that can make or exclude a diagnosis of ADHD. The diagnosis is based on a pattern of the symptoms listed above. When the person with suspected ADHD is a child, parents and teachers are usually involved during the evaluation process.Most children with ADHD have at least one other developmental or mental health problem. This problem may be a mood, anxiety or substance use disorder; a learning disability; or a tic disorder. A doctor can help determine whether these other conditions are present.", "description": "Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is a problem\u00a0of not being able to focus, being overactive, not being able control behavior, or a combination of these. For these problems to be diagnosed as ADHD, they must be out of the normal range for a person's age and development.", "Causes": "ADHD usually begins in childhood, but may continue into the adult years.\u00a0It is the most commonly diagnosed behavioral disorder in children. ADHD is diagnosed much more often in boys than in girls.It is not clear what causes ADHD. A combination of genes and environmental factors likely plays a role in the development of the condition. Imaging studies suggest that the brains of children with ADHD are different from those of\u00a0children without ADHD.", "Treatment": "Treating ADHD is a partnership between the health care provider and the patient. If the patient is a child, parents and often teachers are involved. For treatment to work, it is important to:Set specific, appropriate goals., Start medicine and/or talk therapy., Follow-up regularly with the doctor to check on goals, results, and any side effects of medicines. During these visits, information should be gathered from the patient and if relevant, parents and teachers. . If treatment does not seem to work, the health care provider will likely:Confirm the person has ADHD., Check for medical conditions that can cause similar symptoms., Make sure the treatment plan is being followed. . MedicinesMedicine combined with behavioral treatment often works best. There are several different ADHD medicines that may be used alone or in combination. The health care provider will decide which medicine is right based on the person's symptoms and needs.Psychostimulants (also known as stimulants) are the most commonly used ADHD medicines. Although these drugs are called stimulants, they actually have a calming effect in people with ADHD.Follow the health care provider's instructions on how to take ADHD medicine.Some ADHD medicines have side effects. If the person has side effects, contact the health care provider right away. The dosage or medicine itself may need to be changed.TherapyTherapy for both the patient and if relevant, the family, can help everyone understand and gain control of the stressful feelings related to ADHD. A common type of ADHD therapy is called behavioral therapy. It teaches children and parents healthy behaviors and how to manage disruptive behaviors. For mild cases of ADHD, behavioral therapy alone (without medicine) can sometimes be effective.Support groups can help the person and family connect with others who have similar problems.Other tips to help a child with ADHD include:Talk regularly with the child's teacher., Keep a consistent daily schedule, including regular times for homework, meals, and outdoor activities. Make changes to the schedule in advance and not at the last moment., Limit distractions in the child's environment., Make sure the child gets a healthy, varied diet, with plenty of fiber and basic nutrients., Make sure the child gets enough sleep., Praise and reward good behavior., Provide clear and consistent rules for the child. . There is little proof that alternative treatments for ADHD such as herbs, supplements, and chiropractic are helpful."}, "Acetylcholine receptor antibody": {"description": "This article discusses the blood test for acetylcholine receptor antibody."}, "Adolescent development": {"description": "The development of children ages 12 through 18 years old is expected to include predictable physical and mental milestones."}, "Acute cerebellar ataxia": {"description": "Acute cerebellar ataxia is sudden, uncoordinated muscle movement due to disease or injury to the cerebellum in the brain.", "Possible Complications": "Movement or behavioral disorders may (rarely) persist.", "Symptoms": ["Clumsy speech pattern (dysarthria)", "Repetitive eye movements (nystagmus)", "Uncoordinated eye movements", "Walking problems (unsteady gait)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will ask if\u00a0the person\u00a0has recently been sick and will try to rule out any other causes of the problem. Brain and nervous system examination will be done to identify the areas of the nervous system that are most affected.The following tests may be ordered:CT scan of the head, MRI scan of the head, Spinal tap. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause:If the acute cerebellar ataxia is due to bleeding, surgery may be needed., For a stroke, medication to thin the blood can be given., Infections may need to be treated with antibiotics or antivirals., Steroids may be needed for swelling (inflammation) of the cerebellum (such as from multiple sclerosis), Cerebellar ataxia caused by a recent viral infection may not need treatment.. ", "Causes": "Acute cerebellar ataxia in children, especially younger than age 3, may occur several weeks after an illness caused by a virus.Viral infections that may cause this include chickenpox, Coxsackie disease, Epstein-Barr, and echovirus.Other causes of acute cerebellar ataxia include:Abscess of the cerebellum, Alcohol, medications, and insecticides, Bleeding into the cerebellum, Multiple sclerosis, Strokes of the cerebellum, Vaccination. "}, "ACL reconstruction - discharge ": {"description": "You had surgery to reconstruct your anterior cruciate ligament (ACL). The surgeon drilled holes in the bones of your knee and placed a new ligament through these holes. The new ligament was then attached to the bone.\u00a0You may also have had surgery to repair other tissue in your knee."}, "Asymptomatic": {"description": "Asymptomatic means there are no symptoms. You are considered asymptomatic if you:"}, "ALP - blood test": {"description": "A related test is the ALP isoenzyme test. "}, "Arthritis": {"description": "Arthritis is inflammation of one or more joints. A joint is the area where two bones meet. There are over 100 different types of arthritis.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of arthritis include:Long-term (chronic) pain, Disability, Difficulty performing daily activities . ", "Symptoms": ["Joint pain", "Joint swelling", "Reduced ability to move the joint", "Redness and warmth of the skin around a joint", "Joint stiffness, especially in the morning"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask questions about your medical history.The physical exam may show:Fluid around a joint, Warm, red, tender joints, Difficulty moving a joint (called \"limited range of motion\"). Some types of arthritis may cause joint deformity. This may be a sign of severe, untreated rheumatoid arthritis.Blood tests and joint x-rays are often done to check for infection and other causes of arthritis.Your doctor may also remove a sample of joint fluid with a needle and send it to a lab to be checked.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce pain, improve function, and prevent further joint damage. The underlying cause often cannot be cured.LIFESTYLE CHANGESLifestyle changes are the preferred treatment for osteoarthritis and other types of joint swelling. Exercise can help relieve stiffness, reduce pain and fatigue, and improve muscle and bone strength. Your health care team can help you design an exercise program that is best for you.Exercise programs may include:Low-impact aerobic activity (also called endurance exercise), Range of motion exercises for flexibility, Strength training for muscle tone. Your health care provider may suggest physical therapy. This might include:Heat or ice, Splints or orthotics to support joints and help improve their position; this is often needed for rheumatoid arthritis, Water therapy, Massage. Other things you can do include:Get plenty of sleep. Sleeping 8 to 10 hours a night and taking naps during the day can help you recover from a flare-up more quickly, and may even help prevent flare-ups., Avoid staying in one position for too long., Avoid positions or movements that place extra stress on your sore joints., Change your home to make activities easier. For example, install grab bars in the shower, the tub, and near the toilet., Try stress-reducing activities, such as meditation, yoga, or tai chi., Eat a healthy diet full of fruits and vegetables, which contain important vitamins and minerals, especially vitamin E., Eat foods rich in omega-3 fatty acids, such as cold water fish (salmon, mackerel, and herring), flaxseed, rapeseed (canola) oil, soybeans, soybean oil, pumpkin seeds, and walnuts., Avoid excessive alcohol and smoking., Apply capsaicin cream over your painful joints. You may feel improvement after applying the cream for 3 to 7 days., Lose weight, if you are overweight. Weight loss can greatly improve joint pain in the legs and feet.. MEDICINESMedicines may be prescribed along with lifestyle changes. All medicines have some risks. You should be closely followed by a doctor when taking arthritis medicines.Over-the-counter medicines: Acetaminophen (Tylenol) is often the first medicine tried. Take up to 4000 mg a day (two arthritis-strength Tylenol every 8 hours). To prevent damage to your liver, do not take more than the recommended dose. Since multiple medications are available without a prescription that also contain acetaminophen, you will need to include them in the 4000 mg per day maximum. Also, avoid alcohol\u00a0when taking\u00a0acetaminophen., Aspirin, ibuprofen, or naproxen are nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) that can relieve arthritis pain. However, they can carry risks when used for a long time. Possible side effects include heart attack, stroke, stomach ulcers, bleeding from the digestive tract, and kidney damage. . Prescription medicines:Biologics are used for the treatment of autoimmune arthritis. They include etanercept (Enbrel), infliximab (Remicade), adalimumab (Humira), abatacept (Orencia), rituximab (Rituxan), golimumab (Simponi), certolizumab (Cimzia), and tocilizumab (Actemra). These drugs can improve the quality of life for many patients, but can have serious side effects., Corticosteroids (\"steroids\") help reduce inflammation. They may be injected into painful joints or given by mouth., Disease-modifying anti-rheumatic drugs (DMARDs) are used to treat autoimmune arthritis. They include methotrexate, sulfasalazine, hydroxychloroquine, and leflunomide., Immunosuppressants such as azathioprine or cyclophosphamide are used to treat patients with rheumatoid arthritis when other medications have not worked., For gout, allopurinol (Zyloprim) or febuxostat (Uloric) may be used to lower uric acid. . It is very important to take your medicines as directed by your doctor. If you are having problems doing so (for example, because of side effects), you should talk to your doctor. Also make sure your doctor knows about all the medicines you are taking, including vitamins and supplements bought without a prescription.SURGERY AND OTHER TREATMENTSIn some cases, surgery may be done if other treatments have not worked. This may include:Joint replacement, such as a total knee joint replacement. ", "Prevention": "Early diagnosis and treatment can help prevent joint damage. If you have a family history of arthritis, tell your doctor, even if you do not have joint pain.Avoiding excessive, repeated motions may help protect you against osteoarthritis.", "Causes": "Arthritis involves the breakdown of cartilage. Normal cartilage protects a joint and allows it to move smoothly. Cartilage also absorbs shock when pressure is placed on the joint, such as when you walk. Without the normal amount of cartilage, the bones rub together. This causes, swelling (inflammation), and stiffness.Joint inflammation may result from:An autoimmune disease (the body's immune system mistakenly attacks healthy tissue), Broken bone\r\n  , General \"wear and tear\" on joints, Infection, usually by bacteria or virus . In most cases, the joint inflammation goes away after the cause goes away or is treated. Sometimes it does not. When this happens, you have chronic arthritis. Arthritis may occur in men or women. Osteoarthritis is the most common type. Other, more common types of arthritis include:Ankylosing spondylitis, Crystal arthritis, gout, pseudogout, Juvenile rheumatoid arthritis (in children), Bacterial infections, Psoriatic arthritis, Reactive arthritis (Reiter syndrome), Rheumatoid arthritis (in adults), Scleroderma, Systemic lupus erythematosus (SLE). "}, "Aortic dissection": {"description": "Aortic dissection is a serious condition in which there is a tear in the wall of the major artery carrying blood out of the heart (aorta). As the tear extends along the wall of the aorta, blood can flow in between the layers of the blood vessel wall (dissection). This can lead to aortic rupture or decreased blood flow (ischemia) to organs.", "Possible Complications": "Aortic dissection may decrease or stop the blood flow to many different parts of the body. This may result in short-term or long-term problems, or damage to the:Brain, Heart, Intestines or bowels, Kidneys, Legs . ", "Symptoms": ["Can be described as sharp, stabbing, tearing, or ripping", "Is felt below the chest bone, then moves under the shoulder blades or to the back", "Can move to the shoulder, neck, arm, jaw, abdomen, or hips", "Changes position, often moving to the arms and legs as the aortic dissection gets worse ", "Anxiety and a feeling of doom", "Fainting or dizziness", "Heavy sweating (clammy skin)", "Nausea and vomiting", "Pale skin (pallor)", "Rapid, weak pulse", "Shortness of breath and trouble breathing when lying flat (orthopnea) ", "Pain in the abdomen", "Stroke symptoms", "Swallowing difficulties from pressure on the esophagus "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will take your family history and listen to your heart, lungs, and abdomen with a stethoscope. The exam may find:A \"blowing\" murmur over the aorta, heart murmur, or other abnormal sound, A difference in blood pressure between the right and left arms, or between the arms and legs, Low blood pressure, Signs resembling a heart attack, Signs of shock, but with normal blood pressure . Aortic dissection or aortic aneurysm may be seen on:Aortic angiography, Chest x-ray, Chest MRI, CT scan of chest with dye, Doppler ultrasonography (occasionally performed), Echocardiogram, Transesophageal echocardiogram (TEE) . Blood work to rule out a heart attack is needed. ", "Treatment": "Aortic dissection is a life-threatening condition and needs to be treated right away.Dissections that occur in the part of the aorta that is leaving the heart (ascending) are treated with surgery., Dissections that occur in other parts of the aorta (descending) may be managed with surgery or medicines. . Two techniques may be used for surgery:Standard, open surgery. This requires a surgical incision that\u00a0is made in the chest or abdomen., Endovascuar aortic repair. This surgery is done without any major surgical incisions. . Drugs that lower blood pressure may be prescribed. These drugs may be given through a vein (intravenously). Beta-blockers are the first drugs of choice. Strong pain relievers are very often needed.If the aortic valve is damaged, valve replacement is needed. If the heart arteries are involved, a coronary bypass is also performed.", "Prevention": "Many cases of aortic dissection cannot be prevented.Things you can do to reduce your risk include:Treating and controlling hardening of the arteries (atherosclerosis), Keeping high blood pressure under control, especially if you are at risk for dissection, Taking safety precautions to prevent injuries that can cause dissections, If you have been diagnosed with Marfan or Ehlers-Danlos syndrome, making sure you regularly follow-up with your doctor . ", "Causes": "When it leaves the heart, the aorta first moves up through the chest towards the head (the ascending aorta). It then bends or arches, and finally moves down through the chest and abdomen (the descending aorta).Aortic dissection most often happens because of a tear or damage to the inner wall of the aorta. This very often occurs in the chest (thoracic) part of the artery, but it may also occur in the abdominal aorta.When a tear occurs, it creates two channels: One in which blood continues to travel, Another where blood stays still . If the channel with non-traveling blood gets bigger, it can push on other branches of the aorta. This can narrow the other branches and reduce blood flow through them.An aortic dissection may also cause abnormal widening or ballooning of the aorta (aneurysm).The exact cause is unknown, but more common risks include: Aging, Atherosclerosis, Blunt trauma to the chest, such as hitting the steering wheel of a car during an accident, High blood pressure. Other risk factors and conditions linked to aortic dissection include:\r\n  Bicuspid aortic valve\r\n  , Coarctation (narrowing) of the aorta, Connective tissue disorders (such as Marfan syndrome and Ehlers-Danlos syndrome) and rare genetic disorders\r\n  , Heart surgery or procedures, Pregnancy, \r\n  Swelling of the blood vessels due to conditions such as arteritis and syphilis\r\n  . Aortic dissection occurs in about 2 out of every 10,000 people. It can affect anyone, but is most often seen in men ages 40 to 70."}, "Acute mountain sickness": {"description": "Acute mountain sickness is an illness that can affect mountain climbers, hikers, skiers, or travelers at high altitudes, usually\u00a0above 8,000 feet (2,400 meters).", "Possible Complications": "Coma, Fluid in the lungs (pulmonary edema), Swelling of the brain (cerebral edema), which can lead to seizures, mental changes, or permanent damage to the nervous system. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty sleeping", "Dizziness or light-headedness", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea or vomiting", "Rapid pulse (heart rate)", "Shortness of breath with exertion", "Blue color to the skin (cyanosis)", "Chest tightness or congestion", "Confusion", "Cough", "Coughing up blood", "Decreased consciousness or withdrawal from social interaction", "Gray or pale complexion", "Cannot walk in a straight line, or\u00a0walk at all", "Shortness of breath at rest"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you and listen to your chest with a stethoscope. This may\u00a0reveal sounds called crackles (rales) in the lung. Rales\u00a0may be a sign of fluid in the lungs.Tests that may be done include:Blood tests, Brain CT scan, Chest x-ray, Electrocardiogram (ECG). ", "Treatment": "Early diagnosis is important. Acute mountain sickness is easier to treat in the early stages.The main treatment for all forms of mountain sickness is to climb down (descend) to a lower altitude as rapidly and safely as possible. You should not continue climbing if you develop symptoms.Extra oxygen should be given, if available.People with severe mountain sickness may need to be admitted to a hospital.Acetazolamide (Diamox) may be given to help you breathe better. It can help reduce mild symptoms. This medicine can make you urinate more often. Make sure you drink plenty of fluids and avoid alcohol when taking this drug. This medication works best when taken before reaching a high altitude.If you have fluid in your lungs (pulmonary edema), treatment may include:Oxygen, A high blood pressure medicine called nifedipine, Beta agonist inhalers to open the airways, Breathing machine in severe cases, Medicine to increase blood flow to the lungs called phosphodiesterase inhibitor (such as sildenafil). Dexamethasone (Decadron) may help reduce swelling in the brain (cerebral edema).Portable hyperbaric chambers allow hikers to simulate conditions at lower altitudes without actually moving from their location on the mountain. These devices are very helpful if bad weather or other factors make climbing down the mountain impossible.", "Prevention": "Keys to preventing acute mountain sickness include:Climb the mountain gradually, Stop for a day or two of rest for every 2,000 feet (600 meters) above 8,000 feet (2,400 meters), Sleep at a lower altitude when possible, Learn how to recognize early symptoms of mountain sickness. If you are traveling above 9,840 feet (3,000 meters), you should carry enough oxygen for several days.If you plan on quickly climbing to a high altitude, ask your doctor about a medication called acetazolamide (Diamox). This drug helps your body get used to higher altitudes more quickly, and reduces minor symptoms. It should be taken the day before you climb, and then for the next 1 to 2 days.If you are at risk for a low red blood cell count (anemia), ask your doctor if an iron supplement is right for you. Anemia lowers the amount of oxygen in your blood. This makes you more likely to have mountain sickness.While climbing:Drink plenty of fluids, Avoid alcohol, Eat regular meals, high in carbohydrates. You should avoid high altitudes if you have heart or lung disease.", "Causes": "Acute mountain sickness is caused by\u00a0reduced air pressure and lower oxygen levels at high altitudes.The faster you climb to a high altitude, the more likely you will get acute mountain sickness. You are at higher risk for acute mountain sickness if:You live at or near sea level and travel to a high altitude, You have had the illness before. "}, "Acute cytomegalovirus (CMV) infection": {"description": "Acute cytomegalovirus (CMV) infection is a condition caused by a member of the herpesvirus family.", "Possible Complications": "Throat infection is the most common complication. Rare complications include:Colitis, Guillain-Barre syndrome, Nervous system (neurologic) complications, Pericarditis or myocarditis, Pneumonia, Rupture of spleen . ", "Symptoms": ["Enlarged lymph nodes, especially in the neck", "Fever", "Fatigue", "Loss of appetite", "Malaise", "Muscle aches", "Rash", "Sore throat ", "Chest pain", "Cough", "Headache", "Hives", "Irregular heartbeat", "Jaundice", "Neck stiffness", "Rapid heart rate", "Sensitivity to light", "Shortness of breath", "Swollen spleen and liver "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam and feel your belly area. Your liver and spleen may be tender when they are gently pressed (palpated). You may have a skin rash.Special lab tests such as a CMV DNA serum PCR test may be done to check for substances in your blood that are produced by CMV. Other tests such as a CMV antibody test may be done to check your body\u2019s response to the CMV infection.Other tests include:Blood tests for platelets and white blood cells, Chemistry panel, Liver function tests, Monospot test. ", "Treatment": "Most patients recover in 4 to 6 weeks without medication. Rest is needed, sometimes for a month or longer to regain full activity levels. Painkillers and warm salt-water gargles can help relieve symptoms.Antiviral medications are usually not used in people with normal immune function.", "Prevention": "CMV infection can be contagious if the infected person comes in close or intimate contact with another person. You should avoid kissing and sexual contact with an infected person.The virus may also spread among young children in day care settings.When planning blood transfusions or organ transplants, the CMV status of the donor can be checked to avoid passing CMV to a recipient who has not had CMV infection.", "Causes": "Infection with cytomegalovirus (CMV) is very common. The infection is spread by:Blood transfusions, Organ transplants, Respiratory droplets, Saliva, Sexual contact, Urine. Most people come into contact with CMV in their lifetime. Typically only people with a weakened immune system become ill from CMV infection. Some otherwise healthy people with acute CMV infection develop a mononucleosis-like syndrome.In the United States, CMV infection most commonly develops between ages 10 and 35. Many people are exposed to CMV early in life\u00a0but do not realize it because they have no symptoms, or they have mild symptoms that resemble the common cold. People with a compromised immune system can have a more severe form of the disease.CMV is a type of herpes virus. The virus remains in your body for the rest of your life. If your immune system becomes weakened in the future, this virus may have the chance to reactivate, causing symptoms."}, "Apert syndrome": {"description": "Apert syndrome is a genetic disease in which the seams between the skull bones close earlier than normal. This affects the shape of the head and face.", "Symptoms": ["Early closure of sutures between bones of the skull, noted by ridging along sutures (craniosynostosis)", "Frequent ear infections", "Fusion or severe webbing of the 2nd, 3rd, and 4th fingers, often called \"mitten hands\"", "Hearing loss", "Large or late-closing soft spot on a baby's skull", "Possible, slow intellectual development (varies from person to person)", "Prominent or bulging eyes", "Severe under-development of the mid-face", "Skeletal (limb) abnormalities", "Short height", "Webbing or fusion of the toes ", "Carpenter syndrome (kleeblattschadel, cloverleaf skull deformity)", "Crouzon disease (craniofacial dysostosis)", "Pfeiffer syndrome", "Saethre-Chotzen syndrome "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. Hand, foot, and skull x-rays will be done. Hearing tests should always be performed.Genetic testing can confirm the diagnosis of Apert syndrome.", "Causes": "Apert syndrome can be passed down through families (inherited) as an autosomal dominant trait, which means that only one parent needs to pass on the faulty gene for a child to have the condition.Some cases may occur without a known family history.Apert syndrome is caused by one of two changes to the FGFR2 gene. This gene defect causes some of the bony sutures of the skull to close too early, a condition called craniosynostosis.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be helpful if you have a family history of this disorder and are planning to become pregnant. Your doctor can test your baby for this disease during pregnancy.", "Treatment": "Treatment consists of surgery to correct abnormal bone growth of the skull, as well as for the fusion of the fingers and toes. Children with this disorder should be examined by a specialized craniofacial surgery team at a children's medical center.A hearing specialist should be consulted if there are hearing problems."}, "Anemia": {"description": "Other types of anemia include:", "Possible Complications": "Severe anemia can cause low oxygen levels in vital organs such as the heart, and can lead to a heart attack.", "Symptoms": ["Feeling grumpy", "Feeling weak or tired more often than usual, or with exercise", "Headaches", "Problems concentrating or thinking ", "Blue color to the whites of the eyes", "Brittle nails", "Desire to eat ice or other non-food things (pica)", "Light-headedness when you stand up", "Pale skin color", "Shortness of breath", "Sore tongue "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical examination, and may find:\r\n  Heart murmur\r\n  , \r\n  Low blood pressure, especially when you stand up\r\n  , \r\n  Pale skin\r\n  , \r\n  Rapid heart rate\r\n  . Some types of anemia may cause other findings on a physical exam.Blood tests used to diagnose some common types of anemia may include:\r\n  Blood levels of iron, vitamin B12, folic acid, and other vitamins and minerals\r\n  , Red blood count and hemoglobin level, Reticulocyte count. Other tests may be done to find medical problems that can cause anemia.", "Treatment": "Treatment should be directed at the cause of the anemia, and may include:Blood transfusions, Corticosteroids or other medicines that suppress the immune system, Erythropoietin, a medicine that helps your bone marrow make more blood cells, Supplements of iron, vitamin B12, folic acid, or other vitamins and minerals . ", "Causes": "Although many parts of the body help make red blood cells, most of the work is done in the bone marrow. Bone marrow is the soft tissue in the center of bones that helps form all blood cells.Most often, healthy red blood cells last between 90 and 120 days. Parts of your body then remove old blood cells. A hormone called erythropoietin (epo) made in your kidneys signals your bone marrow to make more red blood cells.Hemoglobin is the oxygen-carrying protein inside red blood cells. It gives red blood cells their red color. People with anemia do not have enough hemoglobin.The body needs certain vitamins, minerals, and nutrients to make enough red blood cells. Iron, vitamin B12, and folic acid are three of the most important ones. The body may not have enough of these nutrients because:Changes in the lining of the stomach or intestines affect how well nutrients are absorbed (for example, celiac disease), Poor diet, Slow blood loss (for example, from heavy menstrual periods or stomach ulcers), Surgery that removes part of the stomach or intestines . Possible causes of anemia include:Certain medications, Destruction of red blood cells earlier than normal (which may be caused by immune system problems), \r\n Long-term (chronic) diseases such as chronic kidney disease, cancer, ulcerative colitis, or rheumatoid arthritis\r\n , \r\n Some forms of anemia, such as thalassemia or sickle cell anemia, which can be inherited\r\n , \r\n Pregnancy\r\n , \r\n Problems with bone marrow such as lymphoma, leukemia, myelodysplasia, multiple myeloma, or aplastic anemia. "}, "Aging changes in sleep": {"description": "RELATED TOPICS"}, "Acute kidney failure": {"description": "Acute kidney failure is the rapid (less than 2 days) loss of your kidneys' ability to remove waste and help balance fluids and electrolytes in your body. ", "Symptoms": ["Bloody stools", "Breath odor and metallic taste in the mouth", "Bruising easily", "Changes in mental status or mood", "Decreased appetite", "Decreased sensation, especially in the hands or feet", "Fatigue", "Flank pain (between the ribs and hips)", "Hand tremor", "High blood pressure\u00a0\u00a0", "Nausea or vomiting, may last for days", "Nosebleeds", "Persistent hiccups", "Prolonged bleeding", "Seizures", "Shortness of breath", "Slow, sluggish movements", "Swelling due to the body keeping in fluid (may be seen in the legs, ankles, and feet)", "Urination changes, such as little or no urine, excessive urination at night, or urination that stops completely "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. Many patients with kidney disease have body swelling caused by fluid retention. The doctor may hear a heart murmur, crackles in the lungs, or other abnormal sounds when listening to the heart and lungs with a stethoscope.The results of laboratory tests may change suddenly (within a few days to 2 weeks). Such tests may include:BUN, Creatinine clearance, Serum creatinine, Serum potassium, Urinalysis. A kidney or abdominal ultrasound is the preferred test for diagnosing a blockage in the urinary tract. X-ray, CT scan, or MRI of the abdomen can also tell if there is a blockage.Blood tests may help reveal the underlying cause of kidney failure. Arterial blood gas and blood chemistries may show metabolic acidosis.", "Causes": "There are many possible causes of kidney damage. They include:Acute tubular necrosis (ATN), Autoimmune kidney disease, Blood clot from cholesterol (cholesterol emboli), Decreased blood flow due to very low blood pressure, which can result from burns,\u00a0dehydration, hemorrhage, injury, septic shock, serious illness, or surgery , Disorders that cause clotting within the kidney blood vessels, Infections that directly injure the kidney, such as acute pyelonephritis or septicemia, Pregnancy complications, including placenta abruption or placenta previa, Urinary tract blockage. ", "Prevention": "Treating disorders such as high blood pressure can help prevent acute kidney failure.", "Treatment": "Once the cause is found, the goal of treatment is to help your kidneys work again and prevent fluid and waste from building up in\u00a0your body while they heal. Usually, you will\u00a0have to stay overnight in the hospital for treatment.The amount of liquid you drink will be limited to the amount of urine you can produce. You will be told what you may and may not eat to reduce the buildup of toxins that the kidneys would normally remove. Your diet may need to be high in carbohydrates and low in protein, salt, and potassium.You may need antibiotics to treat or prevent infection. Diuretics (water pills) may be used to help remove fluid from your body.Medicines will be given through a vein to help control your blood potassium level.You may need dialysis. This is a treatment that does what healthy kidneys normally do -- rid the body of harmful wastes, extra salt, and water. Dialysis can save your life if your potassium levels are dangerously high. Dialysis will also be used if: Your mental status changes, You stop urinating, You develop pericarditis, You retain too much fluid, You cannot remove nitrogen waste products from your body. Dialysis will most often be short term. In rare cases, the kidney damage is so great that dialysis is needed permanently."}, "Allergic rhinitis": {"description": "This article focuses on allergic rhinitis due to\u00a0plant pollens. This type of allergic rhinitis is commonly called hay fever or seasonal allergy.", "Symptoms": ["Itchy nose, mouth, eyes, throat, skin, or any area", "Problems with smell", "Runny nose", "Sneezing", "Watery eyes", "Stuffy nose (nasal congestion)", "Coughing", "Clogged ears and decreased sense of smell", "Sore throat", "Dark circles under the eyes", "Puffiness under the eyes", "Fatigue and irritability", "Headache\r\n\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms. You will be asked whether your symptoms vary by time of day or season, and exposure to pets or other allergens.Allergy testing may reveal the pollen or other substances that trigger your symptoms. Skin testing is the most common method of allergy testing.If your doctor determines you cannot have skin testing, special blood tests may help with the diagnosis. These tests, known as IgE RAST tests, can measure the levels of allergy-related substances.A complete blood count (CBC) test called the eosinophil count may also help diagnose allergies.", "Causes": "An allergen is something that triggers an allergy. When a person with allergic rhinitis breathes in an allergen such as pollen,\u00a0mold, animal dander,\u00a0or dust, the body releases chemicals\u00a0that cause allergy symptoms.Hay fever involves an allergic reaction to pollen.Plants that cause hay fever are trees, grasses, and weeds. Their pollen is carried by the wind. (Flower pollen is carried by insects and does not cause hay fever.) Types of plants that cause hay fever vary from person to person and from area to area.The amount of pollen in the air can affect\u00a0whether hay fever symptoms develop. Hot, dry, windy days\u00a0are more likely to have\u00a0a lot\u00a0of pollen in the air. , On cool, damp, rainy days, most pollen is washed to the ground.. Hay fever and allergies often run in families. If both of your parents have hay fever or other allergies, you are likely to have hay fever and allergies, too. The chance is higher if your mother has allergies.", "Prevention": "You can sometimes prevent symptoms by avoiding the pollen you are allergic to. During pollen season, you should stay indoors where it is air-conditioned, if possible.", "Treatment": "LIFESTYLE AND AVOIDING ALLERGENSThe best treatment is to avoid the pollens that cause your symptoms. It may be impossible to avoid all pollen. But you can often take steps to reduce your exposure.You may be prescribed medicine to treat allergic rhinitis. The medicine your doctor prescribes depends on your symptoms and how severe they are. Your age and whether you have other medical conditions, such as asthma, will also be considered.For mild allergic rhinitis, a nasal wash can help remove mucus from the nose. You can buy a saline solution at a drug store or make one at home using one cup of warm water, half a teaspoon of salt, and pinch of baking soda.Treatments for allergic rhinitis include:ANTIHISTAMINESMedicines called antihistamines work well for treating allergy symptoms. They may be used when symptoms do not happen often or do not last long. Be aware of the following:Many antihistamines taken by mouth can be bought without a prescription., Some can cause sleepiness. You should not drive or operate machines after taking this type of medicine., Others cause little or no sleepiness., Antihistamine nasal sprays work well for treating allergic rhinitis. Ask your doctor if you should try these medicines first. . CORTICOSTEROIDSNasal corticosteroid sprays are the most effective treatment for allergic rhinitis., They work best when used nonstop, but they can also be helpful when used for shorter periods of time., Corticosteroid sprays are generally safe for children and adults., Many brands are available. You can buy one brand without a prescription. For all other brands, you will need a prescription from your doctor. . DECONGESTANTSDecongestants may also be helpful for reducing symptoms such as nasal stuffiness., Do not use nasal spray decongestants for more than 3 days. . OTHER MEDICINESLeukotriene inhibitors are prescription medicines that block leukotrienes. These are the chemicals the body releases in response to an allergen that also trigger symptoms. . ALLERGY SHOTSAllergy shots (immunotherapy) are sometimes recommended if you cannot avoid the pollen and your symptoms are hard to control. This includes regular shots of the pollen you are allergic to. Each dose is slightly larger than the dose before it, until you reach the dose that helps control your symptoms. Allergy shots may help your body adjust to the pollen that is causing the reaction.SUBLINGUAL IMMUNOTHERAPY TREATMENT (SLIT)Instead of shots, medicine put under the tongue may help for grass and ragweed allergies. "}, "Asthma - what to ask your doctor - child ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your health care provider to help you take care of your child's asthma."}, "Apolipoprotein CII": {"description": "This article discusses the test used to check for apoCII in a sample of your blood."}, "Asherman syndrome": {"description": "Asherman syndrome is the formation of scar tissue in the uterine cavity. The problem most often develops after uterine surgery. ", "Possible Complications": "Complications of hysteroscopic surgery are uncommon. When they occur, they may include bleeding, perforation of the uterus, and pelvic infection.In some cases, treatment of Asherman syndrome will not cure infertility.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "A pelvic exam does not reveal problems in most cases. Tests may include:Hysteroscopy, Hysterosonogram, Transvaginal ultrasound examination, Blood tests to detect tuberculosis or schistosomiasis. ", "Treatment": "Treatment involves surgery to cut and remove the adhesions or scar tissue. This can most often be done with hysteroscopy, which uses small instruments and a camera placed into the uterus through the cervix.After scar tissue is removed, the uterine cavity must be kept open while it heals to prevent adhesions from returning. Your health care provider may place a small balloon inside the uterus for several days. You may also need to take estrogen while the uterine lining heals.You may need to take antibiotics if there is an infection.", "Prevention": "Most cases of Asherman syndrome cannot be predicted or prevented.", "Causes": "Asherman syndrome is a rare condition. In most cases, it occurs in women who have had several dilatation and curettage (D&C) procedures.A severe pelvic infection unrelated to surgery may also lead to Asherman syndrome.Intrauterine adhesions can also form after infection with tuberculosis or schistosomiasis. These infections are rare in the United States. Uterine complications related to these infections are even less common."}, "Achondroplasia": {"description": "Achondroplasia is a disorder of bone growth that causes the most common type of dwarfism.", "Possible Complications": "Clubbed feet, Fluid buildup in the brain (hydrocephalus). ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal hand appearance with persistent space between the long and ring fingers", "Bowed legs", "Decreased muscle tone", "Disproportionately large head-to-body size difference", "Prominent forehead (frontal bossing)", "Shortened arms and legs (especially the upper arm and thigh)", "Short stature (significantly below the average height for a person of the same age and sex)", "Spinal stenosis", "Spine curvatures called kyphosis and lordosis"], "Exams and Tests": "During pregnancy, a prenatal ultrasound may show excessive amniotic fluid surrounding the unborn infant.Examination of the infant after birth shows increased front-to-back head size. There may be signs of hydrocephalus (\"water on the brain\").X-rays of the long bones can reveal achondroplasia in the newborn.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for achondroplasia. Related abnormalities, including spinal stenosis and spinal cord compression, should be treated when they cause problems.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be helpful for prospective parents when one or both have achondroplasia. However, because achondroplasia most often develops spontaneously, prevention is not always possible.", "Causes": "Achondroplasia is one of a group of disorders called chondrodystrophies or osteochondrodysplasias.Achondroplasia may be inherited as an autosomal dominant trait, which means that if a child gets the defective gene from one parent, the child will have the disorder. If one parent has achondroplasia, the infant has a 50% chance of inheriting the disorder. If both parents have the condition, the infant's chances of being affected increase to 75%.However, most cases appear as spontaneous mutations. This means that two parents without achondroplasia may give birth to a baby with the condition."}, "Angelman syndrome ": {"description": "Angelman syndrome (AS) is a genetic condition that causes problems with the way a child's body and brain develop. The syndrome is present from birth (congenital). However, it often isn't diagnosed until about 6 to 12 months of age. This is usually when development problems are first noticed.", "Possible Complications": "\r\n  Severe seizures, Gastroesophageal reflux (heartburn), Scoliosis (curved spine), Accidental injury due to uncontrolled movements. ", "Symptoms": ["Loss of muscle tone (floppiness)", "Trouble feeding", "Heartburn (acid reflux)", "Trembling arm and leg movements", "Unstable or jerky walking", "Little or no speech", "Happy, excitable personality", "Laughing and smiling often", "Light hair, skin, and eye color compared to rest of family", "Small head size compared to body, flattened back of head", "Severe intellectual disability", "Seizures", "Excessive movement of the hands and limbs", "Sleep problems", "Tongue thrusting, drooling ", "Unusual chewing and mouthing movements", "Crossed eyes", "Walking with arms uplifted and hands waving"], "Exams and Tests": "Genetic tests may diagnose Angelman syndrome. These tests look for:Missing pieces of chromosomes, DNA test to see if copies of the gene from both parents are in an inactive or active state, Gene mutation in the mother's copy of the gene. Other tests may include:Brain MRI, EEG. ", "Treatment": "There is no cure for Angelman syndrome. Treatment helps to manage health and development problems caused by the condition.Anticonvulsant medicines help control seizures, Behavior therapy helps manage hyperactivity, sleep problems, and development problems, Occupational and speech therapy manage speech problems and teach living skills, Physical therapy helps with walking and movement problems. ", "Prevention": "There is no way to prevent Angelman syndrome. If you have a child with AS or a family history of the condition, you may want to talk with your health care provider before becoming pregnant.", "Causes": "This condition involves the gene UBE3A. Most genes come in pairs. We inherit one from our mother and one from our father. Usually, both genes are active. This means information from both genes is used by our cells. With the UB3A gene, both parents pass it on, but only the gene passed on from the mother is active. Angelman syndrome usually occurs because the UBE3A gene passed on from the mother doesn't work the way it should. In some cases, AS is caused when two copies of the UBE3A gene come from the father, and none come from the mother. This means neither gene is active, because they both come from the father."}, "Angina": {"description": "Related topics:"}, "Advance care directives": {"description": "Living will; Power of attorney; DNR - advance directive; Do not resuscitate - advance directive; Do-not-resuscitate - advance directive"}}